Chapter 1 to Chapter 60.

“We have found Miss Elizabeth.”

 

The sound of the pen with the neat swine quill brushing the paper suddenly cut off.

 

The Duke raised his head. It was a beautiful face, as if it had come out of a famous painting, but it was too expressionless, creating an eerie atmosphere.

 

Michael, the aide, felt his mouth go dry with tension and clutched his hand behind his back.

 

“As expected, it is said that she appeared at the place where the funeral mass was being held.”

 

The man’s tightly closed lips slowly drew an arc, and his grey eyes gleamed coldly.

 

“What time is it?”

 

It was the question of how much time was left. Michael answered quickly.

 

“Enough until you arrive.”

 

“Excellent.”

 

With a rare compliment, the Duke rose.

 

When his master’s cold gaze scanned one office wall, Michael was taken aback.

 

No way, before he even thought about it, his eyes were quick to recognize his master’s outfit.

 

The thick-soled leather boots made a light sound as they rubbed against the smooth floor.

 

Soon the man stopped in front of the wall where several hunting guns were hinged.

 

The Duke slowly ran his fingertips through the long, slender barrels one by one. Savouring the feeling of the smooth and cold surface touching his skin.

 

“This would be nice.”

 

Michael held his breath at the melodious voice as if he were about to do something enjoyable. At the same time, he recalled that the Duke had bought a new shotgun not long ago.

 

The shotgun, which the gunman recommended to spit on, saying it had a long range and great power, was now in the hands of the Duke.

 

‘I heard he suddenly wanted to get a gun right after the hunting season was over… Oh my God.’

 

This was the reality that Michael tried to close his eyes and ignore even though he watched from the side.

 

He had cold sweat running down his spine. However, Michael did not even dare to dissuade his master.

 

The Duke was out of his mind. He looked perfect on the outside, but on the inside, he was slowly going mad.

 

Michael shuddered at the bad feeling.

 

“…Your Grace-“

 

Click, the Duke loaded the bullet instead of answering. With red, bloodshot eyes.

 

“Leave all the lights on in the mansion. Bright, no shadows.”

 

The man’s lips curled as he went to catch the prey caught in the trap.

 



 

Elise walked through the village cemetery with her tears welling up. She hadn’t even properly closed her cape because she had to rush out.

 

‘It’s probably just a rumour. There are a lot of baseless stories out there…’

 

However, her face, revealed through the gaping hood, was full of tear marks.

 

Carefully out of sight, she lowered herself to inspect the grave.

 

It wasn’t long before she glimpsed a group of people dressed in black.

 

She hid behind a large wooden pole and listened to them.

 

She longed for a futile miracle.

 

In the stillness, only the voice of the priest praying for the dead resounded.

 

“Rest to Marisa, who has returned to the arms of God…”

 

Ah… The thin string that was barely holding onto her snapped and Elise’s body collapsed to the floor.

 

Her heart ached as if it would crush. 

 

Pain. 

 

She was in so much pain that breathing seemed difficult, suffocating.

 

She hurriedly covered her mouth with her hands and wept.

 

‘Mother…’

 

Unbearable sorrow and guilt surged like waves.

 

‘It was all my fault.’

 

‘If only I had behaved a little wiser.’

 

‘If only I had suspected it just once…’

 

The more she thought of the meaningless assumptions, the more she grew out of breath.

 

The abhorrence of foolishness against herself thundered her like a blade.

 

Even after making it this far, she was contemptuous of herself and terrible at not even attending her mother’s funeral for fear that someone would find her out.

 

In the midst of pouring tears, Elise remained silent.

 

After the priest’s prayers, a white flower fell over the coffin, concluding the funeral service. Elise watched it all, half out of her mind.

 

Eventually, as those who had finished the funerals of those who had no association with her left, she was the only one left in the grave.

 

Elise stomped on her floor and raised her body up.

 

After barely getting close to the tombstone, she flopped down on the dirt floor. Her calves were chafed, but she couldn’t feel anything. The tears she thought she had shed all flowed down again.

 

‘I’m sorry. I’m sorry…’

 

‘I need to ask for forgiveness, I have to…’

 

Her throat choked and her voice couldn’t come out properly. The fact that she was not even allowed to wail was surely a punishment for the heinous child.

 

Elise let out a silent cry for a long time.

 



 

After she came to her senses, she offered up her prayers for her mother.

 

May her weary mother’s soul be at peace in God’s arms, and may her next life be happy in abundance.

 

How much time had passed like that, when Elise opened her eyes again after she had finished her prayer?

 

A sudden tingling sensation raced down her spine. She shook her shoulders and turned her body around.

 

She looked around, but there were only graves, tombstones and beautiful trees. The graveyard was silent.

 

‘There’s no one. It’s all right.’

 

Just as she tried to suppress her anxiety, assuming it was a mistake because of her nervousness, the wind changed direction.

 

Somehow the feeling of the air changed.

 

The excessive stillness was chilling unlike before.

 

Elise knew the identity of this cold energy.

 

‘I don’t think so. It was just for a second. Please…’

 

Her fingertips started to tremble. Eyes that trembled violently fumbled around.

 

Then, with a jolt, she caught something in her field of vision.

 

‘I saw it wrong…’

 

Elise hurriedly shook her head. She closed her eyes, then opened them again. But he still stood there, keeping his place.

 

Without moving, he just stared at her.

 

Elise stood up, winking, and stepped back. Her toes stepped on the ground unsteadily, and she took off.

 

A gruesome, eerie cry became the signal flare. Elise turned around and started to run away into the forest behind the graveyard.

 

Cardale, on the other hand, captured the laughable struggle one by one.

 

Elise was running away in exactly the direction he intended.

 

He walked leisurely. The sound of the piled leaves crunching under her feet was like a scream, which he loved to hear.

 

It was a desperate getaway. Not knowing that the tight transparent trap was waiting for her, and she was just busy running forward.

 

“Not even pitiful.”

 

Cardale’s lips twisted. Eventually, through his languidly relaxed lips, a hum leaked out.

 

The hunt, with its obvious outcome, made him less interested, but this time it was different. He drove his prey leisurely.

 

‘Until you are completely caught in the trap I dug.’

 

Cardale let out a low exclamation when he reached the downhill road with an open view. It was just like the picture he had drawn in his imagination.

 

The woman’s hood was already off as she ran frantically downhill.

 

Her soft silver hair fluttered like the wings of a beautiful butterfly, and her fluttering gestures were just as pretty as her desperation.

 

Cardale set his feet on a flat rock for support and raised the loaded shotgun.

 

The cold autumn sunlight passed over the leaves that were starting to discolour little by little and fell over his head. He took aim slowly at his target, happily enjoying the pouring sunlight as if celebrating his victory.

 

Elise stopped running and looked back at him, perhaps puzzled by the silence. Her clear blue eyes were instantly stained with fear.

 

‘Yes, I wanted to see that.’

 

Cardale pulled his finger without hesitation, feeling intense joy.

 

Taang!

 

A deafening gunshot rang out in the silent forest.

 

The woman’s frightened fall was imprinted on his eyes one by one, as if time had been stretched out.

 

Like a captive animal trying to free itself, the woman wriggled to raise her body.

 

‘The more you do that, the more restrained your feet will be. It would be convenient to give up, silly.’

 

Cardale laughed lazily and pulled the trigger again.

 

The bullet flew with a loud, piercing noise and hit the ground exactly above her head.

 

Finally, Elise stopped moving. Like an animal that encounters light without warning on a dark night.

 

He moved his feet slowly towards the frozen woman, counting each step.

 

Finally three, two, and a step.

 

The body of the woman who had been curled up was shaking. Cardale sat down on one knee, not caring that his pants were getting dirty.

 

The woman was startled as he laid his hand on her dry, emaciated back. The reaction was pretty cute. The warm body temperature and the soft, tender touch of his hands made her feel very uncomfortable.

 

He breathed in slowly for a moment.

 

It felt like the things that had been cluttered up with the mess had finally found their place.

 

“Elizabeth.”

 

He turned her body around and met his eyes with fear-stained blue eyes. Then he slowly skimmed down from head to toe. It was a tenacious gaze.

 

The skirt rolled up, revealing her white legs, which had scratches all over. He gently brushed her tender calves. A trembling as weak as that of a young deer passed through the skin in touch.

 

“The next time you do something like this…”

 

Elise let out a painful moan as he grabbed her slender ankle tightly.

 

“Then there will be no wrong with it.”

 

It was a threat that he let go even though he could have shot her.

 

Tears filled and poured out of Elise’s large, round eyes.

 

“Too bad.”

 

His large hands wrapped around Elise’s cheeks. Her face was wet with sweat and tears, but he was not offended at all.

 

Cardale’s warm tongue touched Elise’s cheek. Elise tried to escape, but it was futile. More strength was added to her gripped hands.

 

The man who followed the trail of her tears licked every bit of water around her eyes. The salty taste that signalled the end of the thirst he had endured for the past few days stung his tongue.

 

Clear water flowed endlessly under her blue ocean-like eyes, but he swallowed them all.

 

The woman’s despair was terribly sweet.

It was a sheer typical story.

 

An innocent maid, who fell in love with her young master, mistook his low desire for love and gave her heart and body generously, but… Eventually, he was abandoned and kicked out of her life.

 

A story that was common enough to kick your feet, but will not receive cheap sympathy from people, let alone consolation.

 

‘A stupid commoner woman who doesn’t know her place.’

 

A mockery that a woman did not know her place faced an end worthy of her situation, and contempt that followed like a tag.

 

The world was harrowing even to the daughter the maid gave birth to at the risk of her life.

 

A filthy creature.

 

Being born illegitimate in the Nordrat Empire meant giving up much of her life, and Elise’s misfortune began there.

 

But she couldn’t blame her mother. She couldn’t do that.

 

Knowing what sacrifices the mother endured to protect her child.

 

“Cough, cough…!”

 

“Mother!”

 

The dark red blood from Marisa’s mouth soaked the faded old quilt. Elise halted what she was doing and rushed to embrace her mother.

 

The dry hands, clutching the covering cloth, trembled. Every time the sick body coughed, it trembled as if it were convulsing.

 

At this rate, her mother was likely to break into pieces, so Elise gave strength to her arms.

 

The cough stopped after a long time.

 

“…Elizabeth.”

 

There was a sound from her mother’s throat. She felt like it was bleeding, the smell of iron. Elise’s eyes were burning.

 

“I must be by your side until you become an adult…”

 

“You’ll live longer.”

 

But both of them knew it had to be a miracle.

 

Her mother’s body deteriorated helplessly because she could not afford proper treatment or medicine. As the days went by, she could see that her mother’s energy was diminishing.

 

Elise looked down at her mother, who was thinner than yesterday.

 

She was her only family. The mere imagination of losing her mother filled her with tears and she choked up.

 

She was a sick and weak mother, but to Elise, she was the whole world.

 

Elise poured water into a teething cup and brought it to Marisa’s cracked lips. Elise, who laid her mother back, who had moistened her throat, whispered.

 

“Take a nap. I’ll be by your side.”

 

Marisa nodded and closed her eyes.

 

Elise sat by the bedside and held her mother’s dry hands still.

 

The traces of the past years remained intact on the hand with bones sticking out under the skin due to lack of flesh.

 

Elise got emotional, something was welling inside of her.

 

That’s why words that had never been uttered came out of nowhere.

 

“Don’t you hate him?”

 

Her mother’s agitation was conveyed by flinching and shaking her fingers.

 

Elise was inwardly surprised that she had done so. But she didn’t pick it up.

 

Somehow she didn’t want to do that this time.

 

So, she waited silently.

 

Until a small voice came back as if for Elise to only hear.

 

“Even if he seemed like a tough and cold person… The night I had you was very sweet.”

 

The eyes gleamed with nostalgia like never before. It was next that small dew formed around the wrinkled eyes.

 

“It’s just that he… There was just a lot he couldn’t throw away.”

 

Elise bit her lips several times.

 

“…Do you still love him?”

 

Elise could guess the answer from just the sad smile on Marisa’s face.

 

Her heart ached.

 

The words recovered from the bottom of the emotion lingered at the tip of her tongue for a while, but couldn’t come out and were eventually swallowed.

 

Elise’s head was bowed. The sadness of not being able to push in crept under the blue eyes.

 

“The night I had you was very sweet.”

 

‘But mother.’

 

‘You had to give your life in exchange for that short kindness.’

 



 

The Hidden Shadow of the Brilliant Islands Inhel.

 

Elise opened her eyes in a small room in a corner of the slum, also called a trash can. It was before the light began.

 

She tied her long hair together and hid it in a cape with a hat.

 

It was already dirty because of the cheap coal used to heat the room, so she didn’t have to do the hard work of putting gum on her face.

 

“I’ll be back.”

 

Elise checked on her mother inside and left the house.

 

The dawn of the slum was still. She quickly passed through the huts and dirty, stinking alleys.

 

As she continued her steps, the scenery of the street changed little by little.

 

Houses with well-maintained roofs, walls and windows. A spacious and pleasant street. A big flower pot in a place that can be seen from time to time.

 

When she reached the high street, Elise suddenly stopped walking.

 

She reflected her in a pool of water on the floor. She trembled and shook her head at the sight of her shabby appearance.

 

‘This is no time for this.’

 

Even time to realize her miserable situation was a luxury to her.

 

She had to walk to the destination because she had no money.

 

Elise went near the carriage waiting for the guests in a row. The coachman asked curtly when he found her cringing.

 

“What?”

 

“Do you happen to know which way to go to Count Schuvan’s residence?”

 

The coachman’s eyes scanned Elise. Her shabby clothes, worn to the point of wear for how long she wore them, smelled acrid.

 

He frowned at her dirty appearance. Then he pointed to one of the roads with a chin gesture of annoyance.

 

Elise bowed and hurried to tease her feet.

 



 

The sun was already going over the ridge when Elise finally arrived at the Count of Schuvan.

 

“This is…”

 

Overwhelmed by the imposing mansion, Elise took a dry breath.

 

The iron bars of the main gate, which rose high toward the sky, flashed like a spear aimed at her.

 

A place where she thought she should never have come, and never would.

 

Her heart thumped with fear. The brutal violence she experienced as a child remained like an imprint and still dominated Elise.

 

A terrible fear weighed on her.

 

She knew so well how cruel aristocrats can be to beings like her.

 

However, she had no other choice because she was in a dead end.

 

Elise thought of her dying mother and tried to suppress her fear.

 

Then she walked for hours, heavily pulling off her swollen feet and walking toward the guard.

 

“What’s going on?”

 

“Well, I was wondering if I could see the Count.”

 

“What?”

 

When asked a difficult question, the guard kicked his tongue and scanned Elise up and down.

 

“Did you come to beg or something? Do you think someone like you is someone who can see him recklessly?”

 

Elise shook her head in a hurry.

 

“It’s not like that. I have a pressing request…”

 

At that time, a faint sound of horse hooves was heard from the inside of the main gate.

 

The guards quickly straightened up and shouted at her.

 

“What are you doing? Come on, don’t get too far!”

 

Elise took a step back, shaking her shoulders with a sudden shout. The nervous body became stiff when it faced the threat of the guard.

 

Before she knew it, the front door opened wide. A carriage was coming at full speed from the other side.

 

The guards finally ran out of patience at the sight of Elise, who was unable to do anything while being frozen on the spot.

 

“Can’t you hear me say go away? Where did you come from?”

 

Eventually, a guard shouted and pushed Elise’s body violently.

 

As a result, it was a bad choice. Coincidentally, the place where Elise collapsed was because the carriage was passing by.

 

The coachman, who was running from the opposite side, was surprised to find Elise belatedly. It was good luck to catch horse reins in a hurry and barely stop the carriage.

 

“Heehee~”

 

The excited horses wrenched their huge bodies and wept.

 

Elise, who had fallen dazedly in the mixed noise, suddenly came to her senses and jumped to her feet.

 

The purpose of making her come to this point came to mind. That now was a great opportunity to meet the Count.

 

The body bounced off before thinking with its head. Elise galloped into a large, colourful front carriage. It was courage that she would never have again.

 

“Please help me, Count!”

 

The knock on the door was urgent and desperate. But no sound was heard from the inside.

 

“My mother is in critical condition! I couldn’t even use the medicine properly. She might be able to live if she gets proper treatment from a doctor. Please, please!”

 

“You damn girl!”

 

The guards approached and forcibly removed Elise from the carriage. She struggled not to fall off, holding the door handle, but could not cope with several sturdy men.

 

“Oh, no!”

 

It was when a cry of despair burst through her lips.

 

“Stop.”

 

An unexpectedly low, soft voice penetrated her ears.

 

“Back off.”

 

The guards, who had been rough around her, hesitated for a moment and stepped back.

 

Plop, Elise sank to the floor as her legs became weak. Perhaps because of the scuffle a while ago, her stomach felt nauseous as she couldn’t eat anything, so she grabbed her chest, and a black shadow hung over her head.

 

She slowly raised her head and looked at the person who created the shade.

 

The face of the man standing with his back against the sun was shaded and could not be seen well.

 

‘Who is he…?’

 

The moment Elise inadvertently frowned at his face, the eyes of the two met.


The face of the man who had just crossed the boundary of the young man was as beautiful as a sculpture.

 

His red eyes, like garnets set in between the few strands of his naturally flowing black hair, were watching her.

 

“Did you say you needed help?”

 

Even in the midst of dizziness and nausea, the man’s voice sounded as if it were stuck in her ears.

 

Elise blinked her big eyes.

 

‘But he is not the Count.’

 

Elise knew Count Schuvan’s face, although it was a memory of childhood.

 

As if possessed, the thoughts that came into her head flowed out of her mouth without filtration.

 

“But… you are not the Count.”

 

“What?”

 

“The Count has silver hair and purple eyes. He is older, too.”

 

It was a naive yet unbiased answer. The expressionless face collapsed in an instant, and the man let out a blank laugh.

 

“Yes. As you said, I am not the Count.”

 

A beautiful red jewel shimmered between his lazily opened eyes.

 

“But I can still help you.”

 

He flicked his finger at the aide. Moments later, a heavy pouch fell in front of Elise.

 

However, her eyes caught the man’s jet-black shoes before the pocket of money.

 

The polished leather glossed smoothly. As if he would not tolerate any speck of dust.

 

Elise unknowingly shrank her legs and hid her old, earthy shoes under her skirt

 

“Good luck, then.”

 

“Ah…”

 

The man turned without hesitation, leaving the words behind.

 

Elise did not even think of holding him, but only watched him move away.

 

The regular footsteps fell apart and soon stopped. Then, with a short cry of horses, the wheels of the carriage began to roll.

 

Elise could not leave until the distant carriage disappeared and was never seen.

 



 

Michael peeped at his master sitting across from him.

 

Cardale Vassenberg.

 

He was a young Duke who inherited the great wealth and high honour of Vassenberg early on.

 

The man was looking out of the window with expressionless eyes. Michael’s eyes, which inadvertently turned his head along his master’s gaze, reflected the figure of a small woman still sitting on the floor.

 

The woman who stopped the Duke’s carriage with her body still looked puzzled as if she could not believe the luck that came to her.

 

‘It’s understandable.’

 

Michael thought it was a miracle.

 

It was no one else, but his master, Cardale Vassenberg, who has shown mercy to the common people, and to a woman whom he had never seen before.

 

“She looks suspicious.”

 

Michael flinched and awakened from his thoughts at the insensitive voice of his master.

 

Before he knew it, the carriage began to run, and the Duke turned his head to look at him.

 

“Are you curious? The reason why I did an unbecoming favour.”

 

“I’m sorry, Your Excellency.”

 

“It’s not your fault to honestly express your thoughts toward your lord.”

 

It didn’t seem like he was reprimanding, but in fact, it was a noble accusation.

 

Michael lowered his head.

 

“I have been told that Gerhard Schuvan has an illegitimate child.”

 

“What?”

 

Cardale kicked his tongue low. His overly righteous aide was appalled by this.

 

“As expected, you are a knight.”

 

“I have never regretted the choice to serve His Excellency.”

 

“That noble loyalty must last a long time.”

 

Cardale didn’t trust anyone. It was no exception for the adjutant who had been by his side for a long time.

 

However, Michael, who has a strong personality, remained firm despite his master’s blatant sneer.

 

“As far as I’m guessing, the woman earlier is the illegitimate daughter of Gerhard Schuvan.”

 

“Really? Oh, so the colour of her hair…”

 

Recalling the silver hair that seemed to have been pulled out with a spinning wheel in the moonlight, Michael shook his head.

 

“And in a little while, Gerhard Schuvan will receive a report that I have shown interest in her.”

 

‘Did you hire spies in the Count’s family?’ Michael asked, straightening his posture.

 

“Do you mean you helped her on purpose?”

 

“Isn’t the person I don’t need desperate to line me up?”

 

The Count was quite a nuisance to strike lightly.

 

“I threw him a suitable carrot instead.”

 

Cardale’s eyes shone heartily.

 

The Count will swell in the vain dream that he may achieve his purpose through his illegitimate child. As long as he was drunk in that dream, he won’t bother him.

 

“Wouldn’t it take at least a few months to put her before me?”

 

Michael’s face turned pale as a cool smile gathered around Cardale’s mouth.

 

“Then do you intend to take the Count’s daughter later?”

 

“No way. It’s the end of her usefulness by taking a short time before the war. Because I will leave Inghel as soon as the contract negotiations with the Emperor are over.”

 

Michael swallowed dry.

 

An innocent woman will soon be thrown into misery. For a man who believes he is a benefactor.

 

And she wouldn’t even know why her misfortune started, that would last for the rest of her life.

 

Meanwhile, the man who made a ruthless decision turned his eyes calmly out of the window.

 

The splendid scenery of Inhel, the archipelago, was formed in Cadale’s eyes. But in fact, what came to his mind was a different scene.

 

“Please help me!”

 

A woman so skinny, and who didn’t have anything to look at.

 

Poverty was attached to the worn-out outfit.

 

It was self-evident that the appearance of a shabby and dirty girl was annoying to him, who had a more noble aesthetic than anyone else.

 

However, the nape of her neck and shoulder blades, reflected through the gaps in the fabric torn by the rough hands of the guards, remained quite clear in his mind.

 

White and delicate.

 

“Find out who the guards were guarding the front door of the Count’s residence.”

 

Leaving Michael embarrassed by the mysterious order, Cardale closed his eyes.

 

The afterimage, which had been intrusive due to the darkness created, slipped out.

 

The woman’s old shoes, which had fallen out of soles, glistened until the end and soon disappeared.

 



 

The pocket containing ten silver coins showed greater power than Elise expected.

 

The doctor, who had always been at the door, accepted Elise even in the middle of the night.

 

“Bring your mother here.”

 

“She is so sick that she can’t even walk. Can you come with me?”

 

The doctor openly expressed disapproval, but could not overcome greed and set foot in the slum for the first time in his life.

 

The dark back alley was darker due to the darkness.

 

Walking after Elise, who led the way, he held his nose and grumbled incessantly.

 

“Tsk, tsk, living in a garbage dump like this can lead to diseases that weren’t there before.”

 

‘No one would want to live here.’ The words soared to the top of her throat, but Elise swallowed them quietly.

 

Finally, the two arrived at Elise’s house. There was a musty smell in the room, where the only light was a candle.

 

The doctor looked at the woman lying dead and frowned at her.

 

In her hand, where only her skin and bones were left, was a handkerchief stained with her blood. Her condition was so obvious that he looked hopeless.

 

‘How are you going to save a dying body?’

 

It was a serious condition that will not be strange to die anytime if she vomited blood. Even if he was a well-known doctor of the council who only dealt with nobles, he couldn’t help this woman with their abilities.

 

However, Elise’s purse was coveted, so the doctor pretended to treat her in moderation.

 

He pretended to attend to the sick woman, took out some medicine to alleviate the symptoms, and was done.

 

“If you take medicine every meal, the cough will ease a little.”

 

Then he took the purse and stood up. He wanted to get out of this dirty, smelly place as soon as possible.

 

Elise rose in confusion.

 

“Are you leaving already?”

 

“Then what more do you want me to do?”

 

Elise knew nothing about medicine, but she noticed that the doctor’s treatment was insincere.

 

“You didn’t treat my mother!”

 

“Get out of my way!”

 

When the situation became unfavourable, the doctor pushed her out of the door. Elise rushed after the doctor.

 

“Please get him!”

 

But everyone just glanced at her and no one helped her.

 

Her legs, swollen from walking all day, were limiting her ability to follow. The distance had widened significantly.

 

Suddenly, Elise stopped in her seat. She bit her lip, and then she cried out in a loud voice.

 

“You swindler, you’re a fraud! You took my purse!”

 

Purse. That one word drew the attention of the people around.

 

The people who rushed out looked around in search of prey with their eyes shining, and soon found the doctor.

 

“Hey, let go of me! You filthy beggars!”

 

They reached out their hands here and there to the doctor who had been slammed into the pavement. 

 

He was robbed of everything he had in an instant, and after being beaten up, he could barely escape.

 

After a while, the faces of the people in the slums turned bright due to the coins, and they started fighting to plunder each other’s possessions.

 

Elise gave a dejected smile.

 

She didn’t expect to get the money back. However, the stark bottom of this place, which she saw every time was…

 

No matter how hard she tries, she can never get out of here.

 

It was when she turned around holding back tears of sadness.

 

“Long time no see, Miss Elise.”

 

Someone greeted her.

 

And the moment she checked who the opponent was, she was suffocated as if she was strangled.

A woman with dark blue hair in a tight bun was looking at her with bright yellow eyes.

 

Elise barely opened her mouth.

 

“…Vanessa.”

 

“You remember. I thought you wouldn’t know because you ran away shortly after I joined Count Schuvan’s staff.”

 

Her voice was calm, but the tone was harsh. Feeling afraid, Elise faltered back.

 

“How on earth do you know this place…?”

 

Then, ridicule passed over Vanessa’s sharp eyes.

 

“Didn’t you come to the mansion to see the Count today?”

 

Elise’s face turned white.

 

“Could you be following me?”

 

“Well, let’s call it a confirmation.”

 

Vanessa smiled. However, only the corners of her mouth curled gently, her eyes were not smiling at all.

 

“Get into the carriage. The Count asked me to bring the young lady.”

 

Elise held her trembling hands tightly. The fact that she had been called by the Count made her afraid just to imagine what would happen to her if she met him now.

 

“Uh, what about mother…?”

 

“I heard that Lady Marisa is in critical condition, but seeing that it is taking so much time, it seems that she is more tolerable than I thought,” said Vanessa, looking down in pity.

 

“Oh, no, that-”

 

“Then get on. I don’t have much time.”

 

Elise said nothing more and had to climb into the carriage.

 

Just as Vanessa sat across from her, Elena heard the door firmly lock from outside.

 

Her heart thumped. Only darkness could be seen through the curtained windows.

 

A pitch black and bitter darkness.

 

Memories of that night began to creep up again. Her body began to tremble in fear.

 

Elise desperately remembered her mother. Even her hand, which she desperately clasped, fearing that they would miss each other.

 

She felt her fears, which had hardly calmed down, subside little by little. Elise caught her breath and swallowed her fear.

 

‘It would have been for the better. Because the only person who can save my mother is Count Schuvan.’

 

She tried to rationalize it. Warnings that it might be a trap rang like mad in her head, but she had no other options.

 

If this was her only chance to save her mother, Elise was willing to plunge into hellfire.

 



 

What used to take several hours on foot was just a carriage ride.

 

The front door of the Count’s house, which she had not been able to step on the threshold before, was wide open.

 

Meanwhile, the faces of the guards changed, but because of her nervousness, Elise didn’t notice them at all.

 

The carriage soon arrived at the gate of the mansion.

 

“Get off. The Count is waiting for you.”

 

Elise pressed her lips together and followed Vanessa. She was stunned by the majesty of the mansion, which was incomparable to the huts in the slums.

 

She lowered her head, thinking that she shouldn’t even dare to look at it, and this time her embarrassed face was reflected on the well-polished floor.

 

There was nowhere to put her eyes. It was a place that didn’t fit her in the slightest. It seemed that even stepping on her would stain it.

 

“Hurry up.”

 

Only after hearing Vanessa’s urging did Elise come to her senses and start walking.

 

She struggled to shake off the anxiety and fear of being sucked into the monster’s mouth.

 



 

The stinky smell of cigars filled the room. Elise put up with her cough, and greeted the Count.

 

Gerhard Schuvan’s dry gaze scanned Elise sharply as if foretelling her usefulness.

 

“It’s been a while, Elise.”

 



 

“Has it been eight years since you and Marisa escaped?”

 

Elise swallowed. The memory of her mother and her running through the darkness to avoid being caught was still vivid.

 

“The person who ran away saying she didn’t like this place shamelessly came back on her own.”

 

Because she didn’t like it? It wasn’t such a shallow reason. Marisa and Elise’s escape was for the sake of survival.

 

“Well, shall I hear why you came to see me?”

 

There was no way Gerhard didn’t know why Vanessa was here, with the girl. Even so, the reason why he dared to ask was to thoroughly condemn and submit his mistress and his daughter who had dared to deceive him and run away.

 

“…My mother is ill. A lot.”

 

“So?”

 

Elise hesitantly continued.

 

“I’ve heard that a good doctor dealing with noble families can cure my mother’s illness. So I’m going to ask the Count-“

 

“Why should I do you such a favour? Even more so, to the woman who betrayed me and ran away without knowing grace.”

 

Elise bit her lip hard. It reminded her of the fact that the Count was a man without blood or tears.

 

The fact that she inherited half the blood of such a person was terrifying for Elise. Even so, she became afraid that the Count would eventually abandon her mother.

 

Once the only hold-on string was cut, it would be Marisa’s end.

 

‘No.’

 

In an instant, she had a hallucination as if her feet were being cut off. She didn’t have time to think what to say, but Elise hurriedly opened her mouth.

 

“I’m sorry.”

 

Elise began begging desperately. Crying mixed with her voice.

 

“My mother was forced to run away. Even though she hated this place, she didn’t mean to betray the Count. All because of me… to save me…”

 

Elise raised her head. Her eyes were blurred and she couldn’t see anything. So, she didn’t see Gerhard’s lips curl up.

 

“It’s my fault. So hold me accountable, and please save my mother.”

 

Tears dripped down her dry cheeks. Vanessa, who was watching the scene, spoke to Gerhard.

 

“Count, since the lady seems to have reflected a lot, how about giving her a chance?”

 

The target has already been caught on the board. All was according to plan.

 

Gerhard’s eyes shone cruelly. He opened his mouth slowly.

 

“If I save Marisa, what can you do for me?”

 

Elise’s spirit flashed. She instinctively realized that this was her last chance.

 

Elise wiped her tears and looked at Gerhard, she replied.

 

“Anything I can do.”

 

“Good.”

 

Gerhard, who licked his lips, announced as if he had been waiting.

 

“From now on, your name will be Elise Schuvan.”

 

It was an order, not a proposal, a solicitation, or a conciliation. Elise’s blue eyes trembled like waves.

 

‘Why all of a sudden…?’

 

The Count had not even acknowledged Elise as his own daughter in the past. Even when she lived at the Count’s house as a child, he had never felt any affection for her. But what was it now?

 

Elise was poorly educated, but she knew how difficult it was for an illegitimate child to be given a noble family name.

 

She just couldn’t figure out how things were going at the moment.

 

She clutched at the hem of her skirt in vague fear as Vanessa approached and whispered softly.

 

“Do not worry. The young lady just needs to do her duty as a lady of the Schuvan family.”

 

Then she grinned.

 

“Thanks to you, Lady Marisa will be provided with high-quality food, bedding, and a maid to attend to her. A competent doctor will examine her illness.”

 

It was the moment when Elise’s last hesitation, which she couldn’t bear to let go of, ended.

 

Elise tried to shake off the feeling that she was somehow stepping into a mire and bowed to thank her.

 

“Thank you for the opportunity.”

 

Vanessa tugged on the hanger and called for the maid.

 

“Take her and wash her clean.”

 



 

From the next day, rigorous training began. Before her full-blown class, Vanessa warned Elise.

 

“At nineteen, you are already an adult. The debutant of noble children is never past twenty at the latest. In other words, there is only about a year left. You’ll only be able to imitate aristocrats only after hard work.”

 

Elise also wanted to do well. So, she couldn’t eat or sleep properly and struggled to keep up with the class.

 

However, it was not easy for her as she was never properly educated.

 

Her writing was at a level that she had only learned from begging, and the manners and dances she first learned could not quickly become accustomed to her body.

 

“Your skills really suck.”

 

On the day Vanessa evaluated her with disdain, Gerhard, who heard the report, directly punished his illegitimate daughter, for her complacency and indolence.

 

Even after that, severe punishment often continued.

 

Until one day, Marisa, who was recuperating in the annexe, barely managed to bring her body together and knelt down in front of the Count.

 

She couldn’t bear to touch Elise’s calf, which was swollen and bleeding, and she shed tears. Then she put her hands together and prayed to Gerhard.

 

“Oh, Marisa.”

 

The Count showed his teeth and laughed. He lifted the chin of the earnestly pleading woman.

 

There was still something about the old mistress, still beautiful in her age, that stirred something inside him. Gerhard whispered with his lustful eyes shining.

 

“What would you do if there were still things you could do for your daughter?”

 

Then Marisa’s blue eyes, just like Elise’s, waved aimlessly.

 

But even for a moment, she painted a painless smile on her face that had just been crying.

 

Pretty enough to satisfy the Count.

In fact, there was a handful of lingering feelings that she couldn’t let go of. In the faded past, something like a moment’s affection.

 

However, the reason for that choice was definitely Elise.

 

If it had not been to protect her daughter, at least Marisa wouldn’t have burrowed into the Count’s arms with a fake smile.

 

Gerhard, looking down at Marisa, who had been requesting, turned his head to Elise.

 

“I’ll let this go for today, but I won’t forgive you if you act negligently in the future. Vanessa, take her away.”

 

The moment Gerhard gave the order and turned around, Marisa and Elise’s eyes met.

 

She said with her mouth in silence.

 

“I’m okay. Go ahead.”

 

Marissa smiled wistfully, beckoning her skinny hand to go. She had wet eyes like a cow about to be slaughtered.

 

In a way, it was natural for Elise to hate herself for her mother’s situation.

 



 

After that day, Elise never saw Marisa again. It was because she had to devote herself to the treatment of her mother’s illness, but in fact, it was just an excuse.

 

She even begged to let her see her mother. She just wanted to see her mother in good health.

 

But what was returned was a terrifying threat.

 

“Is your petty curiosity more important than Marisa’s health?”

 

“Why don’t you still know that you have to be good for Lady Marisa to feel comfortable? You are making the Count angry by unnecessarily offending him.”

 

That was how Elise couldn’t even dream of her own rebellion.

 

Even so, her heart was tender and timid, and as time went by, it only became more intimidated and smaller.

 

So, by the time the seasons had changed four times, there was a very calm and obedient lady left in the Count’s family.

 

Everything was as Gerhard Schuvan had planned.

 



 

In the war with the Kingdom of Helmut that lasted for nearly a year, the Nordrat Empire finally won.

 

At the news of victory outside the country, Inhel, the island, was excited with a festival-like atmosphere. However, Elise’s suffocating, dense, daily life went back to normal.

 

“Would you like to walk all the way over there?”

 

At Vanessa’s direction, Elise crossed the room. Her gait was as smooth as flowing water and graceful.

 

“This is great.”

 

At Vanessa’s praise, Elise managed to pull the corners of her lips into a smile. Even so, she couldn’t let go of her heart because she didn’t know when Vanessa would suddenly change and scold her.

 

“Come to think of it, I have good news for you, my lady.”

 

“Good news…?”

 

Elise asked, blinking her eyes. Anxious, she unwittingly wriggled her fingertips, and Vanessa slapped the back of her hand with a fan.

 

“How many times have I told you not to do that behaviour because it doesn’t look good?”

 

“I’m, I’m sorry.”

 

“If you continue to show such a pathetic appearance, I will have no choice but to report to the Count.”

 

“No, no! You can’t do that!”

 

Elise urgently grabbed Vanessa’s arm and begged.

 

“I will correct it. I will definitely fix it, so please don’t say anything to the Count. Please.”

 

“You call him that way again.”

 

At Vanessa’s strict point, Elise bowed her head. No matter how much she practiced, it was a title that never stuck in her mouth.

 

“My dear Father… Please don’t tell him.”

 

She corrected herself, barely squeezing out her voice.

 

Vanessa still didn’t like it, but kicked her tongue a few times and answered kindly.

 

“Let’s move on.”

 

“Thank you.”

 

Elise patted her chest, visibly relieved.

 

“What is the good news you mentioned?”

 

Then Vanessa gave a meaningful smile.

 

“The date for the lady’s debut date has been set. It’s a victory banquet next month.”

 

Surprised, Elise’s eyes widened. Her embarrassment was reflected on her face.

 

“So soon?”

 

“Not soon. You must have forgotten that you are already twenty years old.”

 

“But… I’m not ready yet.”

 

Then Vanessa laughed in vain and replied.

 

“Whether two or three years have passed, it will be the same for you. It’s better to be a year younger than that.”

 

Elise couldn’t even keep her mouth shut. Because it was all right.

 

She had to try for another year or two to make it like people who have lived as nobles all their lives.

 

It was also because she had recently joined and hadn’t been able to imitate them at all.

 

“Just in time, your dress is ready, so you might want to try it on.”

 

At Vanessa’s signal, the waiting maids rushed in.

 

Elise saw the white dress in their hands. It was a silhouette reminiscent of a wedding dress.

 

The maids moved in perfect order and put the dress on Elise’s body.

 

Elise should have been used to it by now, but she was still stiff while getting attended to by her maids.

 

When the dressing was finished, the maids withdrew.

 

Vanessa looked at Elise slowly and gave a small admiration.

 

“You look good.”

 

Elise didn’t know what she looked like. She just guessed that, judging from Vanessa’s reaction, it must have not been bad.

 

Vanessa said with a satisfied look on her face.

 

“Until your debut, it is going to be hectic. Lastly, there are many things to check, so be sure to follow along. Do you understand?”

 

Elise nodded, and Vanessa began instructing her maids.

 

‘I wonder if I can do well.’

 

Elise struggled to swallow her worries as she surrendered herself to the hands of her maids.

 



 

On the day of the victory banquet.

 

Vanessa sat on the side of the carriage, and the Count on the other side.

 

Because of that, Elise had no time to be comfortable while she was on her way to the Imperial Palace.

 

“You can do everything else as you’ve learned so far. However, you can’t help but improve your speaking skills. Try to refrain from speaking if possible.”

 

“Okay.”

 

Following Vanessa’s request, Gerhard instructed.

 

“If someone talks to you, give only necessary answers and moderately avoid embarrassing questions. I’ll take care of the rest. Do you understand?”

 

“Yes.”

 

Seeing that Gerhard did not let go of his bitter eyes in spite of his mild reply, Elise reluctantly added a little.

 

“…Father.”

 

Even though he had a disapproving look on his face, he didn’t reprimand. It was never out of generosity. It was because he didn’t have time for that.

 

“Let’s go in.”

 

Standing in front of the banquet hall with the Count, Elise took a deep breath silently.

 

The door opened slowly. At the same time, light poured from the ceiling. Elise blinked her eyes at the light from the chandelier twinkling like stars.

 

The extravagant and luxurious banquet hall was full of nobles dressed to the fullest.

 

Elise, trying not to show her nervousness, slowly stepped her foot into the banquet hall.

 

Here and there she heard gossip, but she pretended nothing was wrong.

 

Among the beasts seeking an opportunity to bite the neck of a weak one, she was just a prey, and that was all Elise could do.

 

“Follow me.”

 

Fortunately, the instinct of the weak moved swiftly. It wasn’t long before she realized her only way to survive in this grim place.

 

Quietly, calmly, unobtrusively. 

 

Gerhard gave her very practical advice in terms of semantics.

 

Elise followed the Count with a smile as if drawn, and when Vanessa winked at her, she greeted her with the exact manners she had been taught. 

 

Like a doll.

 

The noble ladies praised Elise as a truly virtuous lady, and the young noblemen expressed their liking and interest in her. 

 

Among them were men who asked to dance, but each time Vanessa stepped out and gracefully declined.

 

Because their goal was not these unnutritious chickens.

 

Gerhard and Vanessa constantly looked around and persistently checked the banquet hall.

 

The purpose of their attendance at this banquet was to find that one nobleman.

 



 

Cardale Vassenberg was leaning against the railing of the second-floor balcony. With a face full of boredom.

 

To a man who had been walking through the scene of a brutal slaughter not too long ago, everything here was slow and monotonous.

 

“I don’t know how long I have to watch this house play.”

 

Michael persuaded him with a puzzled expression.

 

“Since this is an event prepared by His Majesty to commemorate His Excellency’s victory, you must show sincerity.”

 

“Yes, I’m wasting my time doing that sincerity.”

 

Cardale was cynical.

 

He was in a very uncomfortable state. According to the original plan, he would have stopped by Dukedom first and returned only after dealing with the backlog.

 

The schedule to do so was completely changed due to the Emperor calling him using the victory banquet as an excuse.

 

The current situation couldn’t be pleasant for a man who hated wasting time.

 

His cold, contemptuous gaze was directed into the hall where the laughter never ceased.

 

“If I could, I would throw them straight into the battlefield.”

 

“You tell scary jokes.”

 

“Well. Does it sound like a joke?”

 

Cardale’s patience reached its limit. It was enough to waste precious time just for the sake of the Emperor’s face.

 

It was when he removed his body from the railing to leave this boring place.

 

A woman appeared in the banquet hall.

 

She immediately caught his attention. Cardale’s eyes narrowed slightly.


That woman.’

 

He wasn’t good at remembering people’s faces.

 

He didn’t have to. The nobles of Nordrat wanted to introduce themselves to Cardale Vassenberg.

 

So, this familiar face also meant that she was a necessary person for some reason.

 

But her identity never came to mind.

 

Cardale was upset by this first experience.

 

The lights were too bright and she blinked her eyes.

 

Blue.

 

He remembered, at last, the woman he had met the other day, with clear, innocent eyes.

 

Her slender little body, her round shoulders, her long neck and even her pure white nape.

 

And when Gerhard Schuvan appeared by his side, his intuition became reality.

 

Indeed, she was his illegitimate child.

 

“I guess I don’t know.”

 

Cardale muttered in a tone he couldn’t tell whether it was exclamation or sarcasm.

 

The only thing that changed was the shell around the woman. But like a caterpillar going through a chrysalis to a butterfly, she looked like a completely different person.

 

The hem of her white dress fluttered with each step of her dainty little foot.

 

Do not leave his side. Like someone who had been ordered, she followed the Count from behind.

 

Then, she gave a big smile to everyone she met.

 

Without knowing what eyes the men watching looked at her and commented on her.

 

‘No, maybe she knows.’

 

The pure white dress worn by the woman was quite elegant. Her clothes, which covered her whole body except for a few places, exposed the purpose of attending this event.

 

If you express it nobly, you’ll say it’s to find a good husband, and if you’re being rude, you’ll find a man who’ll pay a high price.

 

Cardale licked his lips.

 

“Your Excellency, would you like to go?”

 

“No.”

 

A cruel interest spread in the eyes fixed on the woman as if they were fixed.

 

“I will stay a little longer.”

 

He was tempted. Unbearably.

 

His deep crimson gaze tenaciously followed her small movements as if he were following his prey.

 

Then, perhaps feeling her gaze, the woman suddenly raised her head.

 

Up and down, their eyes met.

 

A look of bewilderment flashed across the woman’s face. 

 

Ah…

 

Her small, red lips parted behind her, letting out her faint, inaudible breath.

 

Cardale looked down at her without blinking an eye.

 

The woman blinked her eyes. Her eyes, like a blue lake, closed and open again and again, and then, in disbelief, they grew bigger.

 

‘Did you remember?’

 

Cardale was sure she recognized him. He was somehow satisfied.

 

But before he could question his bizarre satisfaction, the woman turned her head away.

 

‘Avoiding?’

 

Cardale twitched his eyebrows.

 

When the woman finally turned her body, the eyes that had gone dull for a moment, quickly sharpened their edge.

 

He didn’t even know who he was able to come here because of.

 

The corners of Cardale’s mouth twisted fiercely.

 

The glass in his hand was placed on the table with a loud sound.

 

Feeling anxious, Michael cautiously called him.

 

“Your Grace.”

 

“Don’t follow me, stand by.”

 

Cardale gave a brief command and straightened his body.

 

When he straightened his loose upper body, the uniform top made to fit his body swelled tightly.

 

His well-balanced body, forged through years of training and war, even exuded a sense of intimidation.

 

Cardale stood upright and stepped down the stairs covered with red carpet. The lights of the banquet hall sat down on the silver epaulettes that adorned the shoulders of the uniform and shimmered.

 

“I see the Duke.”

 

The nobles who saw him each bowed and greeted him, but the arrogant Duke did not even look at them.

 

Following the direction he was walking, people split into both sides and a path opened by itself.

 

It was an open secret among the nobility of Nordrat that the demanding and sensitive Duke Cardale Vassenberg was extremely averse to contact with others.

 

So the man walked out of the crowded banquet hall alone. His eyes were focused on only one place.

 

Count Schuvan, who discovered Cardale, was delighted. As if he had no intention of hiding the happy expression that appeared on his face, he quickly approached the Duke and bowed his head.

 

The thoughts of the fox-like person were clearly read, and Cardale laughed inwardly.

 

“Congratulations on your victory, Your Excellency.”

 

The woman, who had not been aware of the situation until then, flinched at her father’s voice and belatedly turned around.

 

A soft, thin fabric fluttered in sync with her movements.

 

The hem of the wide-spreading dress recoiled around her stretched thighs and then straightened back into the natural shape.

 

Cardale’s sluggish eyes scrutinized from the bottom up. Soon after, he faced the woman again.

 

Surprised face again. It was like before. The difference was that they were now close enough to be only a few steps apart.

 

Thanks to this, Cadale could see the woman’s hand shaking slightly. The fingers reflected through the lace gloves were white and thin enough to be visible.

 

“Elise, come here quickly.”

 

Elise. The name rolling on the tip of her tongue was overly soft and sweet, like bread with cream. To the extent that he wanted to squeeze it.

 

Her hesitant walking gesture was extremely cautious. This time she couldn’t avoid his gaze like a deer caught in a net. Cardale was not happy with that fact.

 

“Your Excellency, this is my daughter, Elise.”

 

The Count, who had introduced the woman, urged his daughter this time.

 

“Say your greetings to His Excellency, Duke Cardale of Vassenberg.”

 

The round, gentle eyes widened.

 

‘Did you not even know my identity?’ 

 

If anything, the acting was worthy of praise.

 

‘So what are you going to do now?’

 

The woman’s chest swelled slightly as if taking a deep breath. Her hesitation was only momentary, but Cardale was overcome with a strong urge to force open those dainty lips and hear her voice.

 

Fortunately, before his short patience ran out, Elise opened her mouth.

 

“It is an honour to meet you, Your Excellency. This is Elise Schuvan.”

 

A faint voice pierced his ears.

 

Yes, it seemed to be the kind of voice he had imagined.

 

A soft and clear sound that makes you want to crush it.

 

Cardale’s lips curled in satisfaction.

 



 

Elise, on the other hand, was completely out of her mind.

 

‘I thought maybe I could see you here, but…’

 

She clearly remembered the face of the young aristocrat who had shown her little kindness and mercy.

 

The shadow that covered her like a parasol, the texture of the earthen floor that he had unwittingly grasped, even the faint smell of his body.

 

She wanted to meet him again if she could meet you someday. She even wondered what he would look like now.

 

Could he have changed like herself? Or was he the same as a year ago?

 

However, when Elise happened to make eye contact with the man on the second floor, she was taken aback. It was because she had never dreamed that he was looking down on her.

 

Feeling ashamed for not knowing the reason, Elise avoided his gaze as a reflex reaction.

 

Her face flushed as she realized her foolish behaviour. She turned away to hide her flushed cheeks, but unlike before, she could hardly concentrate on the Count’s words.

 

The crimson-coloured eyes, which looked directly at her through his slightly lowered eyes, kept coming to mind. As if she had branded it in her head.

 

But when did he come down? The man was standing.

 

In front of her, as if to show off.

 

‘I didn’t mean to ignore you, but did you misunderstand?’

 

The man had such a cold face that she didn’t even dare to speak. Even so, his eyes staring at her were intense enough to sting, and she couldn’t figure out why.

 

“Greetings. His Excellency, Duke Cardale of Vassenberg.”

 

For an instant, Elise’s eyes became distant, like someone who had seen the sun with her bare eyes.

 

She guessed he was noble, but he was much more than she expected. He was a person as high as the sun.

 

She didn’t even know in what spirit she was greeting him. She just uttered her learned words like a parrot, bending her legs together as she had practised hundreds or thousands of times.

 

However, when she raised her head again, the corner of the Duke’s mouth was slightly raised, and Elise swept her heart.

 

It was because the man did not seem to take issue with her earlier rudeness.

 

He slowly turned his head to the Count and opened his mouth.

 

“Your daughter seems to have never been seen before.”

 

It was lower and deeper than the voice in her memory. Elise pressed her hand against her chest without realizing it.

 

“She was sick because her body was weak, so she couldn’t socialize during that time.”

 

Elise held her breath while carefully examining the man’s expression.

 

‘I hope you don’t know who I am.’

 

She wished he hadn’t recognized her.

 

The fact that until just a few years ago she was a commoner girl rolling around the slums. The pitiful past of begging for mercy. She struggled to contain the shabby true face that would be revealed if only one layer of wrapping around her was removed.

 

She wished he never knew.

 

“Of course, she is very healthy now.”

 

The Count added coldly, and the Duke nodded his head wordlessly.

 

‘Fortunately, I don’t think he noticed.’

 

Just as Elise was feeling a little relieved, the song just changed. It was a dance song with a soft melody.

 

It was also famous as the debutante dance performed by a young lady when attending a banquet for the first time.

The Count opened his mouth without missing the golden
opportunity that came to him.
“Your Grace, unfortunately, Elise has not been able to dance
yet.”
It was such a blatant way of speaking that the aristocrats
who listened to the conversation with their ears pricked up
were surprised.
This was no different from openly begging for a dance.
Considering his daughter’s reputation, that was something
he couldn’t bear to say.
They heard that she was brought in as an adopted daughter
from a distant place.
Sure enough, the nobles whispered as they watched the
young woman being used by the Count’s greed. A look of
contempt and sympathy pierced Elise like an ice spear.
“Poorly.”
Everyone nodded and clicked their tongues at someone’s
whispered words.
It was none other than the Duke of Cardale Vassenberg.
He was too big a deal to be the debutant dance partner of
the only adopted Lady.
Even more so, wasn’t he a man who hated contact with
others to the extent that he was selective?
Soon, it was good to see her crying at the cold rejection.
And for a while, the socialites will be gossiping about her
story.
The nobles waited silently, watching the Duke’s reaction.
Some feel a low level of relief that they are not the target of
ridicule, some seek an opportunity to take the side of a
woman, and some just show an interest in the event.
Elise was also unaware of the situation she was in.
Thrown onto the stage she didn’t want to be, she tried to
adjust her expression as if nothing was wrong. But her
frightened heart was beating terribly.
Elise gathered her courage and examined Cardale’s face.
It was a short time, but the face with a light smile had
turned expressionless. The way he looked at her was
indifferent.
It was only for a moment, but the face with a faint smile had
turned expressionless. The way he looked at her was so dry.
Obvious indifference – was what the people around thought.
‘What do I do?’
Judging from the occasional remark, the Duke had not yet
danced with anyone at this banquet.
So there was no way he would do the first dance with her
insignificant self. Elise couldn’t understand why Count
Schuvan had made such a rude request.
‘He was only asked to dance with someone like me… I’m
sure he’ll get angry.’
Rejection was natural, and after that was the problem. Elise
lowered her head, prepared for the accusations to fall upon
her.
Fearing that her dress would wrinkle, she couldn’t even hold
the hem of her skirt, so instead, she held her hands tightly
together.
Even so, she couldn’t hide the slight trembling of her hands.
She finally couldn’t stand it and closed her eyes tightly. It
was like she was awaiting her sentencing.
“Lady Elise.”
Her tense body shrank at the sound of her name being
called.
“Open your eyes.”
It was a natural voice, unique to those who were familiar
with the top. Elise opened her eyes after much hesitation.
The Duke’s face was right in front of her nose.
“Will you give me the honour of your first dance?”
Elise’s lips parted at his unexpected reply.
She looked down at the man’s outstretched hand. It was like
a lie. It was such an unrealistic scene.
But by itself, her arm moved.
“…Ah!”
Elise belatedly flinched at the body temperature of his
fingertips. However, the Duke’s hand remained intact. His
gaze piercingly stared at her.
‘The Duke asked me to dance.’
Elise managed to hold on to her spirit, repeating only one of
the facts. She then traced her memory of when she was
learning to dance. The answer to accepting the dance her
partner asked for…
“I will be happy to do so.”
Again she carefully raised her hand. The man’s large hand
squeezed hers. Elise was a little surprised by his
unexpectedly high body temperature.
‘Even with such a cold face… Your hands are warm.’
She thought as she glanced at the man’s face, still unable to
read his thoughts.
Meanwhile, as the two started walking hand in hand, the
nobles couldn’t hide their shocked faces.
That the Duke of Cardale asked a woman who had just
turned her face into society to dance? It was even the first
dance.
It was a scene that was hard to believe even after seeing it
in person.
“Oh, my God. Can you tell me my eyes are still fine?”
“This is what I wanted to ask you. Fortunately, my wife and
my eyes seem to be fine.”
The banquet hall was shaken by an unexpected incident.
The hall was in an uproar with conversation pouring in here
and there.
“I don’t know how long it’s been since I’ve seen the Duke
dance.”
“The last outing banquet was the last, maybe? At that time,
His Highness and the Princess…”
Cardale left behind the curious glances and led Elise to the
centre floor of the banquet hall.
Elise was too nervous to notice her surroundings at all, but
before she knew it, the centre of the hall was empty except
for the two of them.
The two faced each other. Cardale shrewdly picked up the
weak sound of the woman taking a deep breath with her
head slightly bowed.
He wrapped his hands around Elise’s waist. His brows
furrowed slightly as he felt a thin waist that didn’t even look
like a handful.
He thought she was better than before, but she was still
skinny. She was so weak that it was irritating.
The small body was pulled lightly by Cardale’s slight pull.
As their bodies touched, Elise flinched and unconsciously
tried to step back from him. That small movement caused a
subtle annoyance.
Cardale wrapped his arms around her waist tighter and said,
“Stay still.”
The man’s tone, which is still familiar to the battlefield, was
imbued with a commanding tone.
And the tone was very similar to that of Count Schuvan or
Vanessa when they were disciplining Elise.
Elise’s body, which had otherwise been stiff from tension,
became stiffer.
Cardale belatedly recognized that his first words were not
very good.
But it is what it is. It was the woman’s side who begged for
the dance. Although he responded with an impulsive
interest, he did not have the consideration to even look into
her mood.
He was just annoyed at the woman who was so intimidated
that she couldn’t make eye contact with him.
“Don’t be nervous.”
Her small, rounded shoulders lifted and the woman raised
her head. She looked up at him with soft, clear blue eyes
and pursed her lips.
“I’m afraid I might make a mistake.”
Cardale let out a short laugh.
“You worry about everything. Nothing will happen if you
make a few mistakes.”
“But if I step on you…”
“I don’t think it’ll tickle even if you step on me as hard as
you can.”
Embarrassed, the tips of Elise’s ears turned red.
Cardale leaned over and brought his face closer. His face
was reflected in the blue eyes that seemed to fill up quickly
if his lips touched hers. He liked the eyes that contained
only him.
“Are you ready?”
Elise, who had licked her lips, finally nodded her head.
“…Please take good care of me.”
Cardale began to move, slowly leading her.
“Focus only on me. I’ll take care of the rest.”
Even if he didn’t bother to say it, Elise would have had no
choice but to do so.
All of her attention was focused on the man in front of her.
She could feel the touch of their clasped hands, the
movement of his arms around her waist, his firm body that
brushed lightly with each move, and the heavy body scent
that moistened her nasal passages with every movement.
She couldn’t do anything other than entrust her body to him
because it was so overwhelming just to accept the shared
sensation.
After a few phrases of the soft melody flowed, the man’s lips
opened.
“You’ve exaggerated.”
What? Elise was taken aback by his incomprehensible
words.
Instead of explaining, Cardale tugged at her waist to the
tune of the music.
“We are in perfect harmony.”
The bodies of the two people, who were slightly separated,
were tightly pressed together. Elise could even feel the
movement of the densely packed muscles. Her face
instantly heated up.
Cardale’s lips loosened. It was funny how she reacted to the
touch. The fact that she was so weak that she was
defenceless, and the foolish naivety that revealed her
thoughts were laughable.
Little by little, mistakes came from Elise, who lost her
composure. Several times her foot got twisted in the hem of
her dress.
But Cardale concealed her mistakes, leading her with his
graceful movements without the slightest distraction of
hers.
As the song entered the climax section, the tempo
increased by one beat. The heat gradually began to mix
with the dance.
Elise frantically stepped, turned, let go of his hand, and
grabbed him repeatedly as Cardale led her.
How much time has passed?
The dance was finally over.
The two stood facing each other and said greetings. Elise
managed to capture her expression, but the tips of her
fingers holding the hem of her dress were trembling faintly.
The sound of applause that started somewhere soon spread
throughout the banquet hall.
Elise came out of the floor as if she were running away,
leaving behind the exclamation and admiration. She
couldn’t even look at the Duke’s face.
Even when she practised, it wasn’t a dance that was so
intense, but it was strangely short of breath.
‘It’s all right. It ended well.’
Elise pressed down on her pounding heart and teased her to
stop her feet. For some reason, she wanted to hide
somewhere out of sight.
Blue eyes shimmering with agitation moved in search of the
Count. If the Count was not in the hall, she thought, she
should at least ask Vanessa for permission to rest.
It was at this time that Elise trotted her way, turning her
gaze to and fro as she lost her way.
Something caught on her ankle suddenly.
“Ah…!”
Before she knew it, her body tilted out of balance

“What happened?”

 

It was a question asked knowingly, even though they already knew what had happened.

 

“Ah, there was a disrespectful child who dared to disregard the authority of the royal family. I was in the middle of teaching proper etiquette.”

 

Theresia smiled broadly and gave an answer completely different from the truth.

 

‘She’s also abominable.’ Cardale hid the ridicule leaking out of him, and naturally snatched the glass from the Princess.

 

Then he said, briefly glancing at the woman, who was still trembling without raising her head.

 

“There seems to be no need to tarnish Your Highness the Princess’s hands further.”

 

“Are you concerned about this child?”

 

Her tone was gentle, but her eyes were as cunning as a snake. No matter what he answered, it was a trap-like question that would bring painful results to Elise Schuvan.

 

Knowing that, Cardale raised his eyebrows and naturally turned the conversation to Theresia as he shot an arrow towards her.

 

“It’s been a long time since the Emperor had a grand banquet, so it would be troublesome if it were ruined.”

 

It was a gentle but firm remark.

 

In fact, the atmosphere at the banquet hall was cold, as if it had never been fun. A look of discomfort was evident in the faces of the aristocrats.

 

In addition, Cardale Vassenberg, a powerful member of the aristocracy, even stepped forward.

 

Theresia realised it was time for her to take a step back.

 

‘This should have been enough warning.’

 

Theresia’s cold gaze turned to Elise.

 

Arrogant.

 

She wanted to slap the cheek of the woman. The same goes for Gerhard Schuvan, who tried to hit the back of the head while avoiding eyes.

 

‘There are many ways to retaliate anyway.’

 

There were various ways to make her regret her mistake.

 

Tereshia spat out the words.

 

“You may stand up now.”

 

“T-Thank you, Your Highness, the Princess.”

 

Even the pathetic and trembling voice was unpleasant. Cardale felt irritated by the sarcastic laughter and whispers that seemed to pour out.

 

‘I’m not the person who would pass on that, though.’

 

Theresia glanced at Cardale’s expression. He still had a cold, indifferent face.

 

But at least it was true that this little girl had piqued the curiosity of Cardale Vassenberg. Seeing how he listened to Count Schuvan’s unreasonable request.

 

‘It doesn’t matter. She just needs to go unnoticed again.’

 

Theresia took her eyes off Elise, hiding her annoyed and displeased judgment. As if right, she put her hand on Cardale’s arm and looked at him.

 

“You won’t refuse an escort since you’ve done a favour, right?”

 

“I don’t understand how seeking advice considering Her Highness’ reputation became a favour.”

 

“You’re not going to be too cold, are you?”

 

Theresia subtly leaned against him, causing a slight twitch in Cardale’s brow due to displeasure.

 

If the attendant hadn’t found them just in time, he would have managed to push the Princess away in front of people.

 

The attendant politely bowed to him.

 

“I’m sorry, Your Excellency the Duke. His Majesty the Emperor wants to meet with you for a while.”

 

It was as expected. Despite hosting a banquet in his honour, the Emperor had yet to reveal himself.

 

It wasn’t hard to guess what the snarky Emperor was doing all this time.

 

The Empire received a huge war reward from Helmut for this victory. It was right to share the victory evenly, but the Emperor was greedy.

 

However, if he had reduced the rewards too much, it would have given rise to various rumours and criticism. As the Emperor, he had no choice but to be concerned.

 

His actions were so predictable that it was laughable.

 

“There’s a message for Her Highness the Princess, requesting her presence.”

 

“Perfect. We can go together then.”

 

When Theresia tightened her hand on Cardale’s arm, his eyes narrowed slightly.

 

It was irritating and bothersome.

 

Didn’t she know that he became more repulsed each time she clung to him?

 

Perhaps she knew but pretended not to.

 

Cardale thought things wouldn’t have become so unpleasant if she had simply clung to him and begged.

 

Like that woman, Elise Schuvan. 

 

Even though the Princess had left long ago, the woman remained in the same spot.

 

Her desolate figure, standing there as if unsure of what to do, wasn’t entirely unappealing. Her ocean-coloured eyes, on the verge of releasing tears, somehow subdued the anger within him.

 

He nodded at the attendant.

 

“Lead the way.”

 

Cardale’s senses captured every moment of the woman’s presence until the very last moment when he passed by her side.

 

Her provocative figure, the barely audible sound of her shallow breaths, and even the faint scent of her soft skin amidst the strong smell of alcohol.

 

Tenacious and greedy.

 



 

When Theresia gestured with her eyes, the attendant quickly caught on to the Princess’ request and hesitated momentarily.

 

The distance between them and the attendant quickly grew. Theresia opened her mouth with a satisfied expression.

 

“Lord Cardale.”

 

“Duke Vassenberg. Do I still need to correct the title?”

 

“Don’t be too hard between us.”

 

“Her Highness, The Princess and I are not related.”

 

Although the reply did not give even a hint of room, Theresia did not give up. It wasn’t surprising. After all, Cardale Vassenberg had always been like this.

 

Theresia spoke again to the man, who just walked away without looking at her.

 

“And what is Her Highness, The Princess? When was the last time I gave permission for my name? Just call me Theresia.”

 

This time he didn’t even respond. His lips, tightly pressed together, did not budge, and his face, as always expressionless, was indifferent.

 

Rather than pointing out his rudeness and asking for an apology, she found herself strangely excited by his cold and refined appearance.

 

Theresia subtly leaned more on the Duke, who was escorting her, finding satisfaction in this for now.

 

After all, there had never been and never will be, a woman as close to Cardale Vassenberg as she was.

 



 

Before long, they arrived in front of the room where the Emperor awaited. It was a private lounge not far from the banquet hall reserved for the nobility.

 

Immediately after the attendant informed, the Emperor’s order fell.

 

“You may go in.”

 

The guarding knights opened the door on both sides.

 

Emperor Johann von Oldenhilt glanced at the Duke as he entered with his daughter and reflected momentarily.

 

“Welcome, Duke.”

 

“I have heard that you have something to discuss.”

 

“Please, have a seat. The tea from Belvra that arrived recently is exceptional.”

 

Despite the Emperor personally recommending the tea, Cardale didn’t even flinch. He responded curtly.

 

“If it’s not an important matter, I will take my leave. There are pressing matters in my family that need attending.”

 

“Oh, it seems that the Duke is quite uncomfortable. You have become even stiffer than before.”

 

“It’s because I have been on the battlefield until recently. I am not accustomed to the refined, nobility speech of Inghel.”

 

It was an obvious and somewhat disrespectful sarcasm. However, rather than getting angry, Johann gently tried to ease him.

 

“It will only take a moment.”

 

Johann carefully seated Cardale before proceeding.

 

“Duke, you have endured much. I appreciate the effort and dedication you have shown for the glory of Nodrat.”

 

The Emperor’s praise continued, but Cardale offered no more than a customary response. He didn’t even engage in the expected formalities, as he was neither in a good mood nor intending to hide it. His personality was not the best.

 

The Emperor, sensing the futility of a meaningless prelude, went straight to the point.

 

“We intend to provide appropriate compensation for your contributions.”

 

Johann paused for a moment.

 

Cardale saw no need to burden the Emperor with unnecessary words. Whether it was land, wealth, titles, or anything else offered, they were useless to him.

 

The Barony of Brellion, his domain, was already vast enough to encompass a significant portion of the southeastern region of the Nodrat Empire. The fertile plains within the domain were known as one of the Empire’s most productive agricultural areas, responsible for a significant portion of the Empire’s food supply.

 

Moreover, by leveraging its geographical advantage, Brellion had established itself as a dominant force in inter-regional trade, firmly grasping control over the Empire’s commercial territory. The accumulated wealth exceeded that of the Oldenhilt royal family.

 

With such formidable military and economic power, they were already capable of declaring independence as a sovereign nation. Titles and rewards from the Emperor had long lost their meaning.

 

From Cardale’s perspective, the meeting with Johann was merely a futile waste of time.

 

“As a token of recognition for your contributions…”

 

“It’s unnecessary.”

 

Cardale flatly rejected the offer.

 

“There was no need for this in the first place. The grand contract between the Oldenhilt royal family and the House of Vassenberg for the glory of Nodrat has already been extinguished, considering I had to answer the Emperor’s call and go to the battlefield.”

 

The reason for that was the blood covenant between the former Emperor and the House of Vassenberg.

 

While the House of Vassenberg had played a crucial role in establishing the Nodrat Empire with their abilities, the Emperor had always feared them. To quell that fear, numerous privileges were granted, but they were also bound by ancient magic.

 

[The House of Vassenberg shall not harm the Oldenhilts. Furthermore, once in a generation, when the Oldenhilts require the power of the House of Vassenberg, they must answer.]

Vassenberg’s power referred to their formidable combat abilities. Their strength, flowing through their bloodline, set them apart from ordinary humans. From exceptional senses and powerful physical abilities to astonishing regenerative powers and overwhelming combat prowess, they were unmatched with any weapon in hand.

 

Simply put, the House of Oldenhilt obtained a stable reign at the cost of bowing its pride to Vassenberg. Now, with Cardale’s presence, the Emperor had exhausted the opportunity for a blood covenant given to him.

 

Therefore, from the perspective of the royal family, there was no choice but to rely solely on Cardale’s goodwill until a new successor from Vassenberg could take his place as the Duke.

 

That was why the Emperor needed to win the Duke’s favour, no matter what.

 

“Still, how can we belittle the Duke’s efforts with a mere contract?”

 

“Regardless of Your Majesty’s thoughts, it doesn’t matter. The fact that my obligations are fulfilled is what’s important.”

 

“Haha, even if you don’t act so rigidly….”

 

The Emperor laughed like a kind grandfather, but Cardale knew well that the Emperor concealed a viper-like intention beneath that amiable facade.

 

With an expressionless face, Cardale asked.

 

“Do you have anything else to say?”

 

Johann cleared his throat slightly, feeling defeated. He shifted his gaze to his beloved daughter, Theresia, who looked eagerly at her father.

 

After carefully choosing his words, Johann finally spoke up. 

 

“Now that the war is over, wouldn’t the Duke also need a family?”

 

Cardale let out a laugh, seemingly astonished.

 

Although his behaviour in front of the Emperor seemed excessively arrogant, no one dared to point it out. It was more accurate to say that he was simply incapable.

 

The Duke questioned in a chilly voice.

 

“Are you considering playing the mediator?”

 

“There’s no harm in it. It’s for the sake of my one and only daughter.”

 

A blush appeared on Theresia’s face. She looked at the Duke beside her, her eyes filled with anticipation.

 

But Cardale only sent a cold, disdainful gaze towards the Emperor, who was trying to arrange a marriage for his daughter.

 

“You don’t even think about concealing it.”

 

“No matter how I go about it, the Duke wouldn’t be oblivious.”

 

“So, are you planning to reveal your proposal openly?”

 

“I’m merely accommodating the Duke’s preferences.”

 

Having gained much in his life, Johann did not easily trust people. He also believed that the Duke belonged to a similar category as himself.

 

The Emperor knew from experience that it was easier to deal with negotiations and trade with the Duke rather than trying to win his heart. However, there was one thing the Emperor overlooked: the conditions he offered were of no interest to Cardale.

 

“I have no intention of getting married. And even if I did, it wouldn’t be with Her Highness the Princess.”

 

At the face of the Duke’s blunt rejection, Theresia’s face turned red with embarrassment.

 

“As far as I know, the Duke has no fiancee or any separate romantic relationship. And as a princess, she would not be lacking as a Duke’s wife.”

 

The Emperor presented his case, citing various reasons, in an attempt to persuade Cardale.

 

“It would grant both of you the right to succeed to the throne if you marry Theresia. As a Duke, I believe it is not a bad offer.”

 

“It’s ridiculous.”

 

The Emperor’s eyebrows twitched.

 

“I have never understood why the Oldenhilts always pursue such insatiable ambitions when it comes to Vassenbergs.”

 

Cardale did not hide his mockery anymore.

 

“There have been countless attempts by previous Emperors to unite Vassenberg and Oldenhilt through marriage. How many of them do you think were successful?”

 

“….”

 

“How many of them resulted in success?”

 

Cardale no longer concealed his contemptuous laughter.

 

“None. Not a single one.”

 

Many Emperors had coveted Vassenberg’s power, attempting to subjugate them or bind them through blood ties. But none had succeeded.

 

“It will be the same this time.”

 

And in the future as well.

 

Cardale spoke in a cold tone, rising from his seat.

 

“In that case, calculations must be perfect, shouldn’t they, Duke Vassenberg?”

 

Upon Johann’s words, Cardale stopped in his tracks and turned to the Emperor.

 

“What do you mean?”

 

Johann rose from his seat, following Cardale. Due to the height difference, he had to look up at the Duke.

 

“You must have heard about it too. Among the advanced weapons General Helmut used, some were smuggled out from Nodrat.”

 

“Didn’t we already identify and punish those involved?”

 

In the first place, the distribution of weapons was almost monopolised by the royal family. It was the responsibility of the royal family that it had not been properly managed.

 

“Besides, weapon smuggling is not under my jurisdiction. This issue would be better addressed to His Highness, the Crown Prince.”

 

Cardale firmly drew the line, reminding the Emperor and the Crown Prince that they bore responsibility.

 

“That’s right.”

 

Emperor Johann casually nodded in agreement.

 

“But besides that, there have been statements about individuals who provided information to Helmut regarding Nodrat and engaged in treasonous acts. Although Helmut may have been defeated, the Empire’s traitors seem to have survived unscathed.”

 

Johann got to the real point, his expression filled with worry.

 

“Considering that these individuals might be lurking and plotting their next moves, I have been unable to sleep peacefully lately.”

 

Cardale noticed the Emperor’s attempts to restrain him, and his expression turned cold.

 

“As the Duke recalls, my condition for the covenant was to eliminate the threat of war originating from Helmut completely.”

 

Johann took out their covenant document. Cardale’s signature on the parchment still radiated a blue magical aura.

 

It was evidence that the covenant was still valid.

 

In a low voice, Cardale asked, “Should I erase Helmut from the map entirely then?”

 

“No, that’s not necessary. Occupying the barren territories of Helmut would serve no purpose. It would only complicate matters.”

 

The Emperor waved his hand, looking puzzled, and continued speaking.

 

“Instead, I request that you uncover the rebels who pose a threat to Nodrat’s security. Not a single one should be spared.”

 

It was not an entirely unreasonable demand. Even to conclude the covenant, any potential sparks of threat had to be eliminated.

 

However, that made Cardale trust the Emperor even less. After all, he was someone who harboured dozens of vipers within him.

 

Cardale asked straightforwardly, “Is that all you desire?”

 

“Hahaha! Of course.”

 

Johann laughed heartily and then added while studying Cardale’s expression.

 

“I suppose we will be able to see the Duke frequently at this year’s Imperial events. If you are to track down the rebels, you will have to stay in Inghel for a while.”

 

“Oh, how fortunate.”

 

Theresia chimed in quickly.

 

“While you’re in Inghel, you could also attend social events occasionally, couldn’t you?”

 

That’s what it came down to in the end.

 

Cardale chuckled inwardly. He was tempted to applaud the Emperor’s persistence in creating opportunities to entangle him with the Princess.

 

“By the way, you are aware that there will be an exhibition showcasing exotic fauna in a few days, right? How about you, Duke, taking charge of my escort then?”

 

“I will decline.”

 

Cardale flatly refused without any room for negotiation. Theresia’s face stiffened at his resolute rejection.

 

Cardale didn’t even spare her a glance and spoke to the Emperor.

 

“The execution of the covenant will proceed without any issues. As the investigation progresses, I will inform you. I will take my leave now.”

 

“Just a moment, Lord Cardale!”

 

Theresia hurriedly grabbed his arm, but he didn’t give her a second glance as he walked out of the room.

 

“Cardale!”

 

Theresia’s desperate voice echoed through the corridor as she followed him. Cardale disregarded her.

 

Theresia even tried to block his path by throwing her arms around him from behind, an action totally inappropriate for a Princess.

 

“Is it that difficult to serve as my escort? After all, you don’t have another partner, do you?”

 

She sent him a gaze filled with resentment as she grumbled.

 

“You can’t just draw a clear line like that. When we spend time together, our hearts may come to understand each other…”

 

“I’ve already said it.”

 

Cardale retorted in an indifferent tone.

 

“I have no intention of marrying Your Highness.”

 

“Why am I not good enough?”

 

Finally losing her composure, Theresia shouted at the emotionless man before her.

 

“I am a Princess! With my mother, the Empress, absent, I am the most noble woman in this Empire. Is there another woman who suits you better than me?”

 

“Enough.”

 

Cardale turned his head with a disgusted expression. However, Theresia didn’t back down.

 

She wrapped her arms around him from behind.

 

“You know it, too. I have loved you sincerely from the past until now. I truly-“

 

Cardale forcibly removed her arms from his body.

 

Theresia looked at him with a resentful gaze, wrapping her arms around herself.

 

“Your Highness.”

 

When Cardale’s low voice pierced her ears, Theresia flinched. It was an eerily chilling voice that sent shivers down her spine.

 

“If your intention was to anger me, you have succeeded. However, it would be best to stop at this point.”

 

His low voice carried an aura of danger.

 

“My patience is wearing thin. If I keep witnessing Your Highness’s conduct, who knows what I might do?”

Theresia wore an expression of disbelief.

 

“Are you… threatening me right now?”

 

“I am simply speaking because Her Highness seems to not understand my words.”

 

“Lord Cardale!”

 

“How many more times must I remind you that I am Duke Vassenberg? At this point, Oldenhilt’s reputation for being incomprehensible seems well-deserved.”

 

Theresia’s face twisted, but she quickly regained her composure and smiled as if nothing had happened.

 

If it were someone else, she would have retaliated against their arrogance, charging them with the crime of insulting the nobility. But Cardale Vassenberg was always an exception in Theresia’s eyes. He was a man who held enough value.

 

“Since I was the one who was rude to you first, let’s just overlook it for now.”

 

“Well, that’s quite a fortunate turn of events.”

 

Cardale said, one corner of his mouth twitching.

 

“I would be even more grateful if you could ensure we won’t have any future encounters.”

 

With impeccable manners that contradicted his sarcastic tone, Cardale bid farewell to Theresia and left the hallway.

 

“…Just you wait, and watch.”

 

Left alone, the Princess clenched her fist tightly and glared at the path where the Duke had departed. Her dark grey eyes gleamed with desire and madness.

 

“I will definitely have you in my hands.”

 

It was only a matter of time. Eventually, Cardale Vassenberg would marry her.

 

Theresia believed in her ability to make it happen.

 



 

Cardale returned to the banquet hall and silently surveyed the surroundings. He thoroughly scanned every corner of the venue with a sharp gaze, but there was no sign of her.

 

Since her dress was in a mess, her only choice was to return to the Count’s residence. But he didn’t know that.

 

All he knew was that he felt frustrated because the woman had disappeared right before his eyes.

 

Whether this or that, everything was simply irritating. It was when Cardale impatiently brushed his hair aside.

 

“Greetings, Your Grace”

 

A woman politely spoke, leaving no room for error.

 

Cardale recognised her as the one who had been with Count Schuvan and Elise.

 

“Are you Count Schuvan’s aide?”

 

“It is an honour that you remember me. I am Vanessa Lockseed. I serve as Count Schuvan’s close advisor.”

 

“Just as you say, your master is only the Count. Considering that you left the lady with the Count’s last name in distress, it speaks volumes.”

 

Although his words poked at Gerhard and Vanessa’s behaviour, she didn’t flinch and continued with her intended message.

 

“I genuinely appreciate Your Excellency’s kindness and rescue of the young lady in an unavoidable situation.”

 

“Unavoidable, huh…”

 

The corners of the man’s mouth twitched. He held back a chilling laughter and asked.

 

“You didn’t come here just to say those flattering words, did you?”

 

“I would never dare to do such a thing. I was merely trying to express my gratitude for Your Excellency’s kindness and generosity.”

 

“Your skill in disguising your mistakes is remarkable. It almost makes me admire your audacity.” 

 

“If I have caused any misunderstanding, it is my fault. Please, accept my apologies and let go of any resentment.” 

 

Vanessa responded, maintaining her composure.

 

Growing weary of the wordplay, Cardale asked directly.

 

“So, what is it that you want?”

 

Ignoring his feigned ignorance, Vanessa asked once again.

 

“I merely wanted to express my gratitude for Your Grace’s kindness and generosity.”

 

“Then, what do you want?”

 

Without acknowledging what she said, he asked again.

 

Numerous people had approached him, each desiring something that belonged to the Vassenberg family.

 

So, no matter how much Vanessa tried to hide her intentions, it seemed pathetic to Cardale.

 

“If you’re not going to speak, leave.”

 

“I never intended to insult Your Excellency. Please forgive me if I have caused any misunderstandings.”

 

Only after Vanessa bowed and apologised did she bring up the main topic.

 

“I request an opportunity to repay Your Excellency’s kindness. It would bring me great pleasure if you could spare some of your precious time.”

 

The dinner was just an excuse. There was a separate purpose.

 

Cardale knew that Gerhard Schuvan was expanding his textile business and seeking investment from various sources.

 

He also knew that Vanessa desired to conduct business with the trading company owned by the Vassenberg family.

 

‘Using today’s events as an opportunity to establish connections…’

 

To think that Gerhard considered his illegitimate daughter to be of that value was equally amusing and insulting.

 

As Cardale’s annoyance reached its peak, he asked straightforwardly.

 

“What else?”

 

“And one more thing.”

 

As if anticipating his refusal, Vanessa quickly spoke up.

 

“The young lady asked me to deliver a message to Your Excellency.”

 

Vanessa paused for a moment and quickly assessed the Duke’s reaction.

 

There was no response, but he didn’t interrupt. His expressionless face remained unchanged, but it was evident that he was listening to her words.

 

“She expressed her gratitude for your assistance and apologised for not being able to meet you in person to thank you.”

 

The Duke lowered his gaze momentarily and fell silent. His pensive face seemed to be gauging and calculating something.

 

Vanessa blinked, waiting for the Duke’s response.

 

“How interesting.”

 

Sarcastic reply, causing Vanessa to bite her lip in response.

 

Could it be a failure? Considering today’s events, it wasn’t entirely impossible. She would have to seize the next opportunity…

 

“If she is truly sorry, she can come find me in person.”

 

“Pardon?” 

 

Vanessa asked in astonishment, her face showing doubt as if questioning her own ears.

 

“I will decide after that whether or not to meet with the Count.”

 

Cardale declared, leaving with a concise statement, exiting the place.

 

Vanessa, who stood there blankly for a moment, soon came to her senses.

 

She had to hurry back and tell the Count about this news.

 



 

Gerhard and Elise had already returned to the mansion.

 

Throughout the carriage ride, Elise had tried her best to read the Count’s mind.

 

She caused such a commotion at the banquet hall of the Imperial Palace that it was strange that she hadn’t been dragged away and beaten.

 

However, the Count remained silent. The overwhelming silence that filled the carriage made Elise even more apprehensive.

 

Because of that, Elise had to swallow her anxiety by looking down at the messy hem of her dress.

 

But even upon arriving at the mansion, nothing happened. The Count briefly responded to her trembling greeting and quickly ascended the stairs.

 

Returning to their bedroom, the tension in Elise’s body dissipated, replaced by exhaustion.

 

Taking off her soiled clothes and soaking her weary body in hot water, Elise closed her eyes.

 

It has been an excruciatingly long day for her. She was even amazed at how she could endure so much in a day.

 

Even the usually uncomfortable touches of the maids felt indifferent in the face of her fatigue. Elise fell into a deep sleep.

 

Without knowing at all what kind of upheaval the coincidence of the day will bring to her life.

 



 

Michael Walter, an aide to Viscount Vassenberg, had a lot on his plate. Naturally, it was due to his master.

 

Amidst the stressed and overworked staff, Michael had managed to hold his ground smoothly, thanks to his military background and endurance honed through rigorous training. 

 

With his naturally strong bones and enduring the long training process, his stamina was bound to be better than others.

 

And, of course, the work was driven by him, who was good at his job.

 

For instance, even during the week-long victory celebration, he found himself carrying stacks of paperwork and heading to the Duke’s office.

 

As always, Michael knocked twice and quietly entered. Then, he couldn’t help but admire the scene before him.

 

He used to fall into the illusion that he witnessed a famous painting every morning when he came here, but today there was no room for it.

 

A man was sitting with his back to a large window. 

 

A man who was the owner of the rich Brellion estate and his master.

 

The man, who must have gone to bed later than Michael himself yesterday, was perfect without the slightest disturbance.

 

‘Did he even go to sleep?’

 

Michael casually pushed the arising question out of his mind. He then neatly stacked the documents on the desk to the left, where the Duke sat.

 

“These are the reports that have just arrived from the estate.”

 

Instead of answering, Cardale picked up the top folder from the stack and flipped through the papers.

 

Michael quietly breathed a sigh of relief, hoping Cardale wouldn’t notice.

 

‘I’m glad it arrived before it was too late. Otherwise, the Duke would have gone straight to the estate.’

 

As Cardale ascended to attend the victory celebration, he had instructed Michael to send a messenger to the estate to fetch the necessary documents for processing. 

 

Knowing that the administrative staff under the Duke’s command had been working tirelessly for days to organise the materials in time, Michael silently offered them his deep consolation.

 

However, his own situation, in which he had to deliver the news that the owner would be displeased with, was not much different.

 

As Michael hesitated for a moment, Cardale, without raising his head or showing any interest, nonchalantly asked in an indifferent tone.

 

“If you have something to report, go ahead.”

 

Michael stiffened his posture and replied.

 

“Lady Isabella is currently staying at the Duke’s residence in the Brillion Estate.”

 

“She’s staying…?”

 

Feeling a chilling atmosphere emanating from Cardale’s tone, Michael’s spine grew cold. Nonetheless, he resolutely continued his report.

 

“Until Lady Isabella enters the mansion, she insists on remaining outside the gates, which has left the estate’s employees helpless.”

 

“It seems she’s grown tired of the villa.”

 

Cardale sneered.


In response to his master’s cold reaction, Michael cautiously added.

 

“It seems that the lady of the house is quite upset about being unable to attend the banquet.”

 

“So, she came all the way to the Duke’s mansion to find someone to vent her frustration on. Truly motherly of her.”

 

Due to Cardale’s firm assertion that he would not attend the banquet if Madame Vassenberg were invited, the Emperor did not send her an invitation. As a result, Madame found herself in a position where she couldn’t even show her face at the victory celebration, despite having the war hero as her son.

 

Once a prominent figure in high society and a respected noblewoman, Victoria Vassenberg could not quietly endure this humiliation.

 

“What would you like to do?”

 

“Just leave her alone. She needs to find one more reason to stay here and meet my expectations.”

 

Cardale retorted nonchalantly.

 

Even the soldiers who fought on the battlefield needed rewards. He had the honour of winning the battle, so he should be given time to enjoy it.

 

And…

 

[It is an honour to meet you, Your Grace. I am Elise Schuvan.]

 

He would have time to assess the usefulness of the woman who claimed to be thankful to him.

 

Cardale’s finger slowly stroked the feather of the goose quill pen, a premium item made from the feathers of the goose he used to raise. The animal that brought joy during its life was now used in various practical ways after its death.

 

Useful or not, his standards were always clear and straightforward.

 

Therefore, Cardale had no hesitation in making any decisions.

 

Just as he had once used a woman from the slums to trap Count Schuvan, this time, he would use the bastard child as a shield to protect himself from the Crown Princess.

 

Then and now, he simply made perfect choices based on convenience and necessity.

 



 

Gerhard Schuvan was a seasoned opportunist.

 

Obviously, he was not foolish or dull enough to miss out on the golden egg that rolled its way to him. Especially if it was an opportunity he had carefully prepared for.

 

The day after Vanessa asked about the news Gerhard had been waiting for, he called for Elise without hesitation.

 

Elise’s face turned pale when she heard the Count’s summons.

 

‘Could it be about what happened at the banquet yesterday…?’

 

Perhaps he was planning to punish her.

 

Today’s punishment would be much harsher than usual if that were the case. It might be so severe that it would be difficult even to endure the pain…

 

Elise followed Vanessa to the room where the Count was waiting.

 

It was a place to inquire about yesterday’s incident. She braced herself for a thunderous scolding.

 

However, instead of the expected anger, she heard a calm voice.

 

“I thought you were just an ordinary girl, but you surprisingly have potential.”

 

Elise lifted her head reflexively, and there was the Count, smiling at her.

 

“Yes. Expressing gratitude in person is proper etiquette.”

 

Gerhard, who was mumbling incomprehensible words, gave a signal to Elise.

 

“You should prepare yourself, as you will have to visit soon. Vanessa will give you the details.”

 

 Elise, who did not understand Gerhard’s words at the time, stuttered, unable to hide her bewilderment.

 

“What do you mean…?”

 

“Oh, haven’t I told you yet?”

 

The Count said with a satisfied expression, as if dealing with a well-behaved pet dog.

 

“The Duke of Vassenberg wishes to see you.”

 



 

On the day Elise was to visit the Duke’s mansion, the sky was covered with thick dark clouds, unlike the previous day. It was a gloomy day when the rain wouldn’t be surprising at all.

 

The spring breeze, still carrying the scent of winter, blew softly. Feeling a bit chilly, Elise wrapped her cloak tighter around her.

 

Just before boarding the carriage, Vanessa once again advised her.

 

“Just be yourself, neither more nor less, just like at the banquet.”

 

However, this enigmatic advice was unfortunately of no help to Elise.

 

‘Can I do well?’

 

Elise searched her memories with a pale face.

 

What was her demeanour at the banquet?

 

Helpless and pitiful, she had felt insignificant while being showered with humiliation and disgrace.

 

In the end, she had to escape from that place as if fleeing. She just wanted to get out of the place.

 

Her appearance would have been one that no one could help but look down upon, so Vanessa’s advice to stay the same was puzzling.

 

But what truly remained incomprehensible was the fact that the Duke wanted to see her again.

 

‘Why me…?’

 

He was a man with such ruthless eyes that one could hardly dare to speak to him. His overwhelming presence was still vivid, as if it could crush her just with a glance.

 

Even when they held hands to dance, he had looked down at her from a distant peak.

 

Elise shivered lightly.

 

Perhaps it was her instinct, sensing that a man’s summoning could not be mere warm courtesy or consideration.

 

Due to nervousness, her fingers twitched involuntarily. She firmly clasped both hands together to stop the wrong habit from recurring.

 

After a while, the speed of the carriage began to slow down.

 

Elise peered outside through a small window. The carriage had approached the Duke’s mansion in no time.

 

A large iron gate came into view in the middle of the tall surrounding walls. Its black surface shimmered under the sunlight.

 

On top of the gate and the walls were sharp spikes, giving it a military-like solemn appearance.

 

Elise found herself holding her breath as she gazed through the iron gate.

 

The enormous grey stone mansion, built on a huge piece of land, seemed to be looking down at her. If the architect intended to impress visitors with a sense of awe and intimidation, he had undoubtedly succeeded.

 

Elise was utterly intimidated by the size and grandeur of the mansion, which couldn’t be captured in a single glance.

 

When the guards confirmed the visitor and opened the gate, the carriage sped up again along the well-maintained road.

 

The landscape on both sides of the road was meticulously planned, with carefully arranged fountains, statues, and even the smallest shrubs. It was a garden meticulously designed by the Duke, praised by people from all walks of life, but Elise had no leisure to appreciate it.

 

‘I mustn’t make any mistakes.’

 

She rehearsed the words she had memorised countless times one last time, remembering the Duke she would soon meet.

 

Finally, the carriage came to a complete stop, and the door opened.

 

The first person to greet Elise was her grey-haired and good-looking old butler. He greeted politely in a gentle voice.

 

“Greetings. I am Norman Crowood, the butler of the Vassenberg mansion. We have been awaiting your arrival.”

 

“Hello. I am Elise Schuvan. Thank you for your hospitality.”

 

“The master is currently in his study on the first floor. Would you please follow me?”

 

Elise nodded calmly and followed Norman.

 

Soon, they arrived in front of a large door, and he turned to her and spoke.

 

“You can go inside.”

 

Norman opened the door and stepped aside, indicating for her to enter. 

 

Elise nodded slightly, thanking him as she walked inside. 

 

However, upon entering, she was startled to find a stuffed animal head with a severed neck mounted on the wall right in front of the door. Elise stopped. 

 

It was a large antlered stag with its majestic antlers spreading widely on both sides.

 

And that was not all. The walls were filled with various stuffed animal heads, including bears, wolves, deer, and foxes, as well as creatures she had never seen or heard of, like strange-looking birds.

 

To Elise, who had no hunting experience, most of them were animals she had only come across through pictures in books Vanessa showed her. Some were bizarre and unheard of.

 

Elise tried hard to avoid looking into the lifeless eyes of those animals, feeling overwhelmed by the sight. 

 

Her tense feet moved cautiously, and stepped inside.

 

As she stepped further into the room, the heavy door behind her closed shut.

 

Elise held her breath and glanced around her room. A hunting gun was displayed on the left side of the wall where the taxidermy was hung.

 

Her cautious steps continued, and she noticed a collection of hunting rifles displayed on the left side of the wall. There were more than ten rifles, each slightly different in colour, shape, and size, but they all served one purpose.

 

Killing the targets.

 

The cold metallic barrels sent shivers down her spine. She quickly turned her gaze away and continued her exploration. 

 

On the floor were shimmering fur pelts of unknown animals, spread like a carpet. Elise deliberately avoided stepping on that area as she passed by. 

 

Near the desk, she noticed a large silhouette but didn’t dare to look at it and quickly lowered her head.

 

“I see you, Your Grace. I am Elise Schuvan. Thank you for allowing me to visit you.”

 

Elise greeted the Duke with a polite tone.

 

However, there was no response from the Duke. 

 

The silence in the room made Elise nervous. 

 

She closed her eyes tightly and spat out the words she had memorised dozens of times.

 

“For your help at the party, I sincerely express my gratitude-“

 

“Enough.” 

 

The Duke’s voice interrupted her in a low tone, causing Elise’s body to shudder.

 

“That insincere greeting is unnecessary.”

 

Elise raised her head, unable to hide her embarrassment.

 

She had heard that the Duke wanted her to come and express her gratitude in person. But now, the Duke seemed uninterested, leaving her unsure of what was really going on.

 

“Why do you think I called you here?” 


Elise looked at the man with a perplexed gaze.

 

“I wanted to express my gratitude to you, Your Grace…”

 

Cardale crossed his legs and leaned against the backrest. Then, he placed his hands on his knees and tugged at the corner of his mouth.

 

It was a cold mockery directed at a foolish and naive opponent.

 

“Just to hear that gratitude? Did you really think so?”

 

Elise was left speechless for a moment.

 

‘There must have been another reason.’

 

A belated realisation dawned on her.

 

The Duke, who looked up to even fellow nobles and couldn’t treat even the imperial family lightly, couldn’t have called her just to hear a few words.

 

However, she still couldn’t grasp what the Duke wanted. Elise tried to recall their past interactions.

 

The times when Vanessa told her not to worry and the joyful expression on the Count’s face after a long time. 

 

Elise felt she knew something, but it wouldn’t come to her clearly.

 

She hesitated and couldn’t bring herself to open her mouth.

 

“If there’s another reason, could you let me know what it is?”

 

At that, Cardale’s eyes softened slowly.

 

“If I tell you the reason…”

 

“I’m willing to do what I can.”

 

“You seem braver than I thought.”

 

“What? No…”

 

Elise almost attempted to refute it.

 

In her own thoughts, she was the weakest and ugliest person in the world. There were many times she felt cowardly and lacked courage.

 

“Do you think I would say something to take advantage of what you can do?”

 

When Cardale chuckled softly, Elise’s eyes widened.

 

‘The Duke… also smiles sometimes.’

 

But the smile disappeared in an instant. He returned to an indifferent expression, as if he had lost interest.

 

“Lady Elise.”

 

When he called her name in a low voice like a cave, Elise flinched and looked at Cardale.

 

“It’s probably better for you to leave now.”

 

This time, Elise was truly taken aback.

 

Would it really be okay to leave like this?

 

“H-hah… but…”

 

Cardale, who raised his body, strode across her room and stood before Elise, who was at a loss for what to do.

 

“Just consider the greeting well received.”

 

The man now appeared imposing, looking down at her. He slightly tilted his head and whispered into Elise’s ear.

 

“There’s nothing to worry about. You can rest easy. Now, let’s proceed with the investigation.”

 



 

She could not easily leave her seat and was trembling with fear, but Elise eventually bowed deeply and excused herself.

 

Alone now, Cardale raised one corner of his mouth and let out a smirk.

 

She was an attention-grabbing woman, after all.

 

Part of the reason was that he had deliberately called her to meet again. He needed to figure out why she kept getting on his nerves.

 

However, now that she stood before him and he examined her closely, there was nothing particularly special about her. Her timid and meek demeanour was frustrating, and her weak and gentle appearance seemed insignificant.

 

She was neither a prey he had to hunt down nor a prey he had to claim as his possession.

 

‘There was nothing to you after all.’

 

Cardale concluded with satisfaction. 

 

Indeed, there was nothing special about this woman, who was nothing more than a weak beast left to roam in the hunting ground.

 

‘I wasted a lot of time on an insignificant woman.’

 

Although he felt relieved that the matter that had been bothering him was resolved, the sense of liberation didn’t last long. Nevertheless, it would soon be forgotten.

 

For him, there were far more pressing matters to attend to than such trivialities.

 

Above all, he needed to finalise the contract with the Emperor.

 

Dealing with Helmut’s remnants in Nordrat or finding the traitors who stole information from the enemy country required a lot of patience, but it wasn’t difficult. Eventually, time will figure it out.

 

The only annoying thing was the Emperor’s persistence in trying to marry off the Princess to him, using the unfinished contract as an excuse.

 

‘Futile efforts.’

 

He had thought that even if he made it clear so that the Emperor would understand, but the Emperor kept trying regardless. It was as if dealing with beasts required patience.

 

Beneath his cold facade, his lips twisted.

 

Cardale moved toward a wall where hunting rifles were hanging.

 

While examining the hunting rifles, he picked up a shotgun with a stock made of black walnut, adorned with the grain of black oak. It was a state-of-the-art shotgun capable of loading multiple buckshot at the same time.

 

There was no easier way to settle a frustrating dispute than hunting.

 

“Your Grace.”

 

Michael, who had just seen off a guest and returned, looked slightly surprised.

 

“Are you going hunting?”

 

“The number of beasts has increased excessively, so we need to control them, don’t we?”

 

If he hadn’t participated in the war against Helmut, he would have turned the forest upside down as usual. Winter was the hunting season.

 

It was also passed down like an unwritten rule to the successive Dukes of Vassenberg.

 

Going on a hunt every year stemmed from a desire for destruction as great as the mighty power that runs through blood.

 

He deliberately created hunting grounds on a vast wooded area, releasing the animals while thoroughly controlling the access of others.

 

Beasts grew and multiplied easily in forests where humans could not reach.

 

However, the population remained stable each year. It was because they were hunted as much as they grew.

 

As Michael made arrangements with the stablekeeper and the hunting ground personnel, Cardale gently cleaned the gun with a soft cloth.

 

No one else could handle his guns as well as he did. The battlefield, where the situation is always urgent, was no exception.

 

“Your Excellency, the horses are ready.”

 

Michael returned just as Cardale finished cleaning the gun, informing him they were ready for the hunt.

 

Cardale, along with the gun and the sword placed beside him, left his study.

 

The man’s stride quickly passed through the back gate of the mansion and reached the beginning of the forest. His coachman took the reins of the great dark horse and bowed his head.

 

“Your Highness, you have arrived.”

 

Afterwards, the hunting ground keeper was waiting with some soldiers, pulling a cart. It was to bring back the hunted animals.

 

The Duke always skillfully dispatched his targets, and as a result, the leather from the animals he hunted was always of the highest quality.

 

The sales revenue naturally became part of the Duke’s assets, but some was given as compensation to those who accompanied him on the hunt.

 

For this reason, the hunting ground keeper always welcomed the Duke’s hunting. The soldiers were also the same. They took turns supporting the Duke’s hunting.

 

The only thing they had to be mindful of in exchange for this lucrative additional income was just one thing.

 

“Do not be a nuisance.”

 

“Yes!”

 

Never disturb the Duke on a hunt.

 

They must not obstruct his path, disturb the prey, or make unnecessary noise. Especially the last clause was a rule that must be engraved in their bones.

 

“When do you expect to return?”

 

Michael asked. Cardale took the reins and replied.

 

“It won’t take long.”

 

He mounted the black horse in one breath.

 

With a deep red gaze, he headed toward the lush hunting grounds.

 

The vast expanse of the forest, whose end was not visible, was locked in serene silence, as if hinting at the slaughter that was about to begin.

 

“Let’s go.”

 

Cardale lightly tapped the horse’s flank with his foot. It was hunting time.

 



 

As soon as Elise returned to the Count’s mansion, she was called to see Gerhard.

 

He inquired one by one about what had happened at the Duke’s residence. So persistent, Elise had no choice but to answer everything she had experienced.

 

After hearing the entire story, Gerhard touched his chin, lost in thought.

 

“It’s not too bad for now, but I can’t just trust you… It’s better to consider backup plans.”

 

The Count mumbled something Elise couldn’t understand and then lightly clapped his hands together.

 

“Well, having possibilities is a great harvest. Good work, Elise.”

 

It was a signal for her to leave. However, Elise hesitated and stood her ground.

 

“It’s okay just to go out.”

 

“I actually have something to tell Father…”

 

Gerhard narrowed his eyes and looked at Elise. She felt her clasped hands become sweaty and carefully spoke.

 

“Please let me meet Mother once. I followed everything Father commanded, and…”

 

“Elise Schuvan.”

 

As Gerhard’s cold voice interrupted her, Elise gulped nervously. When she saw Gerhard’s face, his displeasure was obvious, she instinctively cowered.

 

“I would have told Marisa that she was doing well?”

 

“But I haven’t seen her for almost a year already…”

 

“Tsk.”

 

Elise flinched reflexively at the sound of Gerhard clicking his tongue.

 

“I told you multiple times, yet you keep having pointless thoughts. Do you not understand how crucial this time is for you? You seem utterly pathetic.”

 

His cold eyes pierced Elise’s whole body like an invisible blade, as if looking down at her as ridiculous and inferior.

 

Elise quickly apologised.

 

“I’m sorry…”

 

However, instead of accepting her apology, Gerhard replied icily.

 

“Oh, so you’re longing to see your family? How fortunate. As luck would have it, there’s someone I can show you.”

 

‘Family? Who could he mean?’

 

It was at that moment when Elise was puzzled that a voice was heard from outside the door.

 

“Father, I’m here. You called for me.”

Her body reacted faster than her mind. As Elise recognised the owner of the voice, her throat tightened in an instant.

 

She had been told that he was attending the academy. Despite spending nearly a year here, she had never seen him before. Why was he here in the mansion?

 

“Come in.”

 

The door swung open, and the sound of someone walking towards them from behind could be heard. Elise stood frozen, unable to move or blink.

 

“Oh, there was a guest? Who… Wait, isn’t that Silver Hair?”

 

Whoosh, the man approached quickly, bending down and scrutinising Elise’s face. 

 

Before long, the man with wide-open eyes grinned, showing his teeth.

 

“Who might this be?”

 



 

“My little pup is here?”

 

Fritz Schuvan.

 

It was her once savage and cruel brother who terrorised her every night of her life.

 

She couldn’t forget the dreadful memory of that day when Fritz had beaten a puppy to death when she was just a child.

 

The fear engraved in her from years ago vividly resurfaced, enveloping Elise once again.

 

“Hey, long time no see, right?”

 

Fritz’s two purple eyes, so much like the Count’s, glinted with a fierce and bloodthirsty desire, as if wanting to stomp her to death at any moment.

 

Her entire body stiffened with instinctive fear as his hideous face loomed before her.

 

“But why are you so stiff? How can it be that you can’t wag your tail to the owner she hasn’t seen in a while?”

 

When Fritz was sarcastically looking at her all-white without saying anything, she heard Gerhard’s voice.

 

“Fritz.”

 

At Gerhard’s call, Fritz stopped talking. He seemed to have forgotten for a moment that his father existed.

 

“It’s nice to treat your only sister as a puppy, but isn’t it too much of a prank?”

 

In an instant, Fritz’s face hardened.

 

“What did you say?”

 

Fritz stood up and looked at his father.

 

“Who is she?”

 

“Isn’t your sister by your side?”

 

For an instant, Elise caught her breath. Fritz’s head turned slowly, and looked down at her. His ferociously contorted face was as hideous as that of a demon.

 

Elise’s breathing became difficult, as if her throat was being strangled. Looking back at Gerhard, her body creaked like a broken doll.

 

‘Why the hell… why the hell… is he here?’

The Count knew better than anyone else about Fritz’s hatred, contempt, and disgust towards Elise.

 

The person who saved her from the brink of death several times at the hands of Fritz was also the Count.

 

So, Gerhard could have easily guessed that Fritz would be furious upon hearing that he should recognise his father’s illegitimate child as his sister. He knew that Fritz wouldn’t let it go without a fight.

 

‘But why…?’

 

Elise’s eyes trembled violently when she met Gerhard’s gaze.

 

It was because he was looking at her with a cold smile.

 

His half-raised lips were speaking to her.

 

As if to say, why did you dare to voice such a forbidden wish? This is the price you pay for ignoring my warning, you fool.

 

‘I just wanted to see my mother…’

 

It was a punishment for bringing out a wish she dared not wish for.

 

“I hope the two of you get along well in the future. Isn’t it a father’s joy to see a brother and sister getting along well?”

 

Gerhard pushed Elise to the edge of the cliff once again.

 

“Now, answer me, Elise.”

 

“Yes, yes. I will… Father.”

 

It took a lot of courage to utter the final words.

 

Sure enough, Fritz had a face that looked like he could tear her apart at any moment.

 

“Good. if you want to leave, you may.”

 

Elise bowed and hurriedly left the room as if running away. Then, regardless of who saw her, she started running.

 

However, with her trembling legs, she couldn’t pick up speed. When descending the stairs, her legs got entangled, and she almost stumbled several times.

 

Cold sweat formed on her pale forehead.

 

Finally, she saw her room. Now she needed to go inside quickly, lock the door, and hide as if she were dead…

 

“Hey, what are you doing?”

 

“Ah…!”

 

Upon hearing the voice from behind, Elise covered her mouth with both hands. Her body was trembling uncontrollably.

 

“What are you doing?”

 

Fritz stepped in front of her and tilted her head to one side.

 

“If you see your master, instead of running away, shouldn’t you bow down and greet him first? Have you forgotten that after not seeing each other for a few years?”

 



 

“Aren’t you going to answer me?”

 

Fritz’s eerie purple eyes narrowed. It signalled that he was about to raise his arm and hit her. Elise, stunned by fright, uttered reflexively, crouching over her body.

 

“Ah, h-hello…”

 

“Could there be just a hello? This idiot is saying something very funny.”

 

Fritz poked Elise’s forehead as she lowered her head. Every time he did, she was pushed backwards until her back finally hit the wall.

 

“I couldn’t see you anywhere, and I thought you had vanished or died somewhere. But you were just rolling around somewhere, and now you’ve crawled back again. Did you come to find a place to die?”

 

“Ah, no, I didn’t!”

 

“Then what?”

 

Fritz’s menacing expression suddenly turned cold.

 

“Schuvan’s last name must have been a luxury. Are you really going to pretend to be my little sister?”

 

Elise urgently shook her head.

 

“I just came because the Count asked me to stay here, that’s all. I never wanted anything more…”

 

“But why do you keep answering back since earlier?”

 

Fritz’s eyes started flickering strangely. It was a very bad sign. 

 

Elise didn’t know what he might do if he got angry.

 

Overwhelmed by fear, Elise attempted to step back. However, the wall was behind her, and Fritz’s body blocked her way forward.

 

“A bitch like you should just bark. Not everyone is human just because they can speak human language.”

 

“Ugh…!”

 

“I should make sure you understand your place once in a while.”

 

Fritz violently grabbed her hair. It was when Elise let out a whimper in pain as if her whole scalp had been ripped off.

 

“Little Count.”

 

Vanessa, with a stern expression, suddenly appeared in front of them. She warned Fritz firmly.

 

“I know that the Count ordered Little Count to be put on probation. Could you explain why you are here?”

 

“damn it…”

 

Fritz swallowed his curse with a frustrated expression. Then, he nervously let go of Elise’s hair.

 

Elise was greatly staggered by the recoil, but she managed to lean against the wall and not fall.

 

“See you next time.”

 

Fritz, who had left Elise with threatening words, glared at Vanessa before leaving with a stomp.

 

Vanessa’s expression remained unchanged, and she calmly asked.

 

“Are you hurt anywhere?”

 

“No, I’m okay.” 

 

As Elise calmed her panting breath and answered.

 

Outside, a loud rumble echoed as the sky roared with thunder, and rain began to pour.

 

“With the weather turning gloomy, it seems the rain has finally come. And there’s thunder too.”

 

Vanessa remarked dryly, observing Elise’s pale face.

 

“You should go inside and rest for now.”

 

“Okay.”

 

Leaving Vanessa behind, Elise entered her room. With a thud, the door locked shut from the outside.

 

Elise turned towards the window. 

 

The barred windows were closed, but the curtains were only half drawn. She could see the pouring rain and the flickering sky through the uncovered windows.

 

Her blue eyes widened with fear, and her pupils dilated.

 

Rumble, crash!

 

A loud sound resonated again.

 

‘Help me!’

 

Beeeeeeep!

 

A sharp tinnitus pierced her ears. Her head spun, and she lost her balance and fell to the floor.

 

“Huhh…”

 

Her mind wandered wildly.

 

Elise put her head on the floor and let out a painful moan at the stabbing pain she felt.

 

Again a fierce light flashed in the clouds. For an instant, all around her was brightened, and then, after a while, a deafening thunder rumbled in her ears.

 

“Ah, aah…”

 

Fear consumed her mind. Her breathing quickened, and her vision turned a sickly yellow. She couldn’t even catch her breath properly.

 

In the midst of the mess in her head, only one thought came to her mind.

 

‘I must run away.’

 

Elise crawled on the floor, desperately seeking a place to hide, somewhere safe to catch her breath…

 

Soon she found a small space, and Elise moved toward it.

 

Despite stumbling and tripping on her skirt several times, she was desperate to hide.

 

Thud!

 

Elise pulled on the leg of her chair while lying on her stomach. There was a sharp scratching sound, but she didn’t care.

 

She pulled the chair leg and managed to get completely inside the narrow space beneath the desk. She covered the entrance with the chair, sealing herself off from all sides.

 

With her trembling body curled up, she covered her ears with both hands and closed her eyes. Finally, she could breathe a little easier.

 

“Haah, haah…”

 

Even though she covered her ears, it wasn’t enough to completely block out the sound. The pounding raindrops seemed to drive her mind insane.

 

Whenever it rained heavily, one particular memory always surfaced.

 



 

The child knew nothing.

 

She wondered why she had no father herself, why her beautiful mother was often ill, and why she could not go outside except in and around the broken house.

 

All she knew was the warmth of her caring mother’s embrace and the comfort of the small bedroom they shared. She loved the white flowers peeking through the cracks of the front door and the beautiful magnolia tree near the estate.

 

One cloudy day, while her weak mother was taking a short rest after taking her medicine, Elise, who was playing alone, happened to pick up a fallen ball near the fence.

Dark clouds lay low, and the moist air was heavy.

 

However, Elise was completely absorbed in an intriguing new toy she had never seen before. The bouncing and resilient shape of the toy fascinated her.

 

Amidst her excitement, she suddenly lifted her head at a distant shout.

 

“There it is!”

 

Just beyond the low fence, a boy she hadn’t seen before stood with a group of sturdy guards.

 

‘He has the same hair colour as me.’

 

At that moment, that was the only thought that came to the foolishly naive child.

 

Although his eyes were a different violet shade from her own blue eyes, their silver hair was strikingly similar.

 

Her mother’s long, silky brown hair was also a favourite of hers, but it was the first time she saw someone with the same colour as her own. So, Elise felt a little happy.

 

“That kid stole my ball!”

 

Until the boy yelled ferociously at her, pointing his index finger precisely.

 

The boy pointed at her with a determined expression before snatching the ball she held. Elise didn’t cry. Instead, she tried to apologise.

 

Apologise for touching it recklessly, saying she didn’t know it belonged to anyone and didn’t steal it. She believed the boy would understand.

 

But that was the child’s assumption.

 

“I’ll make sure she’s punished, so bring her out!”

 

Elise suddenly felt afraid.

 

It was because she remembered her mother’s request that she never go outside the fence.

 

“I can’t get out of here.”

 

Elise stammered and took a step back. Then, heavy raindrops started falling as the thick clouds loomed overhead.

 

Even the puzzled guards tried to restrain the boy.

 

“Young Master Fritz. It’s going to rain soon, so it’s better to leave now…”

 

“You won’t listen to me?”

 

But the boy was relentless.

 

Suddenly, with unexpected strength, he grabbed Elise’s shoulder tightly and tried to forcefully drag her.

 

“Don’t do this!”

 

Surprised by the violent touch, Elise reached out and pushed the boy with both hands.

 

Fritz, who never expected to be counterattacked, fell backwards and hit his back.

 

At first, the boy’s face, which had been sitting with bewildered face, gradually began to fill with anger.

 

Fritz got up and pushed Elise with all his might this time.

 

“Ow!”

 

“You dare hit me?”

 

The little body of the child fell to the ground. 

 

Her entire body throbbed at the shock of the bump, but Elise thought clearing up the misunderstandings was the first priority, so she stammered open her mouth.

 

“I-I didn’t hit you… … .”

 

“What is going on here?”

 

A high-pitched, piercing voice cut through the heavy air.

 

Everyone’s eyes moved towards the sound. A gorgeously dressed lady and a maid stood next to her, holding an umbrella.

 

The lady was beautiful, with her lush purple hair pulled up high, but her ferocious eyes glared at them.

 

No, it was directed towards her girl.

 

“Mother!”

 

“Fritz.”

 

The boy dashed up to the noblewoman and pointed at Elise assertively.

 

“This girl not only stole my ball but also dared to hit me! I was trying to punish her, but the guards ignored my words!”

 

The guards were taken aback and exchanged glances.

 

“Madame, it’s not like that…”

 

“Enough noise!”

 

The stern rebuke of the Countess silenced the guards’ excuses.

 

As if pouring cold water on them, the atmosphere immediately quieted down.

 

A distorted face mixed with anger and contempt turned to Elise.

 

“Did you dare to hit my son?”

 

There was deadly intent in the eerie voice. Her amber eyes flashed menacingly, causing Elise to shudder. Even in her young mind, she thought she had to run away, but somehow she couldn’t move an inch.

 

The Countess pointed out one of the guards and ordered.

 

“You go now and pick up some sturdy twigs.”

 

The guard paused for a moment. It was because he guessed what the Countess was thinking.

 

However, he couldn’t resist her will and went to break some branches.

 

In the meantime, the increasing raindrops soaked Elise’s shoulders and back.

 

“I’ve broken you, Madame.”

 

As the guard bowed his head and handed over the branch, the Countess’ bright red lips drew an arc.

 

“Punish this girl.”

 

Soon, a voice colder than ice came out.

 

“Not only did she steal my son’s belongings, but she also dared to lay hands on his precious body. She deserves punishment.”

 

The icy glare directed at the girl was even colder and more cruel than an iceberg.

 

Elise desperately tried to defend herself and shouted.

 

“I-I didn’t steal!”

 

“Shut up. I never allowed you to open your mouth.”

 

Surprised by the cold words, Elise hiccupped. But the Countess had no mercy to show to the frightened girl.

 

Even just looking at the child made her nauseous, especially when it came to evidence of her husband’s infidelity.

 

“What are you doing? Can’t you hear me?”

 

The guards hesitated. They knew the girl’s identity.

 

Although she was an illegitimate child, she was of the Count’s blood. They didn’t know if it would be okay if they touched her carelessly.

 

This defiance only further provoked the Countess’s anger. Her fury began to surface on her face.

 

“Now that the Count is not around, I, the Countess, am in charge of this mansion. Even so, I can’t help it with this insolence.”

 

With her back straight and her head held high in arrogance, she declared.

 

“I cannot keep an employee who disobeys the master’s orders. You are all dismissed.”

 

The guards’ faces turned pale in an instant.

 

“No, Madame!”

 

But the woman did not bat an eye.

 

If this continued, they would be driven out of the Count’s residence, leaving them without a livelihood.

 

The guards hesitated for a moment, and eventually shared the sticks.

 

Their eyes now turned to the child, who was trembling in fear and confusion.

 

The girl shook her head pitifully.

 

Her tears dripped from her big eyes. Although sympathetic, the guards struggled to turn a blind eye.

 

They couldn’t help it if they wanted to live.

 

Some of the guards had already made their decision. Moreover, they only followed their employer’s orders. 

 

As they added more reasons to justify their actions, their guilt faded away.

 

“I’ll give a gold coin to the one who strikes first.”

 

It was the moment when even a hint of guilt disappeared like smoke. All of the guards raised their hands, holding branches high. It was then.

 

“No!”

 

With a shrill cry, a slender woman jumped between them. Then she wrapped herself around the little child.

 

‘Mother…?’

 

Elise’s eyes widened.

 

Her mother’s face was filled with tears. At first, Elise thought it was because of the raindrops falling on the ground. But no, it was tears.

 

Her mother was crying.

 

The sight was so heart-wrenching that tears filled the girl’s eyes again.

 

Marisa desperately embraced Elise as if protecting an egg in her arms, just like a mother bird.

 

“If there is anything wrong, it is all my fault for not teaching her properly.”

 

The pleading voice was thin, as if it would cut off at any moment, and at the same time, it was desperate.

 

“So please, punish me and forgive this child.”

 

Marisa looked up at her Countess and begged.

 

Elise, who followed her mother’s gaze and raised her head, was left speechless. The Countess’s face was filled with a twisted, maniacal smile.

 

It was the joy of being in front of what she had longed for.

 



 

Heavy rain poured down.

 

A deafening roar of thunder echoed across the land, and the rain fell so hard that it was impossible to see.

 

In the midst of the downpour, Marisa took the punishment on behalf of Elise.

 

Countless raindrops shattered white on Marisa’s body. The cloth clinging to her weak back lost its original colour and turned red.

 

The crashing raindrops easily ate away the child’s screams. Her struggles were of no avail. Captured by the guards, Elise was forced to watch helplessly as her mother suffered.

 

Amid the miserable scene, Elise lifted her rain-soaked face and looked at the Countess.

 

Even in the blurred vision caused by the rain, the face that smiled with a despicable satisfaction was vividly clear.

 

Elise realised.

 

The Countess didn’t see them as human beings. That was why she could easily crush them like bugs without hesitation.

 

It was suffocating. Elise struggled in desperation, flailing her arms and legs. It was a desperate to live, not to be swallowed by despair. 

 

‘I want to live. I want to save Mother.’

 

As if driven by instinct, the remaining breath became her only goal, ringing loudly in her head.

 

“Ah!”

 

Elise bit the arm of the guard holding her with all her might. Then, as soon as the guard’s grip gave way, she ran into the rain.

 

She had to find someone to rescue her mother and herself from this hell.

 

For the first time like that, Elise got out of her fence by her own will.

 

“Stop right there!”

 

Looking back, the guards were terrifyingly pursuing her. Elise turned her head again and ran as fast as she could.

 

But she couldn’t get very far, and thud! 

 

With that noise, she bumped into someone hard.

Her buttocks throbbed from the impact of the strong fall to the ground, but Elise forgot the pain and raised her head.

 



 

A man with an umbrella was looking down at her. Elise shouted without even having time to confirm who he was.

 

“Please help! My mother…”

 

Elise could hear the guards running up to her, screaming in astonishment.

 

“Milord, Count!”

 

The man asked Elise in a dry voice, not even looking at the guards.

 

“Where is Marisa now?”

 

Only then did Elise see his face through the lightly raised umbrella.

 

The man she had never seen before had the same silver hair as her.

 



 

It seemed that she had fallen asleep.

 

Elise opened her eyes to the permeating light. When she straightened her body a little, her whole body felt numb, as if a chill had seized her.

 

“Ugh…”

 

There was not a single place where she could put strength properly.

 

Pushing the chair away with her weak arms, she barely managed to crawl out from under the desk.

 

Her entire body, which had been stiff, trembled as if it were screaming. It was not an unfamiliar sensation, but it was one that she couldn’t get used to.

 

She couldn’t move at all, so Elise lay on her stomach, barely lifting her head.

 

The rain that poured down her the night before had stopped like a lie. The dawn sky seen through the window was blue.

 

“Thank god…”

 

After checking the weather, Elise dropped her head to the floor again. Her bare cheek touched the bare floor, but it didn’t matter.

 

Rather, she would be grateful if this chill could quickly bring her back to her senses.

 

In a little while, Vanessa would wake her up, and her education, suspended while preparing the victory banquet, would resume.

 

It was still an exhausting and difficult process for Elise. It was also agonising, not knowing how long it would continue.

 

But she had no choice but to persevere. She couldn’t help it, even if she had to endure it her whole life.

 

As long as thunder, lightning, and heavy rain continued in this world.

 



 

Vanessa, who was checking Elise’s manners, frowned.

 

“Why are you stiffening your body like this? Your posture is all collapsed.”

 

With a thin stick, Vanessa pointed out the mistakes by tapping Elise on her shoulder, waist, arm, etc..

 

“Too much tension in your whole body. The lady’s posture should be natural and elegant. Even a child of ten wouldn’t do such stiff movements.”

 

Elise tried to pose again. But she was curled up all night, and the stiff body hardly listened to her.

 

“If you continue like this, the legitimacy of the lady’s origin will be doubted sooner or later. It will never make teaching worthwhile.”

 

“I’m sorry.”

 

Elise tightly closed her eyes and said, barely holding back the feeling of dizziness.

 

It was because she starved all day trying to tighten her corset.

 

“The Count and I, as well as all of the Count’s employees, are working above all else to ensure that the young lady debuts and succeeds in society. But what are you doing, lady?”

 

Elise could say nothing. She felt pitiful even to herself.

 

After over a year of correcting her posture, she had been out of shape again.

 

“Stand up straight, widen your shoulders. Pull your chin and slightly raise your head. Let your fingertips be natural… No, it might be better to hold a shawl.”

 

Vanessa pointed out, her tongue clicking, and Elise’s apologies repeated several times.

 

After she managed to finish her etiquette lessons, the maids took off Elise’s dress.

 

As she was slipped into thin chemise and corset, Vanessa’s sharp eyes scanned her entire body.

 

As she scrutinised, her gaze landed on the corset Elise was wearing to support her breasts and slim her waistline.

 

Narrowing her eyes and estimating the measurement, Vanessa instructed the maid.

 

“Tighten her waist a little more.”

 

The maid tugged at the string behind without a word. Elise held her breath, resisting the pressure that her body tightened.

 

Vanessa frowned slightly as she looked at her tight waist.

 

Modern dresses reveal the body’s silhouette entirely. The slimmer and more delicate the figure, the more it maximised beauty.

 

With her chubby waist and forearms that weren’t skinny, she wouldn’t be able to satisfy even a common aristocratic brat, let alone a man like the Duke of Vassenberg.

 

“It would be better to control the amount of food a little more before attending the exhibition.”

 

Elise obediently nodded her head. It was the attitude of a caged animal that dared not even think of defiance.

 

Vanessa tugged at her lips as she looked at the result of her painstaking work.

 

“Never forget that all of this is for you, and you should always be grateful. Do you understand?”

 

“Yes, I will.”

 

An obedient and beautiful doll that will be sold for the sake of the family.

 

Although it was the usual fate for noblewomen, Gerhard Schuvan wanted something more.

 

To exploit your perfect weaknesses, make you unable to refuse.

 

Eliminate dangers in advance to avoid becoming overly smart or self-conscious.

 

So make yourself never even think of taking off the leash.

 

Thus, Elise was meticulously crafted to be what she had to be.

 

“If you do well, you will be able to see Lady Marisa someday.”

 

As soon as the prepared words were spoken, Elise flinched. There was no need to predict or calculate because her response was always obvious and the same.

 

“I’ll… do my best.”

 

“That’s what you should do.”

 

As Vanessa beckoned again, the maids gathered around and dressed Elise again.

 

Vanessa’s satisfaction was evident in the silhouette that looked better than before.

 



 

The Duke’s mansion was as quiet as usual. However, a slightly different atmosphere was distinct from tranquillity and serenity.

 

Since the Duke disliked noise, the employees of the mansion were taught to be quiet.

 

The face of the man, who worked in the carefully arranged space, was expressionless and, in some aspects, even boring.

 

Naturally, he had forgotten about the woman who had made him lose his peace a few days ago.

 

At that moment, there was a knock on the door.

 

“Your Excellency, this is Michael.”

 

“Come in.”

 

Michael, who entered with a restrained motion, said politely.

 

“A letter has arrived from His Majesty the Emperor.”

 

Michael held out a letter with the Emperor’s seal on it.

 

Cardale neatly broke the seal and read the letter.

 

The content was clear and simple.

 

[There are concerns and worries that Helmut’s spies may cause terror at this exhibition. I request that you, a member of the Empire’s guard, ensure the safe completion of the official schedule.]

 

Cardale sarcastically tossed the letter into the fireplace along with the envelope.

 

“Now he can openly use it as an excuse to serve as the Princess’s bodyguard.”

 

Every Imperial family has an escort dedicated to them. The same was true of Princess Theresia.

 

Even so, the Emperor dared to pick him up and entrust him with the Princess. He happened to have a good cause, so it would have been nice to have an excuse.

 

Cardale sat on the sofa after confirming that all the letters were burnt.

 

While silent for a while, Michael sat back and waited for his master’s words. He hadn’t been told to leave yet, so he had to wait.

 

As always, in front of the Duke, he could not relax for a moment.

 

After a while, Cardale opened his mouth.

 

“Michael Walter.”

 

“Yes, please tell me.”

 

“If a troublesome animal were in your path, what would you do? If it ignores your orders and growls at you?”

 

Michael couldn’t open his mouth. It wasn’t because he couldn’t answer. It was because he couldn’t understand why the Duke asked such a question.

 

After thinking about it, Michael shook his head.

 

“…I do not know.”

 

“I’ll tell you what I’d do.”

 

Cardale said, leaning lazily on the sofa.

 

“If it were just one, it would twist its neck on the spot. Because it’s simple and convenient. If there are a few more, you can slash them with a sword or shoot them with a gun. However, if the number increases from tens to hundreds…”

 

His elongated eyes narrowed, revealing a chilly glint in his half-hidden pupils.

 

However, a cold life flashed in the half-hidden eyes.

 

“We have to drive them into a place where they can never escape and wipe them out at once so that not a single one survives. That way, there won’t be any aftermath to worry about.”

 

In an instant, Michael’s back felt tight. He said nothing, only swallowed dry.

 

“It’s been a while since I’ve seen such a determined look in your eyes since the battlefield.”

 

Haha. Cardale laughed at his visibly shaken subordinate, but there was not a single smile on Michael’s face. He felt a chill run down his spine.

 

It had been long since he had seen the Duke in this state, ever since the battlefield.

 

“There is nothing to be nervous about. I was just thinking about what to do with Helmut’s spies. If my subordinate gets scared at just this much, it would be embarrassing for me.”

 

Michael barely answered.

 

“I apologise, Your Excellency.”

 

“Apologising for something like this.”

 

“… I’m sorry.”

 

“You really can’t say much, can you?”

 

The Duke, who spoke like a joke, averted his gaze. The stuffed animals on the wall were looking at him from an oblique angle. All of them were hunted by the Duke himself.

 

“I must make sure to seize the opportunity and deal with all of them.”

 

The Duke, barely audible, added.

 

They were dangerous individuals threatening Nodrat, and he couldn’t afford to let them live.

 

However, Michael couldn’t be sure whom his master was targeting.

The exhibition, which caught rare flora and fauna from across the sea, was a hot topic even among the nobility of Nordrat.

 

The fact that this exhibition received the full support of the Emperor also played a role.

 

Later, it was also scheduled to be open to commoners, but the nobles who loved privileges wanted exclusive access on the first day, or at least within the first week of the opening.

 

Therefore, they mobilised all kinds of personal connections to get an invitation.

 

Under such circumstances, Gerhard Schuvan got an invitation to the first day quite easily. It was thanks to the personal connections he had built up over the years and the textile business that was thriving day by day.

 

However, since there were only two invitations, Gerhard decided to accompany Elise.

 

Upon hearing the Count’s decision, Fritz became angry and stormed into his father’s office. However, when he came out of the office, he seemed quiet, likely due to what he heard inside.

 

“We have arrived.”

 

After getting off the carriage with Gerhard, Elise opened her eyes wide when she saw the building in front of her.

 

The exhibition hall built on the land of Inghel was reminiscent of a huge greenhouse.

 

“Be careful not to lose sight of people here and focus on following me.”

 

“Yes.”

 

As they entered the exhibition hall, they felt a humid heat enveloping them.

 

Exotic trees were placed on both sides of the entrance to make it look like a passage.

 

Large leaves drooped at the ends of bent branches, giving passers-by the illusion of walking in a thick forest.

 

The palm-sized white flowers, planted at regular intervals, exuded a rich and attractive scent, enchanting people.

 

“Oh my God, I’m really looking forward to it!”

 

In the midst of the excited people, Elise passed by the place feeling somewhat stuffy.

 

Upon leaving the pathway, the surroundings opened up. The round glass ceiling, shaped like an arch, revealed the sky outside.

 

With early visitors, the exhibition hall was already bustling.

 

The Count, slightly out of the aisle, took a good look at the people, and a man with a handsome moustache on both sides pretended to know him.

 

“Haha, you’re here too!”

 

“How can one miss such a wonderful event?”

 

Gerhard responded with a light joke and exchanged a few more words with him.

 

“But who is this lady?”

 

“She is my daughter. Didn’t you see her at the last banquet?”

 

“Oh, yes! I remember now. I almost didn’t recognise the Lady who danced with the Duke of Vassenberg!”

 

When Elise politely greeted him, the man took off the hat and greeted her.

 

From there, Gerhard diligently mingled with the nobles, with the primary purpose of subtly presenting Elise.

 

‘I can’t rely solely on Duke Vassenberg. I need to have second and third alternatives in case.’ 

 

Meanwhile, Elise quietly followed the Count. 

 

Following him without a word and responding to his signals for greetings was nothing difficult, as she had done so at previous social events.

 

However, the space itself was uncomfortable.

 

After passing through a space full of flowers and entering the next area, the guide spoke kindly to them.

 

“From here on, we have a collection of exotic animals from foreign lands. Only the most unique and extraordinary creatures are gathered here.”

 

Logs were arranged like columns between the trees, with cages hanging from the tops of the logs, connected by chains.

 

“Squawk! Squawk!”

 

“Aren’t the cries of these animals peculiar?”

 

“Indeed!”

 

The guide continued with the introductions. 

 

Some birds had unique feather colours, others had unusually large beaks, and some had small wings compared to their chubby bodies.

 

The nobles admired and enjoyed the creatures they saw for the first time. Elise was the only one who felt uncomfortable among them.

 

‘It just feels like they are screaming.’

 

The chirping sounds were far from exciting to her ears.

 

‘My stomach… feels uneasy.’

 

At first, her chest felt tight, as if a heavy stone had been placed on it, but as time went on, she felt nauseous.

 

Elise tried to focus her gaze on the floor to avoid looking at the creatures, but even that couldn’t block out the sounds she heard, making it all futile.

 

Around that time, the pattern on the smooth floor stone had changed. Exclamations erupted from everywhere.

 

“Grrr…”

 

Clank, clank!

 

Following the cry of a beast, Elise involuntarily raised her head at the loud friction of metal clashing.

 

She saw an animal imprisoned in an iron cage. The beast with brilliant silver fur roared, showing its sharp teeth.

 

Then it threw itself at the bars again. However, it could not escape because of the tightly clamped chains around its neck.

 

“Can’t you stay still?”

 

The caretakers inserted a long rod through the bars and struck the creature.

 

Despite the pain, the creature continued to growl fiercely, breathing heavily.

 

Elise couldn’t bear to watch the cruel scene and turned her head away. She could hear people talking nearby.

 

“It is very vicious. It must not have been easy to capture.”

 

“Yeah, if it were to escape, it would be a big problem.”

 

They put their words together as if concerned, but their eyes, on the contrary, were filled with curiosity.

 

“But what if it dies? It must be quite valuable.”

 

“Ah, even if that happens, I heard that the skin of such rare creatures sells for a high price.”

 

“Well, then, I guess it doesn’t matter.”

 

A wave of nausea surged within Elise. She covered her mouth with both hands, as if her insides were churning even though she hadn’t eaten anything.

 

Feeling disgusted and overwhelmed, she unconsciously swerved her way, wanting to escape from there. She forgot about Gerhard’s request to always stay close to him.

 

Suddenly, feeling that something was out of place in her, she lost her balance and staggered instantly.

 

Tak, it was then that someone grabbed her body as she was about to fall.

 

“Lady, are you all right?”

 

Elise let out the breath she had been holding back and opened her eyes, which she had involuntarily closed.

 

In front of her eyes was a man she had never seen before. He was a young man with dark auburn hair and soft green eyes like freshly sprouted sprouts. The softly curved eyes gave a soft impression.

 

For a moment, Elise stared at him blankly before hastily regaining her composure.

 

“I-I’m fine. Please let go.”

 

“Oh, I apologise.”

 

The man neatly backed away as soon as Elise stood upright.

 

His face showed regret for touching the Lady’s body without permission, even though it was unavoidable.

 

The man introduced himself politely, placing his hand on his chest and bowing his head lightly.

 

“Let me greet you first, Lady. My name is Raymond Hartmann. Marquis Hartman is my father.”

 

Raymond said with a gentle smile as if to reassure Elise.

 

“If you don’t mind, may I know the lady’s name?”

 

Elise hesitated. She felt flustered. The conversation was confusing, and she wasn’t sure if it was appropriate to answer.

 

When she hesitated and couldn’t do anything about it, Gerhard showed up.

 

“Elise, is something wrong?”

 

Only then did she realise she had walked away from the Count without a word, and her face grew paler.

 

However, Gerhard only asked again with a nonchalant face. She glanced at him, and answered in a low voice.

 

“…This gentleman here caught me when I was about to fall.”

 

Gerhard turned his head. Then he raised a voice with a look of surprise as if he had just found out.

 

“Oh, aren’t you the Little Marquis Hartmann! It’s been a long time.”

 

At the word ‘Little Marquis’, Raymond’s face darkened for an instant. However, Gerhad didn’t notice because he was so fleeting and quickly returned to his calm face.

 

“Has the Count been well?”

 

“Yes, of course.”

 

Gerhard, with a smile on his face, turned to Elise and said.

 

“This gentleman helped my daughter when she almost fell. I never thought there would be an encounter like this.”

 

“The Lady was the Count’s daughter. I’m sorry I didn’t know.”

 

When Raymond handed a plain apology to Elise, Gerhard smiled and said,

 

“No. This victory banquet was her first social debut, and since she only attended the first day, it’s natural that the Little Marquis doesn’t know about her.”

 

Then he winked at Elise. She carefully introduced me.

 

“Hello, Little Marquis. My name is Elise Schuvan. Thanks for your help.”

 

“I just did what I had to do.”

 

Raymond smiled and replied.

 

Meanwhile, Gerhard’s head was busy calculating the value.

 

‘Raymond Hartman is a pretty good choice.’

 

Just a month ago, Raymond was not a target for Gerhard’s consideration. This was because he was the second son, even if he was a direct descendant of Marquis Hartmann.

 

Moreover, since Raymond’s mother was the remarriage partner of the Marquis, Raymond was a half-brother to the eldest son, the Little Marquis.

 

However, as the eldest son passed away in a sudden horseback accident a while ago, the position of Raymond, the second son, was completely changed.

 

Having had nothing but his name and family lineage before, he had become the Marquis’s successor in an instant.

‘The Duke of Vassenberg would have been better, but…’

 

Gerhard was deep in thought.

 

‘The Duke is also targeting Princess Theresia, so it won’t be easy. There’s a possibility of crossing the line and earning the Emperor’s displeasure.”

 

‘If so, this one isn’t too bad either.’

 

While thinking, Gerhard noticed two people approaching from afar.

 

He could see the people were paving the way and getting polite.

 

‘It looks like the Duke and Princess Theresia.’

 

It was then. A good thought flashed through his head like lightning.

 

Gerhard looked at the Little Marquis and the Duke alternately, then smiled meaningfully.

 

‘Because it’s better to ensure the stage is set.’

 

Having made that decision, Gerhard turned to Raymond.

 

“I’m sorry, but something urgent has come up, and I have to leave for a moment.”

 

“Ah, I see.”

 

Disappointment appeared on Raymond’s face. Gerhard added, not missing that expression.

 

“So, if it’s alright with you, may I ask the Little Marquis to escort Elise?”

 

“What? But…”

 

Raymund seemed surprised. It was customary to entrust the escort to a trustworthy man, so it was natural.

 

However, Gerhard casually said, seemingly unaware of everything.

 

“It’s difficult to take her with me, but I can’t leave my daughter alone either. It should only be for a moment, but oh, what should I do? Should I ask someone else…?”

 

Gerhard looked around as if looking for someone.

 

“You don’t have to.”

 

In the end, Raymond, who became impatient, snapped the bait. He politely asked Elise again.

 

“Lady, will you allow me to be your escort for a while?”

 

Elise looked at the Count, and he nodded. It meant to do as you were told.

 

She looked at Raymond’s outstretched hand.

 

For some reason, the memory of the victory celebration came to mind. The long and straight fingers of the Duke, who asked her to dance, seemed to overlap. The body temperature and tactile sensations that were felt even through her gloves were felt vividly.

 

‘What am I thinking…!’

 

She hurriedly brushed off the vain thoughts that came to her mind. Then she put a finger on Raymond’s hand. It was a timid and cautious gesture, like someone afraid something might happen.

 

But as soon as the tips of her finger touched, Elise realised that she had been worrying for nothing.

 

“Then shall we go?”

 

Raymund asked affectionately. Elise smiled faintly and nodded her head.

 



 

“Are you feeling calmer now?”

 

“Pardon?”

 

“When I first met you earlier, you seemed surprised. If I was mistaken, I apologise.”

 

“No, you were right. I was surprised. I saw the wild animal in the cage.”

 

“Oh, I saw it too. It was a rare and ferocious beast, so I understand why you were surprised, my lady.”

 

The reason Elise was shocked was not because of the ferocity of the beast, but she did not bother to point it out.

 

As she stepped into the world of nobility, the first thing Elise accepted was the humble admission that she would never be able to understand them.

 

At that time, Raymond let out a short exclamation and said.

 

“Her Highness Princess Theresia is also here.”

 

At those words, Elise unconsciously turned her head away, and their gazes met.

 

Bright crimson eyes like garnets.

 

And he was staring at Elise without speaking. His expressionless and cold face remained the same.

 

Elise felt as if she had returned to the victory banquet hall again.

 

The only difference this time was that she couldn’t escape his gaze.

 

“I guess His Excellency the Duke took over as an escort.”

 

Raymond kept talking to Elise, but she couldn’t answer. It was precisely because she couldn’t hear his voice.

 

Sensing her puzzlement, Raymond looked back at Elise and asked.

 

“Lady Elise?”

 

“Oh, I’m sorry.”

 

Only then did Elise manage to get away from Cardale’s gaze. She gasped for breath and apologised to Raymund.

 

“What happened?”

 

“It’s nothing. It’s just…”

 

The excuse she was trying to make in a hurry didn’t lead to the end. It was because of Theresia who had approached them.

 

In an instant, the blood drained from Elise’s face.

 

“I see you here, Little Marquis.”

 

“I greet you, Your Highness, the Princess.”

 

“Okay, how is the exhibition going?”

 

“It is the first time such a meaningful and wonderful event has been held. I was just admiring His Majesty’s high discernment once again.”

 

Praise was inevitable since it was an event sponsored by the Imperial family. When Raymond gave a proper answer, the Princess raised the corners of her mouth as if pleased.

 

“My heart is satisfied that the Little Marquis said so. And…”

 

Theresia turned her eyes to Elise. Seeing the eerie look in her eyes, Elise instinctively ducked her body and lowered her head.

 

“I see you, Your Highness, the Princess.”

 

“You always say your greetings late.”

 

Theresia said in a cold tone. In fact, with Elise’s identity, she couldn’t even talk to the Princess first, so this was just an empty quibble.

 

“The same thing happened at the victory banquet hall.”

 

Meanwhile, Raymond was taken aback by Theresia’s unexpected vitriol. Because he didn’t know what had happened on the day of the victory banquet.

 

On that day, there was a last memorial service for his brother, who passed away in an accident, and everyone in the Hartmann family, including Raymond, could not attend the banquet.

 

Even after that, he had almost stopped his social activities, so he was ignorant of the rumours that spread in secret.

 

“Don’t you know what reflection is? Or is it to use ignorance as a shield?”

 

“Forgive me, I’m sorry…”

 

“If you’re so clueless, I wonder how you manage to attend every social event without fail. Moreover, you change your escort each time.”

 

“Your Highness the Princess.”

 

Raymond, who was worse off, stopped Theresia.

 

Through a series of conversations, he soon realised that something was wrong between the two of them. But whatever it was, he didn’t think it was the fault of the innocent lady beside him.

 

He was not ignorant of the Princess’s arrogant personality, and the woman with whom he shared a few words seemed too timid to be involved in such matters.

 

Seeing Raymond’s stern face, Theresia stepped back a little.

 

“Considering Little Marquis’ face, I’ll let it slide this time.”

 

“Thank you.”

 

The voice was meek, even with a hint of fear. Annoyed again by her pretending to be pitiful, Theresia spoke.

 

“But I hope I don’t have to see you often.”

 

It was a harsh remark, a bit excessive.

 

“Your Highness the Princess.”

 

Unable to watch the weak being bullied by the strong, Raymond took a step forward.

 

“As Your Highness knows, for a lady who has just made her debut in high society, every day is precious time.”

 

“So?”

 

Theresia asked with an arrogant face.

 

“I’m merely suggesting that taking away such opportunities would be too cruel.”

 

Hmm, the Princess deliberately sneered. Pretending to be contemplating, she glanced at Cadele’s face.

 

He was as cold and insensitive as ever. Though his gaze seemed a bit deeper, it only made him look more elegant.

 

‘I guess it wasn’t worth worrying about. Dancing with that commoner on the first day of the celebration was just a whim.’

 

As soon as she thought that, her mind that had been standing on that day was relieved in an instant.

 

‘Yes, what about all an adopted child of the Count’s family?’

 

Compared to herself, there was nothing better about that woman. If she had to acknowledge something, it was that the smooth face was somewhat passable.

 

‘It must be a way to arouse sympathy by pretending to be pitiful with that face.’

 

It was a classic but still valid method. Wasn’t it that this woman trapped even Raymond Hartmann with that ability?

 

Theresia couldn’t help recognising her talent for winning the man’s heart.

 

‘The important thing is whether that woman clings to the Duke again or not…’

 

If Elise gave up and approached Raymond early on, believing she was hopeless, it would be good for Theresia.

 

‘Just not Cardale Vassenberg.’

 

Theresia pretended to smile inwardly while maintaining a cold and stern face outwardly as she asked.

 

“Is the Little Marquis trying to reprimand me right now?”

 

“No, Your Highness.”

 

Raymond immediately shook his head.

 

“I’m merely cautioning against slandering a lady’s future. I’m also pleading for Your Highness’s mercy.”

 

Theresia carefully examined Raymond’s expression.

 

‘At the very least, he harbours a favourable impression. If not, he wouldn’t have stepped forward in a situation that has nothing to do with him.’

 

Even the Duke’s immediate reaction was like that. Cardale was just contemplating the situation with a nonchalant face that seemed not even interested.

 

It was only natural that his attitude pleased Theresia.

 

‘I don’t know what kind of relationship the two will have in the future, but…’

 

Theresia looked at Elise and Raymond alternately.

 

For that foxy woman, Little Duke Hartmann was an undeserved partner. Just seeing them standing side by side made her annoyed.

 

However, it seemed that she could endure even this, if the girl who looked good in front of the Duke would disappear.

 

She would rather get Elise married to Raymond or someone else, and get the woman out of her sight if Cardale Vassenberg shows interest in her again.


The Princess decided to let Elise go at this point.

 

“It seems I have been too harsh in reproaching a lady with limited experience. It is not because I have any ill intentions, so please do not keep it in your heart.”

 

“Yes, yes, of course. Thank you for your generosity, Your Highness the Princess.”

 

Elise lowered her head. The Princess brought her body close to Cardale as if showing off and said good words.

 

“Then, I hope the two of you will have a good time.”

 

She then turned back without hesitation.

 

“Shall we go, Lord Cardale? If we go through the passage over there, we can see rare beasts.”

 

“Okay.”

 

A short answer came back. The Princess discreetly wrapped her arm around the hand she had placed on her arm. Then she admired internally.

 

‘How can his arms be so strong?’

 

It seemed to be stronger than the last time they met. She had never seen a man with a more robust physique than Cardale.

 

Well, the only thing Cardale Vassenberg had was his body.

 

He had overwhelming strength that even elite palace knights could not match, a beautiful face that put even renowned opera performers to shame, a distinguished lineage, and abundant wealth in his possession. There was nothing lacking.

 

Even his consistently cold attitude looked handsome.

 

Even now, his expressionless and cool demeanour, his tense jaw that seemed to be holding something back, everything was appealing.

 

‘How would a man like this behave in bed?’

 

Just imagining it was thrilling. Truly, the more Theresia thought about it, the more she wanted to have him.

 

‘Now that I’ve cleared the obstacles, I just need to work slowly again.’

 

Theresia, who had regained her composure, grinned.

 

However, there was one fact that she was crucially missing.

 

That Cardale Vassenberg’s cold gaze lingered on the woman in front of him the entire time.

 



 

Elise stared blankly at the backs of the Princess and the Duke as they walked away.

 

At that time, Raymond spoke to Elise.

 

“Are you okay?”

 

Elise looked back at Raymond, startled, and he was looking at her with worried eyes. Elise quickly bowed her head to express her gratitude.

 

“Thank you for your help.”

 

“It’s nothing. I was just concerned that the lady’s feelings were hurt. Just a moment ago, Your Highness was overdoing it.”

 

Elise shook her head.

 

“There was a mistake at the banquet. I accidentally broke a glass, and some wine splashed onto the hem of the Princess’s dress…”

 

“But it was a mistake that could have been overlooked.”

 



 

“I still have the same opinion that Her Highness was severely overboard.”

 

Elise couldn’t answer and hesitated, then looked at Raymond with an expression that she didn’t know how to react.

 

He seemed truly a kind and nice person.

 

If it weren’t for Raymond, she would have gone through something similar to the banquet in the Imperial Palace.

 

She would have had to endure a time tantamount to torture, fully handling the stares and ridicule of countless people.

 

It was Raymond who prevented that from happening.

 

Moreover, he was still on her side, taking care of her with great consideration.

 

While Elise was having such thoughts, Raymond quickly added a response to her silence.

 

 “I didn’t mean to burden you, my lady. I just didn’t want you to blame yourself too much…”

 

Elise replied with a light smile.

 

“I am really fine. Thanks to you, Little Marquis.”

 

Raymond’s ears reddened at her plain reply without embellishment.

 

“I’m glad it was of help. I was worried if I might have made a mistake…”

 

As Raymond was rambling, he stopped and rubbed his face with one hand, sighing.

 

“I thought this was a cliché, but now that I’ve been through it, I have no choice but to say it.”

 

Elise’s eyes widened.

 

“If it’s not too impolite of me to ask…”

 

Raymond stood straight, looking straight into Elise’s eyes with a tender and affectionate gaze that revealed his feelings.

 

“May I send a letter to the Count’s residence?”

 

Ah… Elise’s lips parted slightly, and a soft exclamation escaped.

 

With such direct affection shown, it was impossible not to recognise the feelings.

 

“I…”

 

As Elise hesitated and slightly avoided eye contact, Gerhard stood behind Raymond, seemingly having arrived without being noticed.

 

He signalled with a nod behind Raymond that he had heard the whole story.

 

It meant accepting the proposal.

 

However, for some reason, Elise couldn’t readily accept it. There was an unexplainable feeling of resistance.

 

She had a strange feeling that she was deceiving him.

 

In fact, despite hiding her identity and past from everyone until now, strangely, only now…

 

However, as Gerhard’s face hardened and his eyebrows furrowed menacingly, she finally found herself answering.

 

“Yes… I’m fine.”

 

Raymond’s face brightened.

 



 

Norman, the butler who greeted the lord of Vassenberg, bowed deeply.

 

“Your Excellency, have you returned home?”

 

Without glancing at him, Cardale just nodded and headed straight to the study.

 

The lord was never particularly kind, but he seemed even colder today, so Norman asked Michael.

 

“Sir Walter, what happened?”

 

However, all Michael did today was accompany his lord to the exhibition hall, and after that, all he did was stand guard outside with the knights of the Princess, so knowing nothing was the same as Norman.

 

“He didn’t say anything special.”

 

“By the way, Master’s mood is colder than usual.”

 

“Meeting Her Highness, the Princess must have been uncomfortable.”

 

“I think so too…”

 

Since the Emperor’s letter arrived, Cardale had not been pleased with it, so there was no way he was in a good mood.

 

However, Norman, based on his long experience and intuition, felt there might be more to it than just that.

 

“I’ll just go in. It seems like His Excellency is waiting for me.”

 

“Yes, please, Sir Walter.”

 

The butler looked at Michael’s back for a moment as he walked away.

 

He couldn’t figure out what this unknown, premonition of missing something important was.

 



 

Opening the door to the office, Cardale stepped inside and roughly pulled the cravat to loosen it.

 

The cloth that was precisely tied around the centre of his neck came loose and unravelled in an instant.

 

But the tightness in his throat did not subside, and he continued to scratch his nerves coyly.

 

For what reason?

 

There were many reasons to find out.

 

He had been feeling unpleasant since the time he had to cater to the Emperor’s demands. The Princess, who constantly clung to his arm, was no exception.

 

‘Maybe it’s because she was particularly clinging to me today.’

 

The feeling of a snake coiling around him lingered uncomfortably.

 

Cardale took off the coat the Princess had clung to and threw it onto the back of the sofa.

 

Still, his low mood did not improve easily. It was strange.

 

It was because the Princess was nothing more than a bothersome and annoying person, and she shouldn’t have had such an influence on him.

 

Just like how humans wouldn’t pay attention to annoying flies or mosquitoes.

 

If so, this twisted feeling wasn’t the Emperor’s fault, much less the Princess’s.

 

“damn it.”

 

Cardale spat out a low curse in unexplained displeasure and brushed his hair.

 

As he momentarily covered his face with his hand, he caught sight of the stuffed deer head mounted on the wall.

 

It was a reindeer. Male reindeer, to be precise.

 

A beast with shiny fur and magnificent antlers was staring at him.

 

It was a decoration he saw every day when he went in and out of the office. He liked the well-balanced horns on both sides, so he hunted it himself.

 

He had never seen a more well-crafted deer taxidermy with such perfect quality.

 

However, what was only a still life strangely bothered him at this moment.

 

Cardale’s eyes narrowed. The hair of the reindeer, which retained its original appearance, was slightly dark brown.

 

A dark brown colour.

 

A person with a momentary resemblance in hair colour came to mind.

 

A man who had obtained the position of a Little Marquis due to his elder brother’s sudden accident and death.

 

People talked about his good fortune, but Cardale paid little attention. He wasn’t even curious. Had it not been for today, he wouldn’t have cared at all.

 

Yes, if it hadn’t been for the woman who stood by Raymond Hartmann’s side.

 

Elise Schuvan. A woman with silver hair tied up in a ponytail, showing off the white nape of her neck and dressed in a light dress.

 

Even if it wasn’t so, her white face became as white as a blank sheet because of the sudden appearance of the Princess. In the meantime, she seemed even thinner than a few days ago, perhaps because she had starved herself.

 

However, her teary, watery blue eyes still seemed like they could burst into tears at any moment, evoking a strange impression.

 

Perhaps Gerhard Schuvan was determined to find another partner to give his daughter away for a good price.

 

If he didn’t like the idea, he would swiftly withdraw and move on to the next opportunity like an opportunist. It wasn’t unexpected.

 

‘So, the one you chose is Raymond Hartmann.’


He was a stereotypical figure. A person who has probably never gone against the will of his parents and has never strayed from the road laid in front of him.

 

[“As Your Highness knows, for a lady who has just made her debut in high society, every day is precious time.”]

 

[“I’m merely suggesting that taking away such opportunities would be too cruel.”]

 

Still, he showed commendable courage to stand before the Princess and support the woman beside him.

 

“It wasn’t worth it.”

 

Cardale acknowledged that the woman stood out, whether in a positive or negative way.

 

So she aroused curiosity in him, but that was it. He quickly lost interest and let it go.

 

However, seeing her going around, trying to meet a decent man for her purpose, was amusing.

 

In a way, it was normal. There must be a desire for a rise in status.

 

Moreover, if she wanted to hide her humble origin, it was even more necessary.

 

Suddenly, looking at the two of them alternately, the Princess’ words about those two echoed as if they were digging into his head.

 

[“Then, I hope the two of you will have a good time.”]

 

Nonsense.

 

Unless Raymond Hartmann was an idiot, there was no way he would choose a woman who would be of no use to the family.

 

Contrary to their noble appearance, in the world, there were people with nasty, wicked intentions all over the world, and hypocrites often wore pleasant faces.

 

Noble men who saw poorly regarded women as temporary playthings in marriage were common.

 

Cardale very naturally sold the Little Marquis as one of those clans.

 

Yet, he still felt uneasy. He couldn’t understand why he felt guilty despite making that classification.

 

‘There’s nothing I like about her.’

 

For some reason, his judgment was even more distorted.

 

The Duke’s ferocious gaze returned to the reindeer.

 

He strode over and grabbed the reindeer by the neck. The knuckles of his fingers, which he gripped so viciously, turned white. He pulled the reindeer’s neck out of the wall at once.

 

If it was really alive, blood would have poured out like a fountain, but a dead animal could not show such a miracle.

 

“Your Grace?”

 

Michael, who entered the office just in time, stood still, surprised by his master’s actions.

 

Cardale said, holding the stuffed reindeer head in Michael’s arms as if tossing it.

 

“Burn it.”

 



 

The next day, a letter arrived at Count Schuvan’s residence.

 

It was sent from the Little Marquis of Hartman. The sender was Raymond, and the recipient was, of course, Elise.

 

However, when Vanessa received a bundle of letters from a servant who checked the mailbox every day, she went straight to Gerhard.

 

The Count casually opened the letter addressed to Elise and checked the contents.

 

“Looks like a pretty good harvest.”

 

He handed the letter to Vanessa.

 

As she read Raymond’s letter, Vanessa’s eyebrows rose unexpectedly and fell back.

 

“Do you intend to connect Raymond Hartmann and the young lady?”

 

“What do you think?”

 

After thinking for a moment, Vanessa replied.

 

“I considered it a great sub-optimal option.”

 

“So do I.”

 

Gerhard nodded.

 

“Even the Duke saw the Little Marquis and Elise together. I made sure they crossed paths intentionally.”

 

It meant to stir up competition. However, Vanessa wondered if such a shallow tactic had an effect on the Duke.

 

“Has there been any reaction from the Duke?”

 

“None. But there’s no need to read too much into it. Cardale Vassenberg is not someone who easily reveals his true emotions.” 

 

Gerhard’s lips were pulled tight.

 

“Besides, we have a good alternative – the Little Marquis, although he is not a Duke.”

 

It would be perfect if Raymond were Duke, but if not, there are other cards to play.

 

Holding such good cards in both hands was a rare occurrence, even in his thriving business.

 

“Give this letter to Elise and have her write a reply.”

 

“Yes, Count.”

 

Gerhard leaned back in his chair and clasped his hands with a relaxed expression. The cunning and greedy eyes shone meaningfully.

 

“Seeing someone else try to snatch the prey they’ve been eyeing, I can’t wait to see how the Duke will react.”

 



 

A letter and dozens of blank sheets of paper were placed in front of Elise, sitting at her desk.

 

“What is this?”

 

“I heard that you agreed to exchange correspondence with the Little Marquis Hartmann. Isn’t it?”

 

“That… that’s right.”

 

Elise reached out for the letter from the already unsealed envelope.

 

The neat and detailed handwriting caught her eye first.

 

[Lady Elise,

 

Thank you very much for allowing me to write to you. In fact, you don’t know how nervous I was because I was afraid he would reject my request. So I would like to say that I was very pleased with Lady’s answer. As I’m writing this letter, I still feel the same.

 

However, upon reflection, I worried that my boldness might come across as impolite. I couldn’t sleep, fearing that you might misunderstand me as a frivolous man who throws himself at anyone.

 

Of course, it’s not your fault, Lady. I simply reflected on my own actions, as they may have been enough to lead to misunderstandings.

 

You may not believe it, but I swear to you that Lady was the first person I ever asked for.

 

And, of course, I’ve never exchanged letters with any other lady.

 

I hope that my sincerity will be conveyed.

 

Raymond Hartmann]

 

Elise raised her head. Then, as if Vanessa had been waiting, she held out a piece of paper with something written on it.

 

“The young lady seems to be still having a hard time writing a letter, so I wrote the contents in advance to ease the difficulty.”

 

Elise looked at her in bewilderment as she read Vanessa’s letter, written in her characteristic old-fashioned handwriting.

 

“The person the Lady is writing to is not her business partner or friend. It’s a letter you send to a man with whom your relationship might progress.”

 

“But this is too blatant…”

 

“Letters between a man and a woman are originally written like this.”

 

When Vanessa bluntly affirmed, Elise couldn’t add another word.

 

In the first place, Elise had no standard for judging what was right for her. The rules of the aristocratic society were so many and detailed that there was no end to learning and mastering them.

 

“Did you practice your penmanship a lot?”

 

“I’m doing a little bit every day.”

 

“Try copying it.”

 

Elise started copying the content Vanessa had given her onto a new piece of paper.

 

However, before she even finished one sentence, Vanessa pointed out.

 

“The letters are not uniform. Didn’t I tell you you should always write the same size?”

 

In fact, Elise’s handwriting was almost perfect, akin to a skilled professional. Thanks to countless practices and efforts, her handwriting was neat and beautiful.

 

Had others seen it, they would have praised her for its elegance and softness.

 

But Elise, swayed by Vanessa’s criticism, still believed her handwriting was like that of a child practising.

 

“Write it again.”

 

The old paper was removed, and a new one was placed again.

 

Elise picked up the quill again and carefully wrote down the words. However, the return this time was a sharp criticism.

 

“Is this what you call handwriting?”

 

Elise was startled as Vanessa looked down at her with young eyes of contempt.

 

“I-I’m sorry.”

 

“At this rate, you’ll waste precious paper and still not write a proper letter.”

 

Vanessa snarled in an overbearing tone and snatched the paper.

 

Elise bit her lip to hold back the urge to burst into tears.

 

‘Why can’t I do any better?’

 

She hated herself for being pathetic and stupid, just like Vanessa said. No matter how hard she tried, her skills didn’t improve, so she always felt miserable and frustrated.

 

“You’ve been taught for a year, and by now, you should be able to do it properly. Perhaps it would be better to tell the Count to give up the young Lady instead.”

 

“T-That’s not true!”

 

Elise, startled, exclaimed.

 

When her own use was gone, her mother’s treatment would cease immediately. She had to stop it from happening no matter what.

 

She frantically shook her head, as if in desperation.

 

“I will work harder. I’ll practice more so I don’t make mistakes… Please don’t say anything to the Count, no, to my father.”

 

As soon as she used the wrong title, she noticed the fierce glint in Vanessa’s eyes and quickly corrected herself.

 

“If you give me the paper I ruined earlier, I’ll practice on it first before writing the letter. That way, we won’t waste paper, right?”

 

With her arms crossed, Vanessa looked down at Elise, who earnestly looked up at her.

 

“Well then, let’s do that.”

 

Elise let the several sheets of paper she had ruined fall onto the desk with a thud.

 

Vanessa spoke as if she had a heavy heart.

 

“As promised, you must have a satisfactory letter completed by the time I come to this room tomorrow morning.”

 



 

Elise stayed up all night, writing and rewriting the letter without even getting a wink of sleep.

 

The next day, when Vanessa came to visit, she carefully examined dozens of identical letters written by Elise and picked one from among them.

 

“This one is somewhat passable. Let’s go with this.”

 

Elise let out a sigh of relief. She was very nervous because she was afraid that she would be reprimanded for not writing anything properly, so she felt lucky just to have passed.

 

“Thank you.”

 

It was when Elise, who was relieved, managed to hold a smile on her lips.


“There is nothing to be happy about.”

 

Vanessa suddenly exhaled coldly.

 

“Isn’t it just that you wrote a letter everyone else writes, following what I wrote?”

 

Vanessa did not stop there and fiercely urged Elise.

 

“Is this all you’re satisfied with?”

 

“Oh, no.”

 

Upon hearing that, Elise quickly regained her senses as if she had been splashed with cold water and hastily shook her head. However, Vanessa didn’t retract the condescending gaze directed at her inferiority.

 

“Even if I put in bone-breaking efforts for your education, I wonder if you’d be capable. You seem content with being normal, so you are only becoming indolent.”

 

Since Elise entered the count’s residence, she had more than a handful of times she’d slept properly, but she didn’t respond.

 

She heard that other noble young ladies endure this kind of life for a decade or more. She couldn’t say she had worked hard since she had only experienced it for about a year.

 

“What exactly do you know how to do? Even now, I’m taking care of all the trivial things for you behind the scenes, am I not?”

 

Objectively, Elise’s progress and achievement were not late. It was a matter of her survival, and of course, she had been working hard to her death.

 

In fact, it was almost a miracle that Elise, who had spent most of her teenage years in the slums, had achieved this much in just a year.

 

However, Elise was unaware of this fact, and Vanessa did not intend to let her know. Self-esteem and a sense of accomplishment were not permitted feelings for Elise.

 

“It’s rare to see someone like you, who makes those teaching you feel worthless.”

 

“…I’m sorry.”

 

Under Vanessa’s harsh criticism, Elise’s head drooped.

 

Elise couldn’t even open her mouth and only managed to say a word that she would try harder in the end.

 

And so, under Vanessa’s watchful eyes, Elise’s hard work continued.

 

Several more letters went back and forth between Raymond and Elise.

 

Raymond always filled the paper with affectionate and witty words in his letters.

 

Even Elise, who lacked experience in noble society, could sense that he was an exceptionally good person.

 

However, writing letters was always burdensome.

 

“Vanessa.”

 

“What is it?”

 

“I’m not good at playing the piano, so if I write these kinds of things in the letter–”

 

“You should practice more from now on.”

 

Falsely writing words that she didn’t even mean, or lying about doing things she had never done, brought immense guilt.

 

It seemed that she had become a shameless liar.

 

So every time Elise wrote a letter to Raymond, her heart was in agony.

 

As her impression of Raymond became more and more friendly, she couldn’t shake the idea that he was a person living in a different world from her.

 



 

Then one day, a different letter arrived from the Marquis of Hartmann.

 

It was the same that the Marquis family crest was stamped on it, but the colour of the envelope was light pink, unlike the one Raymond had sent.

 

Before even opening the seal on the letter Elise received from Vanessa, Gerhard had a smile on his lips.

 

As he expected, it was not Raymond Hartman who sent the letter. Gerhard set the invitation down open on the desk.

 

“A tea party invitation from Marchioness Hartmann.”

 

Taking out a cigar from the top-notch mahogany humidor, Gerhard used a cutter to trim the end as he spoke.

 

“Looks like they’re finally starting to show interest in her.”

 

One eyebrow rose as he took a deep sip of his lit cigar.

 

‘It’s aged properly.’

 

With a low exclamation, he lit the end of his cigar and put it in his mouth.

 

The red flame burned slowly from the tip. The room was quickly filled with thick smoke, and the distinctive strong cigar scent permeated everywhere.

 

Vanessa saw Gerhard’s expression loosen up and said.

 

“It seems that the Little Marquis has expressed a fairly firm intention.”

 

“I guess so. I didn’t expect things to progress so quickly. It’s even better than I anticipated.”

 

The Tea Party hosted by Marchioness Hartmann was renowned in many ways.

 

First, she was a central figure in the social circle, and the invited guests were women from prominent families.

 

It was also a place that young ladies of marriageable age and wives of their noble families wished to attend at least once.

 

“The Marchioness hinted that she would at least consider Elise a potential match for her son.”

 

Gerhard said to Vanessa with a satisfied smile on his lips.

 

“You should take more care of Elise. In case she makes a mistake at the tea party, it’ll be troublesome.”

 

“Yes, Count. I will do so.”

 

When the determined answer came back, Gerhard nodded his head.

 

Everything was going smoothly as planned.

 



 

Elise arrived at the main gate of Marquis Hartmann’s residence and got off the carriage. The butler, who was waiting, greeted her.

 

“Welcome, my lady. May I see your invitation?”

 

Elise handed over her invitation with a trembling heart. Having checked the invitation and the name of the attendee, he bowed, giving his guest a courteous smile.

 

“I will guide you to the tea party venue, Lady Schuvan.”

 

Elise followed the butler, clutching her shaking hands. Her pounding heart felt like it would leap out of her chest.

 

[“There must be absolutely no disgrace to the name of Count Schuvan. Do you understand?”]

 

She was repeating Vanessa’s advice, which felt more like a threat, in her mind several times.

 

However, she doubted if she was even walking properly according to the proper etiquette. Even in the morning, when she came down the stairs, it was more so because she had been pointed out that made her more anxious.

 

The butler led her to the outdoor garden. There was a splendid gazebo with a dome inside the garden, decorated with brightly blooming flowers in spring.

 

Seeing the people already gathered there, Elise’s face became pale.

 

She came on time, but what if she was late, the fear crept in.

 

“Then, I will take my leave now, Lady.”

 

After completing the guidance, the butler stepped aside, bowed, and left.

 

Left alone, Elise struggled to control her breathing and cautiously moved her steps.

 

The first person to discover her was the Marchioness Hartmann.

 

The Marchioness pretended to recognise her first by approaching Elise with her brown hair elegantly styled, similar to Raymond’s.

 

“Lady Schuvan, you have come.”

 

“Thank you for inviting me, Marquis Hartmann. I am Elise Schuvan.”

 

Upon hearing her greeting, the Viscountess exclaimed with a small gasp, “Oh my.”

 

“These days, ladies who have properly learned etiquette like this are rare.”

 

After a slightly surprised glance, the Marchioness smiled and then led Elise to introduce her to other ladies.

 

“Didn’t I mention before? This lady is Lady Schuvan.”

 

“As I’ve heard, you are a beautiful young lady.”

 

“Nice to meet you, Lady Schuvan.”

 

The women watching Elise immediately noticed the Marchioness’ favourable attitude towards her and welcomed her.

 

The Marchioness seated Elise in a chair close to her. Since Elise was the last attendee to arrive, the tea party began shortly after.

 

“I prepared a tea that is said to be popular among young ladies these days. I hope you like it.”

 

Elise recalled her memories of practising similar conversations with Vanessa and recited the words she had memorised.

 

“The fragrance is lovely. I heard you have a great eye for art, but I didn’t know you also had a taste for tea.”

 

Then a satisfied light flashed across the Marchioness’ face.

 

“That’s good to hear. It’s been a while since an unmarried young lady attended our gathering. I was a bit worried about what young ladies like.”

 

After that, the party went smoothly.

 

Elise listened to the ladies’ conversation throughout the party, and sometimes, when they asked her questions, she answered like a parrot, according to what she had memorised.

 

‘Never make a mistake. Never.’

 

Even in the midst of this, she was consumed by the fear of making any blunders, gripped by the obsession of not messing up.

 

‘If I ruin the tea party today, not only will I be in trouble, he will not treat my mother.’

 

Although she had not slept properly for the past few days, she was too tense to feel any fatigue.

 

Fortunately, the ladies viewed Elise’s anxious demeanour as the shyness of a young lady and kindly overlooked it.

 

In fact, they all had the experience of being thrown out by unfamiliar environments or strangers at least once, and most of all, it was because the Marchioness liked the rather timid Elise.

 

In addition, when Raymond appeared at the end of the party, their guess was confirmed.

 

The Marchioness trembled with excitement upon seeing her son.

 

“Oh, my, our Little Marquis must have found it hard to wait any longer, I presume? Seeing that he has come to escort the young lady.”

 

“Mother.”

 

Raymond’s ears reddened at the tips, and he called out to the Marchioness as if rebuking her, but he did not deny her assumption.

“After the promised time, I want to take the lady first. I ask for your understanding.”

 

The ladies replied, of course, and Raymond extended his hand to Elise, requesting an escort.

 

Elise stood hesitantly, greeted the ladies, and walked out of the garden with Raymond.

 

As they distanced themselves moderately from the gazebo, he began with an apology to Elise.

 

“I apologize for the inconvenience. Were you surprised by the invitation?”

 

“Oh, no.”

 

Although she was exhausted from managing a strenuous schedule for the party attendance, Elise tried not to show it and nodded.

 

With a sigh that seemed to imply Raymond knew everything, he spoke.

 

“If her mother had known that I had invited the Lady to the tea party, she would have stopped me somehow…” 

 

“I’m fine, Little Marquis.”

 

Elise barely lifted her lips and smiled at him. Only then did Raymond put on a relieved look at her smiling face.

 

Raymond, who had been waiting, escorted Elise even to the carriage and called her to a halt just before she got on.

 

“Lady Elise.”

 

He cleared his throat with a somewhat awkward smile. Then, he straightened himself and asked seriously.

 

“May I have the honour of escorting you to the upcoming spring ball?”

 

“Ah…”

 

Elise’s mouth opened slightly. She was neither delighted nor surprised. It was because of what she had been warned about in advance by the Count.

 

“If the Little Marquis requests an escort for the spring ball, be sure to accept it.”

 

Like this, every time she realized that the Count was foreseeing everything that would follow, Elise became frightened. And her conviction, verging on indoctrination, that she must never rebel grew stronger.

 

When she didn’t say anything, Raymond asked anxiously.

 

“Do you happen to have an escort partner?”

 

“Oh, no.”

 

Elise, who shook her head and denied it, replied in a trembling voice.

 

“…Then I would ask for the honour of being your escort.”

 

Raymond’s face, anxiously awaiting Elise’s response, lit up suddenly.

 

“Yes, my lady!”

 

He smiled happily. 

 

“I will contact Count Schuvan’s residence soon. Please look forward to it.”

 

“Thank you. Please send my regards to the Marchioness as well.”

 

Elise politely bowed her head and then got into the carriage. She could feel Raymond’s gaze looking for her through the window, where the curtains were slightly open, but she pretended not to notice and lowered her head.

 

She was just uncomfortable with everything.

 



 

“It’s a message from the Duke’s castle that Madame is about to come to the mansion.”

 

Cardale narrowed his eyes at Michael’s report.

 

“It seems she desires to attend the spring ball.”

 

“Tell me it’s impossible.”

 

At the brief command, Michael hesitated for a moment before adding.

 

“Blocking her attendance at the victory celebration and now the spring ball will provoke significant resistance from the Madame.”

 

“So?”

 

But Cardale didn’t bat an eye.

 

“Isn’t this somewhat expected? Prevent it.”

 

“Your Highness, if Madame persists and insists, it will even be difficult for the Duke to stop her.”

 

“If she stubbornly insists on coming here, is there no way to deter her?”

 

Cardale twisted his lips coldly.

 

“This place is too humble to house my mother, so make sure to find a place for her to stay in advance.”

 

This time, too, the front door of the Duke’s mansion was made sure that it would not be opened to her.

 

‘Annoying.’

 

He thought… The things that were gradually gnawing at his nerves.

 

The aftermath of war, the greed of the Imperial Family, the blood ties, and…

 

Cadeil’s gaze suddenly shifted to a vacant space along the wall. It was where a once proud stag with magnificent antlers had been mounted.

 

The balance of the placed decorations disappeared, so the appearance was not very good. It would be better to fill it with new beasts.

 

But the man didn’t like it. Even the beast with robust and deep-coloured fur wasn’t quite to his liking.

 

Something similar, but a bit smaller and gentler, with lighter and smoother fur, would be preferable.

 

Thinking that he would soon have to go hunting for a creature to hang there, Cadeil shifted his gaze from the wall. As he turned his head, there stood Michael, still in his stoic posture, waiting for his instructions.

 

Truly, his subordinate was always steadfast.

 

“My mother remains consistent, now as ever.”

 



 

“She should simply enjoy her later years at a resort. Why does she engage in such unreasonable obstinacy?”

 

If that was the case, there was a need to firmly establish barriers so that unwanted individuals wouldn’t encroach upon his territory.

 

Cardale ordered Michael.

 

“Reinforce the mansion’s security.”

 

“Yes, Your Excellency.”

 

The social season was about to begin.

 



 

The maid measuring Elise’s waistline conveyed the measurements to Vanessa. Vanessa nodded and asked another maid,

 

“What did the young lady have today?”

 

“She had herring salad, a baked potato, and a piece of wheat bread with cheese.”

 

A slight crease formed above Vanessa’s eyebrow. She turned to Elise and remarked,

 

“You ate a little too much today.”

 

Although Elise had simply eaten what was given to her, she couldn’t argue. If Vanessa said it was a lot, then it was indeed a lot.

 

“Fortunately, if the measurements are accurate now, the dress shouldn’t be too tight. However, be careful not to eat more than you have today.”

 

“Okay.”

 

Vanessa walked around Elise, observing her from all angles, before standing in front of her.

 

“The three-day spring ball is the most important event in the year’s social calendar.”

 

Elise nodded. It was a story she had already heard from Vanessa several times.

 

“Young ladies at marriageable age have been preparing thoroughly for this ball. Over the years, they’ve honed their manners, charm as noblewomen, and physical presence. They must have learned how to behave.”

 

Compared to them, Elise still had a long way to go.

 

“Do you think you can surpass those young ladies, Miss?”

 

At Vanessa’s question, Elise looked down and twisted her lower lip, nodding slightly.

 

“There is only one weapon the young lady has to surpass other ladies.”

 

Vanessa slowly scanned Elise from head to toe.

 

“For noblewomen, beauty is also a great virtue. Like fair and delicate skin, beautiful hair, and a feminine body.”

 

She took hold of Elise’s shoulders. With a gentle but firm grip that conveyed strength, Elise looked up in surprise.

 

“Don’t forget.”

 

Vanessa met her gaze and emphasized once more,

 

“You must become the most beautiful woman on that day.”

 



 

“The Little Marquis of Hartmann expressed his desire to gift you a dress for this spring ball.”

 

Elise had no right to refuse. She wrote the acceptance letter as Vanessa had informed her and sent it off.

 

A few days later, boutique staff sent by Raymond arrived.

 

They laid out several sample dresses and dozens of fabrics, laces, and materials in a specially prepared room.

 

“Since the preparations are complete, please proceed.”

 

Upon Vanessa’s words, Elise rose from her seat. But suddenly, her head began to spin.

 

“Ah…!”

 

Thankfully, she didn’t fall, thanks to the chair’s armrest. The arm that barely supported her body trembled weakly.

 

‘Again…’

 

Due to the extremely limited food and tight training schedule that made it difficult to sleep properly, Elise had been feeling dizzy from time to time recently.

 

“Are you okay?”

 

Vanessa furrowed her brow and asked. Sensing a faint trace of annoyance in her expression, Elise quickly responded.

 

“Yes. I’m just a bit tired.”

 

“That’s fortunate. Since time is pressing to decide on various matters, please hurry.”

 

Elise kept dragging her tired body and followed behind Vanessa.

 

Entering the prepared room, the boutique staff immediately clung to her and took her measurements.

 

“I’ve never seen someone with such a slender waist.”

 

Amidst the admiration and compliments, Elise had to exert herself to endure the painful strain on her body. Following their lead, her movements felt as if her body wasn’t her own.

 

After taking measurements, the next step was to choose a dress.

 

“An overly plain design won’t do. However, something too tight or cumbersome would also be inconvenient. It should be elegant, dignified, and capable of stimulating the attention.”

 

Several dress designs were presented according to Vanessa’s order. She carefully selected a few, choosing fabrics, laces, and decorations.

 

“In my eyes, this one seems to suit you the best. What do you think, Miss?”

 

“…I like it too.”

 

Aside from measuring, Elise was practically unnecessary in this process. Yet Vanessa had her sit beside her and included her in every step.

 

As the sun went down and the people in the boutique left, Elise’s schedule was not over yet.

 

“You should write a thank-you letter to Little Marquis Hartmann and go to sleep.”

 

It felt like she was gasping for air. It was so exhausting. Elise clenched her lips tightly.

 

“You have to finish what you must do today to handle tomorrow’s schedule.”

 

Vanessa recited what Elise had to do in a firm tone.

 

“You’ve been practising many times, so it should be fine. From now on, lady, please write the letter yourself.”

 

“Yes? B-but I’m not yet…”

 

“Are you planning to keep relying on me to write for you forever? Isn’t it time to stop relying on me?”

 

Elise chewed on the inside of her lips.

 

She could write a letter, but that wasn’t the issue. The problem was writing a letter that Vanessa and the Count would want.

 

Until now, Elise in the letters to Raymond had been a perfect noble lady, an impeccable representation of a refined woman.

 

She had wrapped false content in a perfect package and sent it out.

 

But Elise didn’t have the confidence to write such convincing lies.

 

“I will check the content tomorrow morning.”

 

With that announcement, Vanessa finished speaking and left the room.

 

Elise, who had no choice, led her tired body and sat at her desk.

 

[Dear Little Marquis Hartmann,]

 

However, she barely managed to write the greeting before her hand came to a halt. She had no idea how to continue.

 

Elise stared at the paper for a long time.

 

It was when a droplet of ink pooled at the tip of her quill and couldn’t bear its weight, falling.

 

Swiftly, someone snatched the letter Elise had been writing.


“What’s this?”

 



 

Elise, who didn’t even know someone had entered the room, was startled.

 

“Dear Little Marquis? Hey, this is all about love now? Did you succeed?”

 

It was Fritz. Elise was so surprised that she couldn’t even speak and stood frozen, holding her breath.

 

‘How did he get into the room…?’

 

After Fritz almost used violence against Elise, there was always a guard in front of her door. But Fritz broke through the guard and entered the room without a sound.

 

Her heart pounded wildly with fear.

 

“Your master is talking to you. Aren’t you going to answer?”

 

Fritz yelled, glaring. Elise managed to respond with a pale, startled face.

 

“The Count has ordered me to write a letter to the Little Marquis…”

 

“That’s just an excuse. You actually enjoy playing around with guys, don’t you?”

 

 “Ah, no.”

 

“You’re amusing.”

 

However, it seemed like Fritz had no intention of paying much attention to Elise’s words.

 

“Now that you’ve fattened up and can live comfortably, I guess it doesn’t matter what happens to your sick mother, right?”

 

Startled, Elise looked up at Fritz. Her blue eyes, wide open in surprise, swayed aimlessly like a boat in a storm.

 

‘They said she was doing well.’

 

Clearly, Vanessa and the Count said so. But despite claiming Marisa was well, they had never allowed Elise to meet her mother even once.

 

The anxiety that she had been trying to ignore surged up again.

 

“Uh, by any chance, is… something happening with Mother?”

 

Elise’s trembling voice was full of fear that could not be hidden.

 

“Do you want to know?”

 

She nodded desperately, but Fritz’s face turned cold.

 

“Your attitude is quite messy. In situations like this, you should kneel down and plead like a beggar, shouldn’t you?”

 

Fritz tapped the floor with his foot and tilted his head slightly, looking down at Elise.

 

“If you don’t want to, you can give up.”

 

“No!”

 

She hastily shook her head and got up on her feet, stumbling a bit as she approached Fritz. She then knelt down in front of him.

 

“Pl- please.”

 

Elise eagerly looked up at him.

 

“Tell me what’s going on with my mother.”

 

“It’s late.”

 

But Fritz said with a bloody smile around his mouth.

 

“I’m already in a bad mood.”

 

Suddenly, his eyes went dark. Elise felt like she was thrown into the abyss, and her body trembled.

 

It was a start again. But Elise couldn’t get away with it even though she knew it.

 

“Please, let me know…”

 

When Elise pleaded in a small voice that seemed to be cut off, Fritz grinned.

 

Looking at his face, she could guess what Fritz would say next.

 

“Then crawl like a dog.”

 

Words she had heard countless times in the unforgettable past. To show up a servile and pathetic appearance.

 

“As before.”

 

And she dared not think of refusing, just like in her childhood. For that reason, the fear of Fritz imprinted in her memory was too great.

 

Elise touched the floor with her hands. It had been a few years, but the still familiar sensation gave her goosebumps.

 

Elise closed her eyes tightly. It was because of the traumatic memories of her childhood that she didn’t want to recall, gushed in like high tides. 

 

[“Do as I say.”]

 

[“If you don’t listen, I’ll tell my mother to go and kill your mother right away.”]

 

[“Do you think I can’t do it? Well, let’s try and see? Go wherever you want, do whatever you want.”]

 

Marissa, whose body was damaged, often fell ill when it rained, and the girl with a sick mother became easy prey.

 

Elise tried to hide from Fritz somehow but to no avail. The boy, who was too invested in the cruel play, had his servants look for her again and again.

 

On days when it rained heavily, his bullying became more persistent.

 

Little Elise would crawl on all four like a dog, and she would retrieve a ball thrown by Fritz, or her hair would be cut by Fritz holding scissors. Getting slapped on the cheek ruthlessly was common.

 

But in any case, Elise couldn’t show resistance. It was because of fear that her mother might die because of her.

 

Fritz, who knew her inherent fear better than anyone else, would make full use of Elise’s weakness, Marisa, for his amusement.

 

It was the same now that Elise had come of age as years had passed since then.

 

She felt relieved that there was no rain today. On days when the rain poured down so heavily that it shook the windows, it was difficult for him to stay sane.

 

It was then.

 

Raindrops began to fall on her head as he laughed at Elise.

 



 

Shocked, Elise stiffened her body while lying on her stomach. She managed to raise her head, which seemed to creak.

 

Then she saw Fritz with a watering can.

 

The stream of water dripped evenly through the holes and wet her hair, face, and shoulders in turn.

 

“Are you surprised?”

 

Fritz giggled. His malignant face was full of mad smiles.

 

“It’s a very nice look.”

 

A human who was good at trampling on a person’s life grinned like a devil. He turned around, twirling the handle of the dripping watering can.

 

“Thanks to you, I had a good time.”

 

Fritz turned his back. Sitting as if lost in her mind, Elise belatedly came to her senses and shouted.

 

“Uh, you said you would tell me what was happening with my mother!”

 

“Have you seen a bitch this big?”

 

Fritz twisted his face in annoyance and only turned to stare at Elise.

 

“How do I know how your mother is doing?”

 

There was no medicine for being stupid anyway. Fritz chuckled out of the room.

 



 

Elise stared at the closed door, then raised her body after a while.

 

Then she started tidying up her messy room.

 

She wiped the wet room with spilt water and picked up the letter Fritz had crumpled and thrown away.

 

After wiping her wet hair one last time, she lazily returned to the desk.

 

Picking up a clean paper, quill and ink, she crouched under her desk. She crouched in the cramped space and let out a thin breath.

 

Her physical condition was not good. 

 

She really, really wanted to rest for a bit. But…

 

[“If this goes well, you’ll be able to meet Lady Marisa.”]

 

Elise squeezed the quill with her trembling hand. It was the only thing she could do now.

 



 

The morning of the first day of the ball was bright.

 

As promised, Raymond visited Count Schuvan’s family.

 

The members of Count Schuvan’s family happily greeted Raymond as he got off the Hartmann family’s carriage.

 

He exchanged greetings with Gerhard and Fritz individually and then turned his gaze as if searching for someone. Soon, he spotted Elise waiting at a distance.

 



 

Raymond’s movement came to a momentary halt.

 

Gerhard, who confirmed that the two met eyes, called Elise.

 

She cautiously walked in front of Raymond. The man, frozen like a brick until then, managed to speak with some effort.

 

“With my inadequate imagination, I had tried to envision the appearance of the Lady, but to see you like this…”

 

Raymond couldn’t continue his sentence and sighed long before looking at her and smiling as brightly as sunshine.

 

“You are truly beautiful, Lady Elise.”

 

Elise, aware of Gerhard and Vanessa standing behind her, discreetly calmed her racing heart.

 

“I’m really glad to meet you again. Have you been well all this time?”

 

“Thanks to your concern, I’ve been doing well. And what about the Little Marquis?”

 

“Me too, but last night I couldn’t sleep because I was excited at the thought of meeting the lady.”

 

Elise smiled faintly. Even though she might be somewhat ignorant of the ways of the nobility, she was not oblivious to Raymond’s deepening fondness for her.

 

‘It’s something I should be thankful for.’

 

She thought to herself. 

 

‘It was rare to find someone who showed me such kindness and warmth. So I should…’

 

Then, suddenly, someone came to mind.

 

‘Ah…’

 

Actually, it was a strange thing. Even in the midst of a tight schedule, she suddenly remembered that calm face.

 

The overbearing atmosphere, indifferent attitude, and cold tone hardly gave an inch.

 

‘Now is not the time.’

 

Elise hurriedly shook her head to clear her thoughts and looked at Raymond.

 

The person she needed to focus on was this kind, grateful man right in front of her eyes. Elise committed herself to not forgetting that fact.

 

“Well then, Elise, I’ll see you at the palace.”

 

Gerhard’s voice snapped her out of her reverie. In front of her eyes, Raymond’s hand was stretched out.

 

Elise took his hand and boarded the carriage.

 

Contrary to its exterior, the carriage’s interior was decorated in bright tones. The recently changed velvet seats gleamed softly, and the beige curtains tied with ribbons on the sides of the windows had small floral patterns.

 

As Elise cautiously took her seat, Raymond settled across from her.

 

“Isn’t it a bit tight in here?”

 

“Not at all.”

 

While not overly spacious, it was sufficient for the two of them to ride comfortably.

 

“I took care in choosing a carriage fit for a lady, but I’m not sure if it’s to your liking.”

 

“It’s really… lovely.”

 

Raymund’s expression brightened even further. His bright green eyes, like newly grown leaves, sparkled.

 

Finding it difficult and taxing to meet his gaze, Elise looked down. The lace gloves on her hands caught her eye. However, the pattern seemed a bit off.

 

‘I think I chose the rose pattern…’

 

The shape swayed dizzily before her eyes.

Elise tried to keep her mind clear. However, the rose pattern took shape before her eyes for a while and then faded again.

 

‘I’m dizzy.’

 

Elise raised her hand and pressed it to her temple. But her blurry eyes couldn’t focus well.

 

“What happened?”

 

Raymond asked curiously.

 

“Ah… Looks like motion sickness.”

 

“Perhaps the road on this side isn’t as smooth as other places. The carriage seems to be shaking a lot. If it’s difficult to endure, would you like to rest for a moment?”

 

“No, thank you.”

 

Elise shook her head because she couldn’t be late for the ball. Fortunately, they arrived at the Imperial Palace not long after.

 

This time, Raymond got out of the carriage first. It was the moment Elise tried to raise her body after him.

 

Suddenly, her legs gave out, and her body staggered. Eventually, she lost her balance, stumbled, and plopped back onto the seat.

 

Her vision flickered between black and white. She struggled to control her breathing. But she couldn’t even breathe because of the tight corset.

 

“Lady Elise?”

 

Just then, Raymond, who got off the carriage, looked back at her and made a surprised face.

 

“It seems like you’re experiencing severe motion sickness from the carriage. Perhaps it would be better to rest for a while after all…”

 

Elise saw Gerhard and Fritz getting off another carriage through the open door. 

 

Elise hurriedly shook her head.

 

“Oh, no.”

 

She had put in all the effort she could for this ball. 

 

She couldn’t let it go to waste.

 

Elise got out of her carriage, straining her trembling legs. Raymond looked at Elise with a worried face.

 

“I’m sorry. Were you very startled?”

 

“No, not at all. But if you ever feel uncomfortable, please let me know anytime.”

 

“Yes, Little Marquis.”

 

Elise nodded obediently. However, Raymond still hadn’t moved his steps and was staring at her intently.

 

“Little Marquis?”

 

“Actually, Lady, I have one request for you. Would you please listen?”

 

She hesitated for a moment before answering.

 

“If it’s something I can help with.”

 

“Of course, it’s something you can do.”

 

He gave her a gentle smile.

 

“In the future, I would appreciate it if you could address me by my name.”

 

Elise was startled.

 

“I can’t do that. How could I…”

 

“I know it is my desire. But could you please allow me?”

 

In fact, if Raymond wished, Elise had no right to refuse.

 

However, she couldn’t get the words out. He was undoubtedly a good person, but they had only recently become acquainted.

 

Raymond noticed Elise’s hesitation.

 

“I may have been too hasty. I didn’t mean to put you in an awkward position, my lady.”

 

“…I’m sorry.”

 

“No, it’s not your fault. I should apologise for making you uncomfortable, my lady.”

 

Raymond made a slightly regretful face, but soon, as if accepting, he gently smiled.

 

“Then shall we go inside?”

 

“Yes.”

 

Elise accepted Raymond’s escort and entered the ballroom together.

 

The eyes of those who saw them widened. While Raymond’s appearance as a newly appointed marquis was enough to attract attention, it was Elise by his side who captured even more attention.

 

Long and abundant hair reminiscent of a shattered Milky Way, skin as white as snow, deep blue eyes as clear as a lake, thin shoulders, and a waist that didn’t look like a handful. She was like a figure reminiscent of a heroine in a myth.

 

“That woman from the last victory banquet…”

 

“Oh my goodness! Last time, she danced with the Duke of Vassenberg, and now she’s with Little Marquis Hartmann?”

 

Those who remembered Elise’s face were all exclaiming in astonishment.

 

“I thought about it even then, but even the greatest gentleman can’t help but fall for that beauty.”

 

Eyes filled with envy, jealousy, and admiration were fixed on Elise.

 

Elise, who was afraid of others’ gazes, involuntarily shrank.

 



 

Cardale attended the Spring Ball alone.

 

The Emperor’s shallow tricks didn’t work this time. After receiving the Emperor’s letter, Cardale replied that he would attend the spring ball, adding the following note at the end.

 

[Since we have to take care of the safety of His Majesty and all the distinguished guests present, it would be difficult to escort only one person.]

 

Thanks to this, the Emperor’s attempt to keep the Princess and the Duke close together for three days at the ball ended in a spectacular collapse.

 

But that didn’t mean Theresia had given up on Cardale.

 

“Oh, Duke Cardale. You are here.”

 

Cardale’s eyebrows twitched reflexively at the deliberately raised tone of her pretentious voice.

 

When he turned around, she saw a tired face.

 

“Yes, Her Highness the Princess.”

 

His greeting was as polished as always. However, his gaze was dry. No, it was hard to tell if he was even properly looking at her.

 

“It’s been a while since the ball, hasn’t it?”

 

“Yes.”

 

Just as Cardale briefly answered and turned his gaze, a woman who was almost as transparent as could be, delicate and small, caught his eye.

 

Before long, the expression disappeared from his face as he even checked the face of the man standing next to the woman.

 

Cardale’s polished shoe tip shifted direction unconsciously. Just as he was about to take a step forward.

 

Theresia stood in front of Cardale.

 

“It seems you didn’t come with anyone. It’s a good coincidence. I’m alone too.”

 

However, he didn’t pay any attention to the Princess’ words. To be precise, he didn’t even give her a glance.

 

“Where are you looking…”

 

Following Cardale’s gaze, Theresia turned her head, then quickly hardened her expression.

 

‘That woman!’

 

Theresia urgently turned her head and looked up at Cardale.

 

The blank face, devoid of any emotion, was still there. It was as if she were looking at furniture or still life in a house. 

 

‘Okay. It’s just a coincidence. That woman is just in the direction Cardale was looking at.’

 

But why did this ‘coincidence’ only happen with Elise Schuvan? No matter how hard she tried, there was no way to suppress the growing anxiety within.

 

The vague sense of discomfort she had felt was now taking form, gradually revealing itself before Theresia’s eyes.

 

Just in time, the song changed.

 

As the gentle melody spread through the ballroom, people began to pair up one by one and head out onto the dance floor.

 

“Duke Cardale.”

 

Theresia put her hand on Cardale’s arm, trying hard to suppress her anxiety. No, she attempted to, but it was unsuccessful.

 

“Wait, Cardale…!”

 

Ignoring her urgent plea as if he didn’t even recognise it, the man walked past nonchalantly.

 

In frustration, Theresia gritted her teeth.

 

It was unbearable for Cardale Vassenberg to turn away from her.

 

He was a man who could even discard his own blood and flesh coldly, and strangely enough, Theresia found his demeanour of not easily giving affection appealing.

 

She sometimes imagined the sense of accomplishment and victory she would feel when finally capturing such a man, and she felt a thrill.

 

But she couldn’t stand the fact that Elise Schuvan was in the direction Cardale was walking.

 

Theresia’s face contorted mercilessly.

 

‘It must not be. Maybe he has something to discuss with someone else over there.’

 

She no longer wanted to watch, even as she tried to convince herself that it was nothing significant.

 

The Princess turned and left the ballroom.

 



 

Elise bit the inside of her lip. As the metallic scent spread in her mouth along with the tingling pain, her clouded mind returned a little.

 

‘What should I do? I feel so sick.’

 

Her head was ringing loudly, and she felt dizzy. Even though she hadn’t eaten anything, nausea overwhelmed her as if her stomach was full and she was about to throw up.

 

Now heavier than before, her body struggled even to take a step. She squeezed her strength into her trembling legs. She felt that if she didn’t, she would collapse at any moment.

 

‘I have to hold on. Otherwise…’

 

Elise’s face was now pale, almost like a blank sheet of paper. However, due to her naturally fair skin, no one noticed her condition.

 

‘When can I go back?’

 

She caught Gerhard’s eye. The Count nodded as if acknowledging that she was doing well.

 

At that moment, the song changed, and people began to leave for the dance floor.

 

Seeing that sight, Raymond turned to her.

 

“Lady Elise, will you dance with me?”

 

Facing his kindly smiling face, Elise swallowed a dry gulp.

 

She was in no condition to dance at all. It was a struggle just to stand and support her body…

 

“I, I…”

 

But facing his expectant expression, she didn’t know how to utter the words of refusal.

 

‘If I refuse, he might be offended.’

 

Moreover, if her relationship with Raymond ended fruitlessly due to a misstep, Gerhard would never forgive her.

 

Furthermore, hadn’t she already turned down his request once before?

 

Of course, Raymond, who noticed her awkwardness, withdrew his request first, but Elise did not know he was disappointed.

 

It was when Elise pressed her lower lip tightly with frustration and unease.

 

“Elise Schuvan.”

 

Like a piercing note, the voice made Elise doubt her own ears.

 

Did she mishear?

 

But even so, the voice, so low and cavernous, was uncommon. At least, it was unique to Elise.

 

“Your Excellency the Duke.”

 

At that time, Raymond, standing opposite her, opened his mouth, and Elise flinched and shuddered.

 

‘It really is the Duke.’

 

The scent crossed the tip of her nose. It was a scent that was still unfamiliar to her.

 

“Can’t you hear me? Or are you pretending not to know?”

 

“Your Excellency, she-”

 

“Little Marquis Hartmann. I didn’t ask you.”

 

The Duke stopped Raymond from trying to defend Elise. Realising that she could neither avoid nor ignore the Duke, Elise slowly turned her around.

 

“I greet Your Grace.”

 

As she bent her legs, almost losing her strength and nearly collapsing, Elise managed to regain her balance and looked up at Cardale.

 



 

However, he just stared at her in silence. The piercing gaze seemed to see right through her, making Elise even more nervous.

 

Then Cardale held out his hand.

 

“…Your Grace?”

 

Not understanding the meaning, Elise looked at him with a bewildered expression.


Raymond urgently intervened between them.

 

“Your Excellency, I was the first to ask her for a dance.”

 

However, Cardale did not even look at Raymond. He continued to stare at Elise, making his announcement.

 

“Since I accepted it last time, so it’s her turn to accept it this time.”

 

It was a reasonable request. It was Elise who was caught on both sides and was disconcerted.

 

“Your Excellency! No matter how much you say, this behaviour is inappropriate. I am the lady’s escort at the ball today.”

 

Raymond blocked Cardale’s rude request, citing the custom of having the first dance with the escort.

 

“Above all, Your Excellency, the lady seems embarrassed…”

 

“The Little Marquis is misunderstanding something.”

 

Cardale cut him off.

 

“This woman owes me.”

 

“What the hell…!”

 

“And she has an obligation to pay me back for that.”

 

Cardale asked, meeting Elise’s eyes.

 

“Am I wrong, Lady Elise?”

 

The eyes that demanded an answer were quite ferocious. Elise couldn’t find any words to say.

 

“Then let’s consider it understood.”

 

The Duke, who had skillfully asserted his intent, clasped Elise’s hand with his large hand. But it wasn’t to the dance floor that he led her.

 

When Elise came to her senses, she was already out of the ballroom.

 

“Your Excellency, where are we…”

 

Elise couldn’t finish the sentence.

 

Suddenly, her vision turned white, and her body swayed. Cardale caught her falling body in his arms.

 

“Pardon me.”

 

Her blurry vision fluctuated greatly, and Elise felt her body floating. Cardale, holding her back and knees, began to take long strides.

 

Elise smelled the scent of a man digging the tip of her nose, even in her flickering consciousness.

 

The rich scent of leather, dry earth, and ashes mingled with the residual smell of burnt, fragrant wood.

 

The door somewhere opened roughly. Elise felt her body land on something soft. As she sank into it, her body slumped weakly.

 

‘This shouldn’t be happening.’

 

Despite her thoughts, she couldn’t find the strength to straighten her upper body, leaning into the man’s embrace. She had no strength left.

 

Suddenly, she felt the firmness of a chin and cheek against her. The man’s deep voice brushed against her ears.

 

“Don’t close your eyes.”

 

Elise tried to catch her mind, which kept sinking deeper and deeper.

 

She then trembled at the touch of his hand digging into the back of her neck.

 

“Stay still.”

 

Even if it wasn’t the man’s command, Elise was in no state to move. Right now, even breathing properly was a struggle.

 

The large hand slid down the tight corset and reached the bottom hem. She felt like he was grabbing the knot, and the feeling of squeezing her upper body disappeared instantly.

 

“Haah…”

 

Without realizing it, Elise let out a breath she didn’t know she’d been holding. As she took a deep breath, the fog in her mind lifted slightly.

 

However, her body, which barely found a way to live, brought fatigue that had been forgotten for a while.

 

Strength was completely drained from the relaxed body. Elise’s eyes closed.

 

It was Cardale who caught the woman who was collapsing.

 

He laid her unconscious on the bed and looked down at her. Her pale face was devoid of any colour.

 

“Stupid and foolish.”

 

Contrary to his relentless tone, it wasn’t reproachful.

 

His gaze fell on the flimsy muslin dress. It was a style that had been trending in the Empire for the past few years.

 

It was spring, but considering the chilly mornings and evenings, it was inappropriate for the weather.

 

Of course, Cardale had seen young women wearing similar dresses even in the dead of winter. But back then, it hadn’t caught his attention at all.

 

Certainly, he hadn’t known about the pain of tightly laced corsets worn beneath the dresses meant to make their bodies look slimmer.

 

The sensation that used to be unimportant suddenly became unsettling, bringing a strange feeling to him.

 

Cardale briefly looked down at Elise’s face as she lay there as if dead, then brushed her pale, dry cheek with his fingertips.

 

It was soft and warm.

 

It wasn’t bad to feel the soft skin pressing down on his fingertips and clinging to it as if it were cold.

 

Cardale stood still, savouring the sensation. Then, as if nothing had happened, he withdrew his hand and turned away.

 

His demeanour was as composed as when he unfastened Elise’s corset.

 

As he exited the sitting room, a passing servant noticed him and hurried over, bowing respectfully.

 

“Do you need anything, Your Grace?”

 

“Get some maids to look after the lady. A physician, too.”

 

“Yes, Your Grace.”

 

Though suspicion could easily arise from such a sudden request, the servant responded without question.

 

And soon, the servant returned with skilled maids and a physician. Cardale was still standing by the closed door, his arms crossed.

 

“Your Grace, I brought them as you commanded.”

 

“Go in.”

 

“Yes.”

 

The servant who sent the maids and the doctor inside asked cautiously.

 

“Your Grace, may I ask who is inside…?”

 

Instead of answering the question, Cardale gave other instructions with a nonchalant look.

 

“Convey this to Count Schuvan. Let him know his daughter is here.”

 

“Yes? Ah… Yes!”

 

As soon as Cardale gave the order, he turned around and left the venue.

 

Staring blankly at the back of the Duke, the servant quickly snapped out of it and rushed in the opposite direction.

 



 

It was the morning after the first day of the ball when Elise, who had lost consciousness and fell asleep, opened her eyes.

 

‘How did this happen…?’

 

Someone spoke to Elise, who slowly blinked her eyes.

 

“Are you okay, lady?”

 

Elise turned her head in the direction she heard the voice, and her eyes widened.

 

“…Little Marquis Hartmann?”

 

“Yes. That’s me.”

 

Elise hesitated and tried to raise her body. Raymond tried to support her, but the maids at her side were quicker.

 

“We will take care of her, Little Marquis,” said Vanessa, restraining him.

 

“Ah, yes.”

 

Raymond sighed lightly at his rudeness and stepped back. It was unacceptable to touch the body of a lady who was neither his wife nor fiancée.

 

“Bring some food that the lady can easily eat.”

 

“Yes, Miss Vanessa.”

 

“Also, tell the Count that the young lady has awakened.”

 

“I will.”

 

The maids slipped out of the bedroom. Vanessa looked at Elise and Raymond in turn.

 

“Well then, I will step out for a while to give you some privacy.”

 

Vanessa went out of the bedroom. The hem of her navy blue skirt was visible through the half-open door for surveillance.

 

Elise looked at it from a distance, but Raymond, standing next to her, spoke up.

 

“I apologize, Lady.”

 

Elise suddenly came to her senses at the sound of the voice and turned her head. Then she saw Raymond with a grievous expression.

 

“I didn’t know you were in such poor health.”

 

Elise opened her mouth slightly.

 

“I had no idea you were unwell, and I still had the audacity to ask you to dance. I must have caused you great distress… I sincerely apologize.”

 

Raymond lowered his head to apologize. Feeling uncomfortable with the situation, Elise quickly raised her head.

 

“No. It’s alright.”

 

Then, Raymond’s expression grew even more apologetic. He placed a chair beside Elise’s bed, sat down, and spoke concernedly.

 

“The physician has examined you and said that your condition has weakened.”

 

In an instant, Elise swallowed hard.

 

She had heard that being in poor health was a significant drawback in the marriage market. She subtly observed Raymond’s reaction.

 

He still gave her warm eyes, but she couldn’t be relieved. Elise squeezed the hem of the blanket tightly and forced a smile.

 

“I was just a little tired from preparing for the ball… That’s all. I’m usually in good health.”

 

“I’m glad to hear that, but…”

 

Raymund’s voice trailed off, as if he was carefully choosing his words, before he spoke again.

 

“I may be rude to say this, but you look thinner than last time.”

 

“That…”

 

“Are you eating properly?”

 

It was a question that struck a chord. Elise glanced at the door. This time, she couldn’t see the hem of Vanessa’s skirt. However, it was certain that Vanessa was still listening to their conversation from outside.

 

‘Having too much food can make you seem vulgar and unrefined. On the other hand, appearing picky and hesitant gives the impression of being sensitive and difficult to please. Neither option is ideal.’

 

Elise recalled what Vanessa had said, and she answered thoughtfully.

 

“I haven’t had a bit of an appetite lately.”

 

Then she added, thinking the answer was not enough.

 

“I tend to eat well. Really.”

 

Elise bowed her head deeply. She felt like she could say more, but this was her limit. Just as Vanessa had evaluated, her ability to charm was not expanding easily.

 

“It seems you were quite nervous about this ball. If you’re not accustomed to social events, it’s understandable.”

 

Fortunately, Raymond kindly accepted the words.

 

“Nevertheless, please take care of your health. I can’t imagine how surprised I was when I heard that you had fainted yesterday, milady.”

 

Upon hearing his words, Elise suddenly remembered the events of the previous night.

 

‘The Duke…’

 

Even in her faint memories, she remembered the touch she felt through her corset. A sudden warmth had spread across her back, which had been chilly just moments before.

 

‘…Did the Duke help me on purpose?’

 

Elise hurriedly shook off the thoughts that came to her mind.

 

‘It won’t be. Why would someone like the Duke be bothered with someone like me…’

It was just a coincidence that things turned out that way. Elise felt a little uneasy, wondering if it wasn’t just the Duke’s mood that was ruined by the annoying incident she had experienced.

 

“Lady Elise?”

 

“Ah…”

 

Elise woke up from her complicated thoughts and looked at Raymond. It was because he belatedly remembered the rudeness he had committed yesterday.

 

“It’s okay. “Please feel free to say anything.”

 

When she hesitated and couldn’t open her mouth, he helped her open her mouth.

 

“I was really sorry about yesterday. He also provided an escort… … .”

 

She followed the duke without even being able to ask for proper understanding, let alone dancing with Raymond. It was an action that barely occurred to her, but it was enough to be criticized.

 

“I’m sorry.”

 

When Elise slightly shrugged her shoulders and apologized, Raymond’s face darkened.

 

“No. Please don’t apologize.”

 

He opened his mouth urgently.

 

“The reason I couldn’t protect you was actually…”

 

However, Raymond could not finish speaking and roughly brushed his face. Elise could barely hear his uneven breathing. His eyebrows were furrowed, and he seemed a little angry.

 

“Little Marquis.”

 

When Elise cautiously called out to him, Raymond suddenly came to his senses. When he saw her blue eyes shaking slightly with anxiety, he quickly gathered his emotions.

 

“Lady Elise.”

 

Raymond placed his hand on the back of her weak hand. Elise flinched even though his touch was gently touching her as if comforting her.

 

“I absolutely do not blame you. Because that was my fault too. No, it’s all my fault.”

 

“But…”

 

“So, there’s no need for you to apologize or feel sorry.”

 

Raymond said firmly.

 

“Could you please do that?”

 

His affectionate green eyes awaited her response.

 

‘Why so much…’

 

It was a consideration that went beyond the limit. Elise hesitated and nodded her head at his kindness, which she did not even dare to refuse.

 

“Thank you, MiladyLady.”

 

Raymond’s lips drew a soft line.

 

‘You don’t have to do this.’

 

It was when the uncomfortable emotions she had forcibly suppressed began to resurface gradually.

 

“I will do my best to ensure that something like this never happens again, MiladyLady.”

 

Elise raised her head and saw Raymond with a stronger expression in her eyes. He looked resolute, like someone who had made a firm decision.

 

“I will do my best to be a trustworthy man so that you can rely on me.”

 

He said, locking eyes with Elise. It was a tone that felt like a confession to the other person or a promise to oneself.

 

Elise couldn’t say anything and just looked at him with trembling eyes.

 

“Lady Elise.”

 

Luckily for Elise, Vanessa called her just then.

 

“Ah, it looks like the maids brought the meal.”

 

Raymond stood up with a look of regret on his face. Vanessa suggested to him as he entered her room.

 

“The Count is waiting. The butler will escort you to the reception room.”

 

“Thank you.”

 

He nodded at Vanessa and looked back at Elise.

 

“I will contact you again soon. I wish you a speedy recovery.”

 

“Thank you, Little Marquis, please take care, too.”

 

Raymond took Elise’s hand in his, kissed the back of her hand politely, and left the room.

 

Once the door was closed, Vanessa instructed her maids.

 

“Don’t delay, hurry up.”

 

“Yes, Vanessa.”

 

A meal was served on the bed tray. It was a soup with a savory smell, soft bread, and a salad with salmon.

 

Elise looked at Vanessa, surprised by the larger portion than usual.

 

“You can eat it. You don’t have to attend the dance today or tomorrow.”

 

Vanessa said as she came over and sat down by the bedside. This was where Raymond had been sitting just a moment ago.

 

“You did really well, Lady Elise.”

 

Elise’s eyes widened at Vanessa’s unexpected compliment.

 

“Thanks to your good performance, the timing might be moved up sooner than expected.”

 

“Moved up in timing…?”

 

“Your marriage, MiladyLady.”

 

Vanessa replied, tugging at the corner of her mouth.

 

“If my guess is correct, Little Marquis Hartman will soon send you a marriage proposal.”

 



 

“It is only a matter of time before the Little Marquis ascends to the rank of Marquis. Naturally, you will also become the Marchioness.”

 

“…Yes.”

 

Elise answered reluctantly. Vanessa, seeing her darkened face, whispered to Elise.

 

“Once you become Marchioness, you’ll receive all the rewards for the efforts you’ve made so far.”

 

It was as if she was explaining the value of precious jewels to a child who could not recognize them.

 

“And what about it? Marissa’s treatment and quality of life will also improve much more than now.”

 

When Vanessa mentioned her mother’s name, Elise’s blue eyes, which had lost their luster as if she was dying, began to glow slightly and waver.

 

Seeing her reaction the same way as it was a year ago and now, Vanessa pulled the corner of her mouth and continued.

 

“Of course, no one can stop the Marchioness from seeing her mother freely.”

 

“Is that true?”

 

And… Elise took the bait.

 

“Yes. You can meet your mother whenever you want. Perhaps she could stay with the Marquis?”

 

It was a blatant lie, but Vanessa calmly deceived Elise.

 

For the sake of her own goals, she could tell lies as easily as spitting.

 

“It’s not much longer now, Lady Elise.”

 

Vanessa put the spoon in Elise’s hand. The soup, which had been steaming hot, had now cooled down just right.

 

“You just have to hold on a little longer. Then everything will be fine. You understand, right?”

 



 

A few days later, Elise had recovered.

 

She then informed Raymont of her recovery, to which he promptly sent a reply congratulating her.

 

Then, one day, a few days later, Raymond visited the Count’s residence.

 

He came to visit Elise and was holding a bouquet of flowers. It was a vibrant bouquet of spring flowers woven together.

 

“I received the news in a letter, but I can’t tell you how happy I am to see you in such good condition with my own eyes.”

 

Raymond handed Elise a bouquet of flowers.

 

“This is a bouquet made from flowers chosen from the garden of Hartman Mansion. I hope you like it.”

 

“Thank you. It’s really pretty.”

 

After receiving the bouquet, Elise looked at Raymond. The mood he gave off felt different today.

 

His attire was slightly different. He was always neatly dressed, but today, his clothes were more ornately adorned, and his hair was neatly combed.

 

“I came here today because I have something I really want to say to you today, MiladyLady.”

 

For some reason, those words made Elise feel sick to her stomach.

 

“…What do you have to say?”

 

Then Raymond’s soft eyes looked at her for a moment. He was sweet and kind, but his eyes were somehow difficult to face.

 

“I couldn’t take my eyes off you from the first time I saw you.”

 

Thud. Elise’s heart sank. She thought she knew what Raymond was trying to say.

 

“I have never seen anyone like you in my life. You are the only person I always want to see, to be with, and share everything I have.”

 

Elise realized. That now was the moment when she was given the ‘reward’ for the work she worked so hard for.

 

However, the emotions she felt were neither excitement nor joy. It was the fear of something inevitable about to happen.

 

“The more I got to know you, the deeper my feelings grew.”

 

Raymond knelt down on one knee in front of her. Then he looked up at her and asked.

 

“Will you marry me?”

 

His eyes, full of sincerity, were focused solely on Elise. Elise looked at Raymond with a confused look on her face.

 

‘How can he be so certain?’

 

While closer than before, Elise still found him difficult.

 

“I understand. You must be very surprised.”

 

“Little Marquis, I…”

 

“You don’t have to answer right now. But if you give me a chance…”

 

Raymond paused for a moment and then spoke again.

 

“I swear I will be a good husband.”

 



 

Strangely, she was speechless. There was no immediate answer.

 

At that moment, Vanessa called her.

 

“Lady Elise.”

 

It was a push, urging her to accept the proposal rather than do anything else.

 

Elise looked at Raymond again. He still had a warm smile on his face.

 

‘It will be fine. For my mother’s sake, it is right for her to marry this person.’

 

Elise tried to respond, pursing her lips several times. But for some reason, the words agreeing to the proposal didn’t come out.

 

So she nodded her head, her mouth not opening at all.

 

“Elise!”

 

Joy appeared on Raymond’s face. He sprang up from his seat and took Elise’s hands.

 

“Thank you! Thank you so much!!”

 

He had the happiest face Elise had ever seen.

 

In his earnest countenance and kind green eyes, she could feel his sincerity.

 

‘He’s truly a good person…’

 

He was too much for her.

 

‘But why am I not happy?’

 

She felt overwhelming guilt for delaying her happiness with an overwhelming sense of guilt.

 

Raymond said as if he was making a promise, giving strength to her hand.

 

“I will do better in the future so you don’t regret choosing me.”

 

Elise, still unable to find her voice, could only muster a faint smile in response.


Cardale visited the Imperial Palace. He was there to report the progress of his work to the Emperor.

 

“This is a list of nobles whose whereabouts have been unclear over the past few years.”

 

Emperor Johann looked through the papers handed over by Cardale. Cardale continued speaking to the Emperor, who was reading the document.

 

“If you investigate one by one, you will discover something. If necessary, a search of the entire family is an option.”

 

“Duke.”

 

Johann put down the papers and opened his mouth.

 

“Without concrete evidence, this is a difficult method to execute forcibly. If proven otherwise, it might give grounds for attacks against the royal family instead.”

 

Cardale’s face turned cold.

 

“Wasn’t uncovering the traitors who stole Nordrath’s confidential information the most urgent matter? Your Majesty, you emphasized the urgency of this matter.”

 

Then, it was Johann who became anxious.

 

It hasn’t been long since the war ended, as I’m sure the Duke is well aware. Both the common folk and the nobility are exhausted. That’s why intentionally allowing gatherings and parties were enacted. It will open up the national treasury in order to quell the opposition of the people.”

 

The Emperor tried to persuade Cardale by explaining the situation in detail. Of course, it didn’t make any sense to Cardale.

 

After listening quietly to Johann’s baseless excuse, he opened his mouth.

 

“I understand your intentions very well. For the time being, let’s keep the investigation discreet from our end.”

 

When Cardale seemed to take a step back, Johann was pleased.

 

“Thank you for understanding…”

 

“So, as you say.”

 

Cardale spoke, interrupting the Emperor.

 

“According to His Majesty, isn’t this an investigation that should be conducted as secretly as possible? If this information leaks out, it will be a huge burden to Your Majesty and the Imperial Family, so we need to strengthen security.”

 

“Well… Yes.”

 

Johann, who felt somewhat uneasy, looked at Cardale indifferently.

 

For the Duke to intervene to such an extent was never a good sign. And his intuition soon turned into reality.

 

“I’ll make sure to report only when necessary from now on. After all, Your Majesty might find it difficult to move directly, and in case things go awry, you can take responsibility for any independent action I’ve taken.”

 

“Oh? Um… That’s true… yes.”

 

Johann belatedly realized that he had been caught up in Cardale’s rhythm.

 

With this incident, there was no longer any excuse to invite the Duke to the Imperial Palace regularly.

 

‘If Theresia finds out, there will be an uproar.’

 

Johann touched his forehead, remembering the Princess’s fiery personality.

 

On the other hand, it was none of Cardale’s business whether the Emperor’s worries deepened or not. He left the throne room, leaving behind the frowning Emperor.

 

‘Well, it’s rather for the best.’

 

Although the audience was bothersome, it brought rewards. Until a new excuse was found, the Emperor would not be calling the Duke for a while.

 

However, Cardale soon encountered another annoying person.

 

“Oh my, Lord Cardale!” Theresia called him with great joy. She quickly walked to stand in front of him. “Are you here to see His Majesty today? How can there be such coincidences?”

 

“Well, it’s a coincidence…”

 

The Princess looked fully dressed. She looked ready to attend the gathering; she was undoubtedly well-prepared.

 

“His Majesty is in the audience hall, so you should go in right away.””

 

Cardale turned his body slightly to make way, a gesture urging her to pass.

 

There was no way Theresia could not have guessed Cardale’s intention to cut off her conversation. She had no choice but to reveal her purpose.

 

“I didn’t come to see father, I came to see you.”

 

She seemed somewhat annoyed by his blunt tone, but Cardale’s attitude remained incredibly dry.

 

“I have no business to discuss with Her Highness.”

 

“Even though it’s an opportunity to hear the good news?”

 

It was an absurd claim. Of all the news the princess was involved in, there was nothing of use to him.

 

At best, it’s just social gossip.

 

“I don’t think it would be very useful to me. Please forgive my rudeness in leaving first.”

 

Cardale bowed politely and turned around. He planned to leave the palace right away before he got more tired.

 

Then Theresia spoke behind his back.

 

“They say the Little Marquis Hartmann is getting engaged.”

 



 

Suddenly, Cardale’s feet stopped. After reading his reaction, the Princess quickly spoke.

 

“You saw him, didn’t you? The woman with Little Marquis of Hartmann. Her name… It was so common that I can’t recall. I remember them saying she was Count Schwann’s adoptive daughter.”

 

Elise Schuvan.

 

Cardale chewed on the name that came to mind.

 

“She seems to be getting along quite well with the Little Marquis of Hartmann, and it looks like she ended up getting a marriage proposal.”

 

“Yes, it appears so.”

 

Cardale answered dryly.

 

“Have you given me all the news you need to tell me?”

 

“What…? Well, yes… that’s it.”

 

Theresia responded awkwardly to the attitude that seemed to show no interest at all.

 

“However, how does this news relate to me?”

 

“That’s just…”

 

Theresa, embarrassed, trailed off her words.

 

“I think you’ve finished what you wanted to say, so I’ll leave now.”

 

Cardale finished speaking politely and turned around. Because of his long strides, the man quickly disappeared from Theresia’s sight.

 

“What? Was it simply my imagination?”

 

Theresia was suspicious of Cardale Vassenberg because he had a different attitude towards Elise. But he continued to show an indifferent stance, making it impossible to grasp anything.

 

‘What on earth are you thinking?’

 

Theresia bit her lip tightly.

 



 

Cardale returned home to the Duke’s residence.

 

He was greeted by the butler as usual, and he listened to Michael’s report. From then on, he handled the affairs of the estate.

 

Like a soldier, his disciplined lifestyle was as punctual as always.

 

When Cardale got up from work, the sun was setting.

 

He had an early dinner and lightly relaxed his body, which was tired at the training ground.

 

The night deepened. Finally, after finishing his work, the Duke entered the bedroom. Just as everyone needs a certain amount of rest, the same was true for him.

 

However, for some reason, the light in the Duke’s bedroom did not go off that day.

 

Even until the night passes into dawn.

 

Cardale looked out the window at the dawning sky. The sun was slowly pushing out the darkness as the dusky light of dawn slowly peaked over the horizon.

 

He got up.

 

As he entered the dressing room, his gaze fell on a hunting suit hanging there.

 

He wore a white shirt with a collar and a leather vest. The pants, with a tight weave that hugged his thighs, were recently custom-made and of good quality. He wore black leather boots that covered his calves and a dark blue jacket.

 

Even the silver buttons were fastened tightly, and a man in perfect hunting attire was standing in front of the mirror.

 

The last thing Cardale picked up was a gun.

 



 

The groundskeeper of the Duke’s mansion had sharp ears. He heard the faint sound of footsteps while dozing off in the early hours of the morning.

 

Thanks to this, even though it was early in the hour, it was immediately clear that the person who visited the hunting ground was the owner of the mansion.

 

“Well, Your Excellency the Duke…!”

 

The groundskeeper came to his senses. He hastily put on the clothes he had roughly draped over his chair and ran outside.

 

“Bring the horse.”

 

The voice giving commands seemed similar to usual but had a chilly undertone..

 

The groundskeeper instinctively realized that he should not ask him anything.

 

“Yes, yes!”

 

He quickly ran to the stable. Then, without even having time to wake the stablekeeper, he led the Duke’s horse.

 

The Duke was still exuding a fierce aura, and as soon as he took over the reins, he mounted the horse. As he was about to head toward the forest, the groundskeeper holding the handle of the cart urgently asked him.

 

“Your Excellency! What about the rest of the workforce?”

 

The Duke looked down at him. It felt like he was looking at a mere object.

 

But instead of feeling shame or anger, the groundskeeper felt a creeping fear. It was a survival instinct in the face of someone with absolute power.

 

Just as he was regretting that he had asked a pointless question, the Duke opened his mouth.

 

“Don’t make a fuss.”

 

The groundskeeper hastily nodded his head and answered.

 

“Yes, Your Excellency. I understand.”

 

After hearing the answer, the Duke started heading straight toward the forest. The groundskeeper caught his breath only after the distance between him and the Duke increased a little.

 

He had a feeling that the weather would be forebodingly ominous.

 



 

Wolf, fox, wild boar… The hunting Duke’s posture was upright and undisturbed as always.

 

However, the face of the groundskeeper following him had already turned white.

 

Baang!

 

Accompanied by a sound that tore through the ears, the wolf fell. Its heavy body crashing onto the ground resonated through the woods. The unexpected noise startled the birds, making them flutter and take flight.

 

The Duke had just finished loading again and aimed at a bear. However, that position was not aiming at a critical point.

 

The gun barrel burst into flames again.

 

The beast howled in pain. The groundkeeper’s heart chilled at the horrifying sight.

 

The Duke usually shot only the vital points to avoid damaging the animal’s skin. But today was different.

 

The groundskeeper initially thought it was a mistake. But now he was convinced. The Duke was deliberately avoiding the prey’s vital area.

 

The groundskeeper turned his head without realizing it. Then, the carcass of the animal that was in the carriage came into view. Even in death, the eyes of the dead wolf were vivid with blood.

 

The groundskeeper turned his head again and looked at the Duke’s face. The beautiful face, as if it had been sculpted by God, was so peaceful that it was eerie.

 

The groundskeeper was horrified by this strange and destructive impulse whose origin was unknown.


BANG! BANG! 

 

The owner of the forest slaughtered the animals he owned one by one. The haunting sounds of gunfire rang like church bells in the once serene forest. 

 

The rustle of leaves gave away the location of a bear. 

 

Click!

 

The soft sound of the rifle reloading echoed in the silent woods. The bear looked up, not sensing the murderous intent a few feet away. 

 

He raised his rifle. The moonlight glinted off the cold metal, which contrasted the clean luxurious jacket that covered his arms. 

 

With a deafening blast, the tranquility shattered. The bear’s eyes, still open, slowly lost its light. It twitched as the blood pooled, painting the grass a deep burgundy, before its body stiffened.

 

The whole process unfolded smoothly like flowing water.

 

The groundskeeper’s cart creaked under the weight of the corpses.

 

However, leaving the carcasses of the beasts littered on the ground of the forest was not an option. The groundskeeper laboriously piled them onto the carriage, but the heaping mound of carcasses left no space for the bear.

 

Above all, the Duke’s hunting made the groundskeeper grow cold. The cruelty of the Duke’s merciless actions made his stomach churn countless times. The stench of blood that clung to the Duke despite his spotless clothes didn’t help.

 

The sight of the Duke indifferent and intense concentration at the carnage was bone-chilling and unbearable.

 

The groundskeeper was holding on by a thread, but he was slowly reaching his limit. He struggled to make a decision.

 

Now, can he go against his master’s will by throwing an excuse, or will he dare go against the Duke’s will by interfering with his hunt?

 

Regardless, it was a terrifying choice.

 

The big bear’s struggle finally ended.

 

Taking advantage of the opportunity, the groundskeeper quickly spoke, hoping for the Duke to put away his gun.

 

“Your Excellency the Duke.”

 

Cardale’s eyebrows twitched.

 

He was savoring the silence right after the hunt. His cold gaze turned towards the groundskeeper. It was a reprimand directed at the one who broke this stillness.

 

The groundskeeper trembled under the harsh gaze and repeatedly bowed his head. He finally mustered up the courage to speak up.

 

“T-the carriage… has become too heavy. It’s difficult to move any further. Please allow me to bring additional help.”

 

A slight annoyance flashed across the beautiful face that resembled an intricately sculpted expression of beauty.

 

Without looking at him, Cardale kicked his horse’s side and spoke.

 

“Do whatever you feel like.”

 

“Yes, yes! Your Grace.”

 

The groundskeeper bent down halfway to his waist and ran out of the forest as if running for his life.

 

The footsteps running at full speed were as desperate as a slave being chased.

 

Soon, the forest became silent.

 

Alone, Cardale suddenly looked up. The cloudy sky had suddenly become brighter. Sunlight poured in through the gaps of the thick trees above his head.

 

By now, it was time for the weakest animals to wake up and move around.

 

Cardale loaded his gun again with an indifferent expression. His movements were neat and without frivolous actions. He focused senses and slowly tracked his next prey.

 

So far, all the animals he had seen were not worth pursuing. They were ferocious and undignified.

 

The empty wall at the palace was suited for something more gentle and delicate.

 

However, creatures roaming at dawn were usually carnivores, and those at the bottom of the food chain hid in fear of the darkness, making them challenging to spot.

 

Even so, it was obvious that the keen hunter’s temper was twisted.

 

The animals were innocent, but since their delicate characteristics appealed to him, there was no mercy. Therefore, he shot them. Especially those with deep brown fur. None was spared.

 

Rustle

 

The sound of something stepping on a dry tree branch caught his attention.

 

It was a very small sound, but Cardale heard it clearly. Now it seemed like he had finally found the right prey.

 

The beast was getting closer and closer. It turned out to be a path leading to a lakeside.

 

Taking a few steps, then stopping, and repeating the process, the footsteps were incredibly careful, perhaps in an attempt to avoid being noticed by hungry predators.

 

But what to do now? It’s already a target.

 

Cardale laughed at the foolish animal, covered himself with a large tree, and silenced his movements.

 

Soon, a deer appeared through the bushes.

 

It was a spotted deer with white spots gradually adorning its body. If it were a male, he would have to hunt one more, but it happened to be without antlers. Cardale took aim at his deer.

 

He intended to shoot its vital point at once. Since he planned to mount it, unlike the others he had hunted so far, damaging it was inconvenient.

 

He measured his target carefully. His posture was flawless.

 

Now all he had to do was pull the trigger with his finger and it was done.

 

Just as he was putting pressure on his fingers.

 

At that moment, he heard another sound from the bushes, and something jumped out. The deer quickly turned, and Cardale’s aim was lost and the trigger was pulled.

 

With a loud gunshot sound, the muzzle flashes like flames.

 

The deer stumbled and fell. Blood flowed freely from the leg that had been shot.

 

However, Cardale’s gaze was not directed at the animal he was targeting.

 

A white deer with delicate leaves that had fallen on its nose and ears. 

 

‘A white deer…’

 

It was an adult, but it was slightly smaller. It had shed its fur, but it still had a long way to go before fully maturing, emitting a youthful fragrance.

 

The white deer, startled by the ear-splitting noise, winced at the sight of the fallen deer. It then let out a mournful cry.

 

Cardale realized that the animal he hunted was the mother of the white deer.

 

The mother deer that had been shot let out a loud cry as if telling its child to run away. But the white deer could not leave.

 

The sight of it circling around the mother, not knowing what to do, was almost pitiful and heart-wrenching. 

 

Cardale momentarily forgot about his hunt and looked at the white deer. The reason why he was so uncharacteristically distracted was because it was a rare white deer.

 

The fur shone silver as it caught the sunlight shining down on the ground. It was a color that stood out enough to be foreign.

 

The deer was indeed very beautiful.

 

However, it was a feature that would not have been advantageous at all for survival. The pure white fur was excessively noticeable.

 

Cardale was just curious as to how it was able to survive so far in this forest where the might of the fittest was the jungle.

 

Cardale felt a rare sense of curiosity. So he impulsively moved his feet.

 

At the sound of a tree branch breaking, the deer suddenly raised its head and looked around. Cardale walked out without making a sound. Soon, the deer and his eyes met.

 

There was fear in its big, gentle eyes. It was clear that the deer was very frightened.

 

Sensing a threat, the mother deer also let out a sharp cry. However, the white deer’s body had suddenly become stiff, and it was frozen in place as if it were stuck.

 

Looking into the fear-filled eyes, Cardale changed his target.

 

Something pure, fragile and soft.

 

The ideal prey he was looking for was right here.

 

With a click, he placed the back of his gun against his shoulder and took aim. The silver-furred beast belatedly took a step back. However, it still could not completely take its eyes off its mother.

 

It seemed to instinctively sense that if it escaped, its mother would become the sacrificial lamb.

 

The big eyes looked particularly moist. It seemed like tears had pooled underneath.

 

Cardale snorted at a fleeting thought.

 

A mere beast like this dared to…

 

He laughed, feeling a sense of absurdity. It couldn’t be helped. Giving meaning to the instinctive reaction of a creature, which was nothing more than a survival instinct.

 

I’ve been hunting too long.

 

The man who found the reason for his distraction aimed his gun again. He saw the small body twitching. Watery eyes looked at him.

 

Taang!

 

A sharp bursting sound tore through the silence of the forest.

 



 

Norman, the butler of the Duke’s mansion, woke up early everyday. Thanks to the diligence that was ingrained in him, his eyes would open on their own at a certain time.

 

But today, he got up particularly early.

 

He woke up in the still dark early morning, feeling somewhat uncomfortable, and put on his butler’s attire.

 

Now that I’m awake, it would be nice to take a look around the mansion.

 

The faithful butler soon discovered that the Duke was not at the house.

 

Is he hunting at this early hour?

 

Where there should have been a gun, there was empty space. It was common for the Duke to go hunting without saying a word, but this was the first time he had seen it this early.

 

Norman waited for his master to return home, feeling a bit ominous.

 

“Your Excellency is returning!”

 

Norman hurried out of the mansion and ran into the Duke on his way home.

 

There was a strong smell of blood coming from him. There were splatters of blood on his collar that he couldn’t tell what kind of animal it came from. He was a Duke with excellent hunting skills and never got anything on his body, so this was strange.

 

However, instead of showing his doubts outwardly, the experienced butler bowed his head like always.

 

“Welcome back, Your Grace.”

 

“Call Michael.”

 

Instead of answering, the Duke gave a short command and went inside.

 

The butler looked towards the forest again. The groundskeeper and servants were pulling carts.

 

“Butler Norman.”

 

The groundskeeper’s face was as pale as if he had seen something terrible. Instead of explaining, he stood aside and showed Norman the cart.

 

The carcasses of wild beasts loaded on the cart were full of marks of being hit. It was never a mistake. It was intentional damage.

 

“Your Excellency deliberately…”

 

“Be careful what you say.”

 

Norman cut the groundskeeper’s words straight. The groundskeeper, realizing his mistake, quickly shut his mouth.

 

“The population of wild animals has increased excessively due to skipping winter hunting. It is a necessary measure for the safety of the mansion.”

 

Norman said, looking away from the bloody froth that had accumulated between the dead beast’s gaping jaws.

 

“You can take care of these on your own.”

 

“You mean everything?”

 

The groundskeeper and servants opened their eyes wide. Then, they rejoiced at the good fortune that had come to them.

 

No matter how broken or damaged it was, leather was precious, and so was meat. They bowed their heads deeply and started pulling the cart again.

 

Norman, who was left alone, let out a soft sigh. He pretended to be calm, but there was no way he wouldn’t mind looking into the eyes of an animal that had died a horrible death.

 

Master…

 

The Duke’s composure was broken.

 

Even if others didn’t notice, Norman did. Behind his calm face, the Duke must have been harboring some scary thoughts.

 

What those thoughts were and whom the sharp edge of the duke’s blade was directed towards remained a fearful mystery.

 

His anxiety and worry caused wrinkles to form around the old butler’s eyes.

The next day, a surprising scoop broke out in the Empire’s social circles.

 

Someone, with a fan covering their mouth, had revealed shocking news.

 

“Have you all heard the news?”

 

“Oh, you mean that woman?”

 

Count Schuvan’s illegitimate daughter.

 

The daughter of Count Schuvan, known for captivating everyone with her beauty at first, then for her dance with Duke Vassenberg, and later for her affair with Little Marquis Hartmann, had once again left people astonished.

 

“They said she was a distant relative of the Count’s family, but it turns out it was a blatant lie.”

 

“In reality, she’s an illegitimate child the Count had through an affair with a maid, right?”

 

The voices that had found the right prey were filled with strange anger and enthusiasm. It was a low-quality pleasure to be able to chew and tear the girl’s existence to the heart’s content.

 

“How can she fool everyone so cleverly?”

 

“That’s right. I really thought she was a nobleman.”

 

“Her face is beautiful, though.”

 

“That face must have fooled His Excellency the Duke.”

 

“There was also a rumour that she was engaged to Little Marquis Hartmann?”

 

“I heard it, too. It’s probably just a rumour. Even if it were true, wouldn’t it soon become something that never happened anyway?”

 

A mocking laugh erupted, and a low sense of satisfaction spread among them.

 

Although it was a short period of time, the fall of a woman who had once made everyone nervous with her beauty brought them joy.

 

“Now, finding a suitable marriage partner will be difficult for her.”

 

“Just find a suitable place according to your status, I suppose.”

 

Someone spoke, looking around the audience as if seeking agreement.

 

“Isn’t that the right thing to do?”

 

No one objected.

 



 

Elise and Raymond’s engagement was broken.

 

Even after learning of Elise’s past identity, Raymond tried to keep his promise to betroth her, but ultimately failed to persuade the Marquis and Marchioness Hartmann.

 

In particular, the sense of betrayal and insult that Marchioness Hartmann felt from Elise was beyond imagination.

 

[Dear Lady Elise.

 

I’m sorry. I know no excuse will suffice, but I’m still sorry. I’m sorry that I couldn’t come to you in person and apologise.

 

My heart hasn’t changed one bit. My heart still feels warm when I think of you, Milady.

 

Yet, it pains me that I couldn’t keep my promise. My heart aches for not being able to be with you during this difficult time. It’s agonising not being able to ask you to wait for me. 

 

But I will not give up on you until the end.

 

So please stay healthy. If you need to blame and resent someone, let it be me.

 

Until we meet again someday.

 

Raymond Hartmann.]

 

“You fool!”

 

With a sharp cracking sound, Elise’s head snapped to her side. Gerhard’s eyes sparkled with extreme anger.

 

“How on earth did you behave so that you got caught, bastard!”

 

Elise lowered her head helplessly, not even thinking about covering her cheeks, which were burning as if they were on fire. Raymond’s letter was thrown to the floor.

 

As always, his handwriting was neat. And with that neat handwriting, he effectively announced the end of their brief engagement.

 

The promise that he will not give up is probably just a courtesy. If it were his sincerity, he would have come to her somehow and conveyed his feelings.

 

Elise calmly accepted his decision.

 

She should have been sad and distressed, but strangely enough, she didn’t feel any of those feelings.

 

On the contrary, she thought it was natural. Someday the truth had to come out. 

 

‘Me, a noble lady?’

 

Originally, this was something that could not have happened. That didn’t suit her status as a maid’s daughter—a bastard child. 

 

However, what Elise was worried about was her mother. She was afraid that if her engagement were broken, the Count would also harm her mother.

 

“Useless.”

 



 

It was a fatal scandal. In fact, the path to her marriage was practically stopped.

 

Gerhard’s gaze was cold as he looked at his daughter, whose value had dropped significantly.

 

“The only thing that could have been was an arranged marriage, but everything has gone wrong. Tsk, tsk.”

 

As Gerhard clicked his tongue, Elise flinched and lowered her head further.

 

She couldn’t figure out why it happened like this. But since the Count said it was her fault, it was her fault.

 

“Sigh…”

 

Gerhard returned to his seat and sat down on the chair, putting the cigar in his mouth. Soon, the room was filled with hazy smoke.

 

Elise couldn’t show any discomfort, even though the acrid smoke was suffocating her. If she did that, the Count, who was barely able to find a reason to stay sane at the moment, might turn his back on her. At such times, his brutality reached its peak.

 

Then, Vanessa spoke.

 

“Her identity washing was clean, Count.”

 

Elise flinched, even though Vanessa’s words were neither directed at her nor spoken to her. This was because the Count did not like unsolicited advice or remarks. 

 

But Vanessa continued calmly.

 

“There is no evidence left. It’s just a rumour.”

 

Vanessa declared. Initially uncertain in the face of her confident tone, Gerhard’s expression took an intriguing turn.

 

“If that’s the case…”

 

Gerhard frowned as if assessing something.

 

While the wrinkles between his eyebrows were twitching for a while, he suddenly burst into laughter. It was a really loud laugh.

 

“Are you saying someone leaked it on purpose?”

 

Gerhard muttered with a serious expression on his face. As the Count’s eyes turned towards Elise, she held her breath.

 

“Then, it’s too early to give up.”

 

He scowled, then abruptly erupted into laughter, now looking at her with a glint in his eyes.

 

“There might still be some use for you.”

 

Elise became afraid. Her fingertips trembled slightly as she held the hem of her skirt.

 



 

“Hey, Fritz! Here we are!”

 

Friends who spotted Fritz entering the clubhouse welcomed him warmly.

 

Known for his bad reputation and questionable behaviour, most people tended to avoid him, but Fritz didn’t mind. 

 

In fact, having fun with them often brought vitality to his boring and dull life.

 

‘Everyone gathered together quickly.’

 

Fritz grinned and naturally joined them.

 

He has enough money. This was because he received a generous amount of money from his father in exchange for giving up the first-round ticket to the last rare animal and plant exhibition.

 

“What are you up to? Bring the drinks right away!”

 

Immediately, expensive alcohol was placed on the table, and cards were handed out. Fritz quickly got excited.

 

After a few rounds, the glasses became empty. Men, already drunk, drank more alcohol and made more bold bets.

 

The cigars were burning so much that the faces of the people sitting across from them at the table looked pale.

 

Before he knew it, someone had a seductive beauty sitting on his lap, and he was sensually massaging her thighs.

 

The atmosphere became increasingly tense as they enjoyed entertainment without hesitation in a space just for them. Reason became clouded, instinct and desire reared their heads.

 

When Fritz’s drunken eyes slowly opened, and his mood began to soar, the men looked at each other’s faces and exchanged glances.

 

“Oh, by the way.”

 

Someone opened their mouth. It was to bring out the main topic they gathered here for.

 

“Have you heard a lot of talk these days about the illegitimate daughter in your family?”

 

“How could I not know? It’s to the point where I can’t even show my face because of this lowly bastard bitch.”

 

Fritz frowned. The unpleasant news reached his ears, suddenly diminishing the taste of the alcohol. 

 

However, since they were children of a fairly powerful family, it was hard for them to show off their temper openly, so he rarely showed off his unpleasant side.

 

“I know. You must be going through a lot of inconveniences.”

 

“If there was such a nuisance in the house, even if it were me, I couldn’t help but feel angry.”

 

The men quickly responded and comforted Fritz. They even filled his empty glass with alcohol. Fritz drank his drink in one go.

 

“Her engagement to Little Marquis Hartmann has completely broken off, so is she looking for a new marriage partner?”

 

“Well, I guess so.”

 

Fritz answered politely. Then, the men sitting around looked at each other’s faces and exchanged glances.

 

“Now that the rumour has spread, finding a good marriage partner will be difficult. Isn’t that right?”

 

The man asking the question was reputed to be a libertine. He had already been divorced twice.

 

The people sitting next to him were in a similar situation. There were those with sadistic tendencies, those who lived crazy lives with gambling and pleasure, and those who had three mistresses living off their money. The men’s faces were gorgeous.

 

Fritz ran his fingers through his hair nervously.

 

“damn it. What marriage? After all the rumours, who would want to marry an illegitimate child now?”

 

The men pretended not to know and spoke.

 

“Haha. But I guess there’s a mate somewhere somehow.”

 

“Yes. She is still young and pretty. I think I heard it from somewhere, but I’m old… Did they say she was twenty?”

 

“I guess that’s about it. They said she came of age last year.”

 

The men licked their lips. Dirty and vulgar thoughts swirled messily in their minds.

 

“Oh, wait, this is not the right time.”

 

One of the men clapped his hands together as if he had just remembered something, and then ordered a servant to bring him something.

 

“What is this?”

 

“I heard you were coming, so I prepared something special for you.”

 

When Fritz opened the box, he found wine from Roshild worth hundreds of gold inside. Fritz’s eyes widened.

 

“Are you giving this to me? Are you serious?”

 

“Yes. Isn’t it natural to give gifts to a close friend?”

 

It didn’t end there.

 

“No? Have you prepared a gift, too?”

 

“Haha. Looks like this worked out.”

 

Other men started making tempting offers.

 

At this point, Fritz couldn’t help but notice. 

 

‘What are the people sitting next to me trying to please me?’

 

He’d be lying if he said he didn’t like it.

 

And then a rather extraordinary idea occurred to him like lightning.

 

Elise. 

 

The most effortless way to plunge that wretched woman’s life into ruin. A way to make people live without being able to die, by rolling around in the mud miserably.

 

‘It’s a fitting ending for the daughter of a lowly maid.’

 

It seemed more satisfying than anything else, and he could also take his share.

 

“Your sincerity is appreciated. Of course, the final decision will be made by my father.”

 

Fritz grinned as he suddenly felt the taste of alcohol getting better.

The next day, as soon as Fritz woke up, he went to see his father, Gerhard.

 

“How about quickly dealing with that nuisance?”

 

While doing so, he listed the names of some nobles who had promised generous rewards in exchange for their marriage to Elise.

 

Gerhard frowned.

 

‘Hel picked the same boring and insignificant ones. His ability to judge people is only at this level.’

 

He had acquired a child from a mother of good lineage, provided the best education, and ensured access to only high-quality items. Yet, the result was this idiot.

 

His son was so foolish and incompetent that Gerhard didn’t want to admit that he was his child. Fritz was arrogant, full of vanity and greed.

 

‘It would have been better if I had taught Elise for twenty years.’

 

Gerhard did not hide his disapproval in his expression. But he didn’t want to start a petty fight, so he dismissed it briefly.

 

“Elise’s marriage is none of your business.”

 

But Fritz did not back down. He didn’t want to give up what was promised to him.

 

“I am my father’s only son and heir. Of course, I am qualified to be involved in the family’s affairs!”

 

Gerhard looked at Fritz. The gaze did not contain a single ounce of affection for his son.

 

He blurted out one word.

 

“Pathetic.”

 

“Father!”

 

“You come here with nothing but chaff and talk nonsense. The way you brag about being my successor is ridiculous.”

 

Gerhard’s harsh evaluation hit Fritz mercilessly. And that was enough to shatter Fritz’s sense of superiority.

 

Fritz shouted angrily.

 

“My father has always treated me as incompetent. No matter what I tried to do well, I was always disapproved of and criticised.”

 

Gerhard looked at Fritz, who was furrowing his brows and talking incoherently.

 

“If you had shown some real achievements, it wouldn’t have been like this.”

 

“Have you ever given me praise or encouragement? Isn’t this how I ended up because you always discouraged and scolded me?”

 

Gerhad clicked his tongue. He knew his son was pathetic, but he was becoming more and more pitiful.

 

“Don’t blame others for your incompetence.”

 

Fritz’s sense of reason was cut off by the cold-hearted, harsh words.

 

His face turned bright red, and he screamed.

 

“If you treat me like this, you will regret it later. How long do you think I will live under your shadow?”

 

Gerhard, appearing more annoyed than interested in dealing with Fritz, nonchalantly raised his head and pulled at his moustache.

 

“Don’t come back until there’s something worth discussing.”

 

The servants violently grabbed Fritz’s arms. Fritz resisted fiercely but was unable to withstand the strength of several men.

 

“You damn bastards! Let go of me right now!! Father! How can you do this to me?”

 

Gerhard didn’t even glance at his son, who was being dragged along like a criminal.

 



 

The doctor examined Elise’s cheek. It was still reddish, but the swelling had now gone down significantly.

 

“You’re almost healed. I think you just need to apply this medicine for about two more days.”

 

“Thank you.”

 

Elise said with a faint smile on her lips. A sad feeling appeared on the doctor’s face, but it soon disappeared.

 

When Vanessa handed a pouch she had prepared, the doctor bowed and walked out of the room.

 

“Prepare for a bath.”

 

“Yes.”

 

Following Vanessa’s instructions, the maids quickly moved to the bathroom. Following behind the hurrying maids, Vanessa spoke to Elise.

 

“You will take a bath first and then get a massage. Afterwards, you can eat and rest well.”

 

The voice reciting the schedule was dry. Elise looked at Vanessa and pursed her lips. It was because she still hadn’t been able to ask the question she’d been holding for a few days.

 

After some hesitation, Elise finally opened her mouth.

 

“Are there no classes today?”

 

It was a cautious question. 

 

Vanessa looked at Elise. 

 

The look in her eyes made it difficult to read her thoughts.

 

Elise swallowed without realising it.

 

“No. You won’t need them anymore.”

 

The response was hard to understand.

 

‘I thought I was only taking a break for a while.’

 

Vanessa’s words sounded as if there would never be any classes in the future.

 

It was a disconcerting change for Elise, who had to digest a certain amount of education every day.

 

Vanessa added stiffly, reading Elise’s expression.

 

“You don’t have to worry. What you have learned so far will be enough.”

 

“But even before that, there was still a lot to learn…”

 

“It’s okay now.”

 

Vanessa answered sharply. Then, before Elise had time to ask further questions, Vanessa looked at the bathroom and continued.

 

“I think your bath is ready.”

 

Elise was soon led by the maids to the bathroom.

 

They washed her body in the prepared bath water, which contained herbs that were said to help calm the mind and body. After her bath, she was massaged by the hands of the maids.

 

Expensive perfume was liberally applied to her body, and their hands were meticulous in loosening her tense muscles. They didn’t forget to apply the medicine the doctor had given her to her still-swollen cheeks.

 

Afterwards, Elise ate her meal with her back against the top of the bed, and the maids made room for her to rest. It was a luxury that Elise had never received before.

 

‘But why am I so anxious?’

 

It wasn’t a good sign that something about her was different from usual.

 

Inside her room alone, Elise curled up, swallowing her anxiety.

 



 

The next day, her cheeks were completely healed.

 

Gerhard called Elise and spoke as if to inform her.

 

“You have work to do.”

 

As if Vanessa had been waiting, she handed Elise a letter.

 

There was nothing written on the envelope. There was simply the seal of Count Schuvan stamped on the back.

 

“I will provide you with a carriage so you can go and deliver the letter yourself.”

 

Elise looked at Gerhard with a puzzled expression. She asked hesitantly.

 

“Well, I don’t know who I should be sending this letter to…” 

 

“You will find out naturally when you go.”

 

Gerhard motioned to stop talking unnecessarily. Elise could say no more, and she had to withdraw.

 

She immediately got ready, and just before getting into the carriage, Elise looked up at the sky without realising it.

 

She noticed that the sky, which had been clear for a while, became gloomy. It was a change befitting the capricious spring weather.

 

But Elise wasn’t comfortable inside. The anxiety that had been swirling around her for the past few days was growing stronger in her.

 

The carriage soon started running down a quiet road. It wasn’t long before Elise noticed that the road looked somewhat familiar.

 

And her intuition became a reality.

 

‘This place…’

 

Elise’s eyes widened as she faced the black barred door again. Her blue eyes flickered slightly.

 

‘I never thought I would come here again…’

 

The owner of this huge mansion. She never even dared to hope that she would see the Duke of Vassenberg again.

 

Elise thought to herself as she carefully held the letter in her hands.

 

‘Perhaps because of what the Duke helped me with back then… Did father send a thank you letter?’

 

Elise recalled the ballroom. No matter how hard she tried to erase it from her mind, the memory that suddenly occurred to her suddenly came to life and unfolded in her mind.

 

A deep, low voice confidently asked for its turn. 

 

Those large, strong hands that guided her. 

 

A unique scent that she smelled even in her faint consciousness…

 

“Miss, we have arrived.”

 

Elise suddenly came to her senses. She shook her head quickly to shake off her idle thoughts.

 

Then she got out of the carriage and was just about to start walking.

 

“Growl! Wrrow! Kkkkkkkk!”

 

With the barking sound, a large animal rushed at her. A wolfdog.

 

Elise was surprised by the sudden situation and froze in her seat without even thinking about running.

 

Meanwhile, the wolf-dog jumped up and opened its vicious mouth wide. Sharp teeth came right in front of her nose, and the hot breath of the beast hit her. Drool dripping from its mouth.

 

Elise closed her eyes tightly.

 

“Kagaeng! Kang! Caiang…”

 

But instead of the pain and suffering she should have felt. Only pitiful, beastly screams were heard.

 

Elise swallowed and slowly opened her eyes. The first thing she saw was a taut leash. The wolfdog whined with white foam hanging from its mouth.

 

A soldier who seemed to be taking care of a dog hurriedly ran over and bent down.

 

“Sorry, Milady. We were training, and I accidentally let go of her leash.”

 

Where the soldier pointed, another wolfdog was standing with another soldier.

 

Although Elise was so surprised that her heart sank, she pulled the corners of her mouth and smiled.

 

“…It’s alright.”

 

“Thank you for your understanding.”

 

After another polite greeting, the soldier disappeared, leading the wolfdog away.

 

Even then, Elise’s heart was pounding like crazy.

 

If the soldier had been a little late, her entire body would have been torn to pieces by the beast’s ferocious teeth. 

 

Just thinking about it made her shiver.

Just when Elise could barely calm her startled heart, someone appeared.

 

“I’m sorry. I should have taken you right away, but something happened suddenly, so I made you wait.”

 

This time, a man other than the butler Norman greeted her.

 

“I am Michael Walter, the Duke’s assistant.”

 

The man introduced himself with restrained movements and guided Elise.

 

Still, she had been there once before and knew she was going to the same place.

 

To the Duke’s office.

 

Elise recalled the taxidermy that lined the walls. She even looked at the butchered animal heads and their impassive eyes without a trace of life.

 

She unconsciously lowered her gaze.

 

Even after their deaths, she was not confident enough to look at the remains of the animals that had not been put to rest. She wanted to face the Duke without seeing them, if possible.

 

Just then, the door opened. 

 

Elise strengthened her hand, holding the letter and entered the room.

 

‘If you go through the door like this, take a few steps, and then turn right…’

 

Before she could even finish her thought.

 

The moment she saw the black shoes on the smooth marble floor that should have been empty, Elise took a deep breath.

 

The tips of the shoes were smooth and shiny without a single speck of dust settling on them. The meaning it indicated was clear.

 

Elise slowly raised her head.

 

Climbing her gaze over long legs, she looked past the vest fastened tightly with gold buttons, to the cravat wrapped around the neck at a perfect angle.

 

Only then did the perfect face, like a statue of a god, finally reveal itself before her.

 

“Lady Elise.”

 

Elise, who was looking up at him blankly, then quickly came to her senses and greeted him. The man looked down at her with his heavy gaze and asked her directly.

 

“Why did you ask to meet me?”

 

“Ah, it’s just…”

 

Elise presented the precious letter her father had asked her to give to the Duke.

 

“This is a letter that my father, Count Schuvan, told me to deliver to His Grace the Duke.”

 

The man immediately broke the seal and unfolded the paper inside. Elise looked anxiously at the Duke’s face as he read the letter.

 

“This sounds quite interesting.”

 

After reading the entire letter, Cardale looked at Elise and opened his mouth to speak.

 

“Do you know what it is about?”

 

“Oh, no.”

 

Elise honestly shook her head. Then the Duke’s eyes widened, and his smile grew deeper.

 

The tension Elise had managed to suppress began to rise again. 

 

Thump, thump, thump. Elise’s heartbeat accelerated slightly due to anxiety.

 

“Then, do you have any idea?”

 

“Not at all…”

 

“This… I don’t think it was that difficult of a riddle.”

 

The man let out a low laugh. A soft voice continued.

 

“It’s because you’re so naive.”

 

The only one who didn’t understand was Elise. She looked at the letter in the Duke’s hand, helpless.

 

Her sky-coloured eyes were trembling pitifully as tears welled up. Cardale, who was staring at Elise, finally opened his mouth.

 

“I have heard rumours about you, too.”

 

Ah, Elise’s lips parted blankly.

 

“They said you are not Count Schuvan’s adopted daughter; you are his illegitimate daughter.”

 



 

“Thus, your engagement to Little Marquis Hartman was broken, and you are no longer in a position to find a suitable marriage partner.”

 

Elise lowered her head, not knowing what expression to make.

 

She was hearing the truth without any exaggeration, but strangely, her heart ached. Her dropped gaze wandered around the floor.

 

“But I…”

 

As Elise licked her lips, her small voice escaped. She wanted to give an explanation that wasn’t an excuse.

 

“I thought the Duke already knew.”

 

But what came out of her mouth was a voice in her heart that Elise thought she would never speak with.

 

“Where I came from… I cannot be a noble person.”

 

Elise sincerely hoped that the Duke in front of her would not know of her miserable and lowly past, but he knew. So she tried not to get caught.

 

Although she tried to ignore it, the truth was that she knew as well.

 

When she reunited with the Duke in the banquet hall after a year, she realised that he recognised her then.

 

Elise carefully raised her head and looked at Cardale. He was staring down at her without saying a word.

 

Only then did she realise that she had been presumptuous.

 

“I’m sorry. I made a mistake and said something rude to the Duke…”

 

“No. You are right.”

 

Cardale’s eyes sparkled with interest.

 

“I was worried this might be too boring, but it turns out that was a needless concern.”

 

“What?”

 

Elise looked puzzled after hearing the incomprehensible words. Cardale kindly explained.

 

“What Count Schuvan sent me was a kind of letter of recommendation.”

 

“…A letter of recommendation?”

 

The Duke’s lips twisted awkwardly. Elise’s heart sank as an eerie smile stretched across his lips.

 

“Yes. The Count recommended you.”

 

Suddenly, his tone changed.

 

“To be a maid who will serve me.”

 

“…!!”

 

Elise’s complexion turned white. She stammered as she opened her mouth, finally confronting the reality of the strange fear that she had been feeling for several days.

 

“B-but I can’t…”

 

Cardale’s head tilted to one side.

 

“Why? Isn’t it a very honourable position?”

 

If she would have been offered the position of the Duchess’s or even the Princess’s maid, she would have accepted it without a second thought. 

 

But Cardale Wassenberg was a man.

 

There was only one reason to bring a maid to a noble house where he had no female blood relatives.

 

For night service.

 

Elise said, unknowingly taking a few steps backwards.

 

“I was just told by my father to give this. Until I arrived here, I didn’t even know it was a letter to the Duke…”

 

“So?”

 

Cardale interrupted her as if he was bored with what he was listening to.

 

Elise stammered an answer, trying to ignore her heart, which was starting to pound with fear.

 

“I’m sorry, but there seems to have been a misunderstanding…”

 

“You’re mistaken.”

 

Cardale’s eyes widened slightly. However, his smile was far from friendly.

 

“I guess you still don’t understand the situation.”

 

He immediately closed the distance between himslf and Elise. Then he lifted her chin with his large hand.

 

“Your father is making an offer to me now.”

 



 

“He wants to sell you to me.”

 

The man mercilessly reminded Elise of the reality of her situation.

 

“And I’m thinking about accepting the Count’s offer.”

 

Elise’s eyes shook violently like a ship caught in a storm. There was fear in her bright blue eyes.

 

“That kind of thing… that kind of thing…” 

 

Her thin voice trembled terribly. The cold, calm gaze didn’t move from Elise.

 

“Did you really not expect anything coming here?”

 

“Ugh…”

 

Elise let out a faint moan as Cardale tightened his grip on her chin.

 

“Why did your father send you here?”

 

Elise closed her eyes tightly and shook her head. In the darkened vision, thoughts that could not be expressed in words swirled here and there.

 

‘How did things end up like this?’

 

Elise clearly remembered the first time she met the Duke.

 

A man who exuded a powerful presence even when she first met him. He was a person who naturally made her feel intimidated and small. The cold, emotionless eyes were a little scary.

 

But at the same time, he was a benefactor—the sole individual who bestowed upon her undeserved compassion and recognition.

 

Where was the man who helped a shabby and miserable commoner girl? 

 

Where was the man who saved the helpless woman when she was trembling in humiliation and fear?

 

The one who saved her life in a critical moment… Who on earth was this man?

 

It was as if Elise was seeing another person.

 

No, maybe this was his true self all this time. 

 

“I-I didn’t know.”

 

Elise gasped slightly and barely answered. She still had her eyes closed.

 

“I really didn’t know.”

 

There was no reply from the man for a moment. Elise barely held on to her shaking body and endured the surge of fear.

 

“I’m sorry.”

 

Without even knowing what she had done wrong, Elise begged.

 

“I’m truly sorry.”

 

“You make people laugh.”

 

The low, smoothly delivered voice somehow made her hair stand on end.

 

Eventually, her jaw was freed. Elise barely opened her eyes with her head down. As she grabbed her chest and tried to catch her trembling breath, she heard a cold voice that sent a chill down her spine.

 

“I don’t change anything once I make a decision. Are you confident you won’t regret it?”

 

That was a warning. However, Elise was so shaken by the situation she faced without preparation that she did not realise it.

 

Her mind kept getting fainter. All she could think was that she had to get out of there.

 

Cardale asked again, “Are you sure you won’t regret it?”

 

“Let me go back, please.”

 

Elise pleaded, nodding her head vigorously. After her silence for a moment, Cardale opened his mouth.

 

“Go.”

 

Elise still had her head down, so she didn’t know what expression he was making.

 

Yet, amid the chaos, the unsettling realisation that she had never before encountered a man’s voice like this lingered. Its chilling effect was so profound that it reached the point of pure terror.

 

“Th, thank you for your time.”

 

Elise lowered her head deeper and turned around. 

 

She then grabbed the doorknob, trembling.

 

Before leaving the room, Elise looked behind her without realising it.

 

The Duke was staring at her. 

 

His face, an emotionless mask carved from icy marble, revealed no trace of warmth.

 

So calm…


Michael Walter, who was waiting outside the reception room, saw Elise open the door and come out.

 

Upon observing the moistness lingering beneath her large blue eyes, he could vaguely guess what had transpired in the room.

 

He had to have known. This was because the one who revealed Elise Schuvan’s past to the social world in the first place, was Michael himself.

 

Even though it was done under the master’s orders, it was also a contribution to the downfall of a woman’s life, and he couldn’t escape that guilt.

 

That’s why Michael approached Elise with even more courtesy and gently advised her.

 

“I will guide you outside.”

 

“Oh, no. I can go alone.”

 

As if being chased by someone, the woman hurriedly disappeared.

 

Michael sighed quietly and entered. The air inside the study was unusually chilly, but it wasn’t just the mood.

 

“Your Grace.”

 

The Duke raised his hand silently to halt him. Michael closed his mouth and waited quietly for his master.

 

The Duke’s expression as he looked out the window was simply indifferent. Soon, he could faintly hear the receding cart wheels rolling alongside horses neighing.

 

Cardale stared outside until the sound became increasingly quiet and disappeared completely, and then he finally opened his mouth.

 

“Arrange a room for the woman to use.”

 

He added in an indifferent tone.

 

“Not far from my bedroom.”

 

It was a sudden order, but Michael was not foolish enough to ask the reason.

 

“Yes, Your Grace.”

 

Because he was simply the Duke’s loyal aide. 

 

It was not his job to judge his master’s thoughts.

 

“And there is a place for you to visit.”

 

It seemed like the gasping of an animal about to be hunted could be heard from somewhere. It was echoing.

 

But Michael struggled to shake off that feeling.

 



 

Elise, as if fleeing, rushed outside and was about to board the carriage when she grabbed the door and came to a halt.

 

‘Is it okay to go back like this?’

 

The voice of the Duke, saying her father sold her to him, rang in her ears like tinnitus.

 

Why didn’t she notice?

 

Elise very well knew that she would be used as a means for Gerhard Schuvan’s advancement.

 

Prepared to serve as a pawn in an arranged marriage, Elise received strict lessons under Vanessa’s guidance on the essential qualities of a noble lady.

 

The anticipation was that her true status would hinder her chances of securing a favourable marital alliance. However, this reality was more than she had bargained for.

 

It was only at this moment that she truly grasped the extent of her ignorance about her own situation – a hindsight that weighed heavily on her.

 

Elise’s hand slipped from the carriage door.

 

‘Should I return now?’

 

Yet, she quickly shook her head, dismissing the thought once more.

 

‘No. That can’t be possible.’

 

When Elise became part of Count Schuvan’s family, she undertook numerous preparations and made significant sacrifices. Despite these changes, there was one thing she couldn’t bring herself to discard.

 

It was the one and only wish her mother, Marissa, had expressed for her.

 

‘Elise, I don’t want you to live like me.’

 

To get married normally, have normal children, normally raise them, and live a normal life.

 

It stood as her mother’s sole wish, a poignant desire shaped by a life of humble circumstances and enduring criticism. Throughout her existence, the weight of societal judgment bore down on her. All because Elise, her daughter, was born into the world as a bastard child.

 

Elise blinked. She suddenly felt a stinging sensation, as if sand had gotten into her eyes.

 

“Lady Elise, aren’t you going to get in the carriage?”

 

Only after her coachman asked her incredulously, Elise came to her senses. But even after she got into the carriage, her worries did not subside easily. If anything, her anxiety increased.

 

Having defied the Count’s directive, Elise remained ignorant to the impending consequences.

 

‘What do I do?’

 

Elise bit her lower lip.

 

She couldn’t bring herself to accept it, so she refused. However, with things unfolding in this manner, she couldn’t help but be consumed by worry about what would transpire next.

 

‘…Should I say that the Duke had refused? He said he didn’t like me very much…’

 

Elise shook her head as a thought suddenly occurred to her. She couldn’t lie without knowing when she might get caught.

 

‘But if it continues like this…’

 

Elise guessed what was about to happen to her, and her body trembled slightly.

 

Without paying any attention to her feelings, the carriage was already running down the road to where the Count’s mansion was visible. Then, something caught Elise’s eyes as she swallowed her anxiety.

 

‘A horse?’

 

A big horse was tied ahead of the front gate.

 

‘Has a guest arrived?’

 

The Count had recently been doing a lot of business and interacting with many people, so it was not unusual for someone to visit.

 

However, the moment the door to the mansion opened and a knight wearing clothes with the Duchy’s crest came out, Elise froze.

 

‘How could that person get here…?’

 

He was the man who introduced himself as the Duke’s assistant.

 

Michael arrived much earlier than her, so it seemed like he had already finished his business with the Count and was returning.

 

‘No way…’

 

The moment a premonition struck her, Elise’s heart sank.

 

“Please look around before you depart.”

 

Vanessa, who had come out to see Michael off, saw Elise just arriving, and her eyes shone coldly. Elise took in a breath.

 

Michael also spotted Elise. He bowed courteously, much like he did at the Duke’s mansion, and quickly mounted the horse.

 

After he left, Vanessa slowly turned her head to face Elise.

 

Elise read the anger and contempt in her eyes.

 

“The Count is waiting for you, Lady Elise.”

 



 

An ink bottle grazed the side of Elise’s face, fell to the floor and shattered.

 

A sharp piece grazed her forehead and caused a small scratch, but Elise didn’t even feel the pain.

 

She was too preoccupied trying to guess how fast the man from the Duke’s mansion had come and what he had said. As a result, her mind was in chaos.

 

“What a stupid bitch you are!”

 

As the Count’s angry voice pierced her ears, Elise reflexively raised her head.

 

“What on earth did you say to the Duke?”

 

The fact that his voice was sinking meant he was in a state just before exploding. When the Count became angry, he became uncontrollably violent, which made Elise flinch.

 

She pressed down on her sinking heart with her learned fear. But she couldn’t help her trembling voice.

 

“The Duke- I delivered the letter to His Excellency the Duke.”

 

“And?”

 

“His Excellency…”

 

Elise was speechless for a moment because she knew that making excuses here would be of no use.

 

Then Gerhard spoke instead.

 

“The aide who visited a moment ago said that you rejected the Duke’s offer. Is that true?”

 

After hesitating, Elise finally licked her lips and answered.

 

“…Yes.”

 

“Why did you do that?”

 

This wasn’t about understanding. It was an interrogation. Knowing that, Elise tightly clasped her hands, which were trembling with nervousness.

 

“Father.”

 

Elise was scared… but she had courage.

 

“Please do me this favour. Please reconsider the task you assigned this time. I am willing to marry anyone my father chooses…”

 

“That’s foolish.”

 

But what came back was Gerhard’s ridicule.

 

“Marriage? That was only a possibility if your wretched birth was concealed until the very end. Do you think, given the current situation, that you still hold any value?”

 

He twisted one side of his lip.

 

“You’ve merely shown your true colours and displayed your greed; your value was originally nothing.”

 

Gerhard’s words became like a sharp knife and stabbed Elise.

 

“If you hadn’t caught the Duke’s eye that day, your life would still have been in a filthy gutter.”

 

That day. 

 

With those two words, a memory suddenly unlocked into Elise’s mind.

 

It was one of the few precious and special memories she kept.

 

Though it was tossed to her like a casual remark, it was the warmth of another person that she had felt for the first time.

 

Even that has now been marred.

 

“The Duke showed interest in a lowly commoner. Cardale Vassenberg, who has everything under his feet. Even the heavens.”

 

Elise’s eyes were shaking. She stuttered out her words.

 

“Th-that, you mean, right from the beginning, you…”

 

‘…Were you planning on making me the Duke’s mistress?’

 

Elise could not finish her sentence, but it was enough for Gerhard to understand.

 

“Isn’t it obvious?”

 

He answered her with a snort.

 

“Why do you think I bestowed the title of Schuvan upon you? You, born of a maid’s lowly womb? Did you dare think I did it without reason? Did you believe I would easily forgive the mistress and daughter who dared betray their master and run away?”

 

Elise was startled when her mother suddenly came up.

 

This was never a good sign. This was because he often lost his temper when he mentioned Marissa’s betrayal.

 

Elise hurriedly opened her mouth. It was to give an excuse that she repeated countless times.

 

“Uh, my mother didn’t mean to betray the Count. She was trying to save me…”

 

“Yeah. That’s why she ran away from me.”

 

However, the conversation took a very different turn from before.

 

“I could have brought you back immediately, but I chose not to. If only she had given up, you would have been able to live comfortably. But the sight of you both struggling to survive in that filthy slum was both laughable and lovely.”

 

Elise’s mind went blank as she heard this story for the first time. 

 

She looked at Gerhard with an expression of disbelief.

 

“Did you… know? Where my mother and I were staying.”

In contrast to Elise’s shocked expression, Gerhard calmly leaned against the backrest. Then he answered slowly.

 

“Of course, how couldn’t I know?”

 

A dull shock hit Elise. As if to laugh at her, Gerhad twisted his mouth and continued his words.

 

“How do you think a mother and daughter managed to survive life in a slum? How was it possible to live in a den filled with all kinds of filthy things without being raped? Was it just sheer luck that your mother could find some needlework to make ends meet?”

 

Elise’s fingertips became cold, and her stomach felt like it was going to turn. She felt like the blood in her whole body was freezing.

 

Actually, it was a question she vaguely wondered herself.

 

In a slum where many people were stabbed to death and raped, she had never experienced a major accident. Even though she got soot on her face every day, she never got into trouble.

 

Even though they often went hungry, they survived.

 

Besides that, there were countless other strange things. But each time, Elise deliberately ignored this issue.

 

Maybe she knew it deep down.

 

If you dig too deep, you may come face to face with a truth you don’t want to see.

 

“I mean, have you really never doubted it?”

 

Gerhard sarcastically sneered.

 

“Even if you weren’t well-educated, you couldn’t have been that foolish, right?”

 

“You knew, and yet…”

 

Elise touched her fingers to the lips on her paling face.

 

“…You didn’t help? Even though you knew my mother was so sick that she would die soon?”

 

Two eyes full of indignation turned towards Gerhard.

 

“Yes. It was intentional.”

 

But even as he looked at his daughter’s hurt face, Gerhard did not blink.

 

“Marissa dared to deceive and leave me. She, on her own, decided that she would rather live in a dirty slum than stay by my side. Why should I show such kindness to a woman who never came to me, even though she was sick and dying?”

 

A glacial, chilling anger filled the room. Elise shuddered at the intense and viscous emotion that was bitterly raging.

 

“Ah, you…”

 

She hesitated but continued her words.

 

“To be so cruel to someone you once loved…”

 

“Loved?”

 

Gerhad burst out laughing. 

 

It was a mocking laugh.

 

“She was just a pretty girl to play with. To have fun with. You can cherish toys and dolls, but is it even worth saying that you love them all?”

 

“How can you say that…?”

 

Elise’s body trembled at the blatant insults hurled at her mother.

 

‘Why did my mother let such a cruel person…’

 

Elise remembered Marissa’s confession as she lay dying in a narrow room in the slums.

 

Although she couldn’t put it into words, the emotion was clearly felt in her sad eyes.

 

‘Why?’

 

Resentment mingled in Elise’s eyes. Gerhard, sensing his daughter’s anger, became alert.

 

“Okay.”

 

He walked towards Elise and spoke.

 

“So why did I give you a chance instead?”

 

“What do you mean…?”

 

Gerhard smiled meaningfully.

 

“I personally created an excuse for you to join this family.”

 

“…!!”

 

Keeeeeen-

 

Suddenly, a sharp ringing sound pierced her mind. Elise’s vision became dizzy with a warning sound that scratched her nerves. 

 

Elise stumbled, unable to keep her balance.

 

The hindsight hit her head like she’d been hit with a hammer.

 

‘Then then…’

 

As she was wallowing in despair, she had an encounter she thought would never happen again.

 

‘It wasn’t a coincidence.’

 

It was all part of Gerhard Schuvan’s calculation. 

 

The first meeting with the Duke and the reunion at the banquet hall.

 

‘The relationship… It wasn’t.’

 

Keeeeen, keeeeen-

 

The constant tinnitus made her head feel like it was going to split apart. In the end, Elise couldn’t overcome the dizziness and collapsed in her place.

 

A tear rolled down Elise’s cheek. Whether it was due to the pain throbbing in her head or some other reason, it was unclear.

 

Gerhard’s cruel voice fell over her throbbing head.

 

“Go see the Duke again.”

 

The voice giving her orders was calm, as if nothing had happened.

 

“Go kneel, plead, and cling to his coattails. Do whatever it takes to win back the Duke’s favour.”

 



 

“If you fail, you can’t imagine what will happen to Marissa.”

 

Elise closed her eyes tightly at the threat that came from Gerhard’s mouth.

 

It was always like this. Whenever the Count wielded the safety of her mother as a weapon, Elise had no choice but to be dragged along like a tethered dog with a leash around its neck.

 

At times like this, Elise hated herself so much. She was helpless and weak, and she hated herself.

 

“So you must succeed.”

 

Gerhard answered coolly, and Vanessa came in, taking the leash from him.

 

“Tell her what to do next.”

 

“Yes, Count.”

 

The Count looked down at Elise and gave her an ultimatum.

 

“Don’t forget. This is the last chance I will give you.”

 



 

In the following days, Eliase was taught quite different lessons from the ones she had received to become a lady of a noble house.

 

The education was so embarrassing and clandestine that she couldn’t bring herself to describe it.

 

As the education approached its conclusion, the content became more explicit and overt. Unlike Elise, who became increasingly pale due to the embarrassment and shock, Vanessa remained calm throughout.

 

“There are many other ways to give pleasure to a partner.”

 

Vanessa continued her explanation in a dry voice. 

 

As Vanessa finished speaking, Elise shook her head, her face drained of colour as if she was about to collapse.

 

“I can’t do it. I just can’t do it.”

 

But Vanessa dismissed it as if there was nothing worth hearing.

 

“No. Lady Elise, you can do it well enough. You must.”

 

Vanessa’s tone was cold.

 

Only then did Elise truly comprehend the profound meaning of being sold.

 

“Even though…”

 

Elise couldn’t bear to continue her words. Her eyes were red with misery and shame. Unable to bear it, she lowered her head deeply and bit her lips.

 

“Miss.”

 

Vanessa let out a soft sigh and knelt in front of Elise. She took Elise’s hands resting on her knees and gently patted the back of them.

 

“If you finish this job and return to the Count’s mansion later. You will be able to meet Marisa.”

 

It was a kind voice Elise had never heard before. 

 

Elise raised her head.

 

“But… you’ve never let me see my mother before.”

 

“It’s different this time.”

 

Vanessa calmly persuaded her.

 

“The more His Excellency likes you, the greater your chances will be. Perhaps you might not just meet Marissa but even live together.”

 

Having been disappointed many times after building up expectations, blindly believing was foolish.

 

But even though Elise knew that, she found herself swaying once again.

 

“Is it really different this time?”

 

“Yes. I can promise you that.”

 

Even if it meant forsaking her entire future life, Elise couldn’t give up on her mother.

 

‘Mother…’

 

Elise steadied her heart, recalling the determination she had when she entered the Count’s residence in the first place.

 

‘I promised myself that I would do anything to save my mother.’

 

Elise adapted to her reality.

 

“I will.”

 

Her mother’s life and her mother’s wishes. 

 

If she had to choose between the two, the answer was definitely the former.

 



 

The night before Elise went to the Duke’s house…

 

Elise was barely able to get back to her room, gathering her tattered thoughts.

 

“Hey.”

 

Elise stopped in shock. 

 

It was Fritz. 

 

He was waiting for Elise, leaning against the wall, blocking the hallway.

 

Elise stiffly managed to move her rigid body and greeted him.

 

“Lord.”

 

“Oh, you haven’t forgotten your manners yet? I thought you would call me ‘brother.’”

 

Fritz grinned.

 

“How could I…”

 

“Of course, if that were the case, I would have torn your tongue to pieces.”

 

Elise’s face turned pale. Fritz laughed when he saw that.

 

“Now that I think about it, I heard a story. I heard you finally decided to become a whore?”

 

Even though it was a mockery that clearly revealed her situation, Elise could not say anything.

 

“For a maid’s daughter, even that’s too much. Isn’t it?”

 

Fritz chuckled and asked for an answer again.

 

“Why is there no answer? Am I wrong?”

 

“…No. The Lord is right.”

 

Elise barely parted her lips to respond. Her voice, almost breaking.

 

However, Fritz did not seem satisfied with her obedient answer.

 

“A filthy bitch who knows no shame.”

 

He scolded her with a contemptuous gaze.

 

“Because of you, the Schuvan family’s hard-earned reputation has been tarnished overnight. Even the lowest nobility now dare to speak of the Schuvan name with disrespect, all because of you.”

 



 

“All because of one bastard child.”

 

 



 

“All because of just one illegitimate child.”

 

As Fritz approached with a glint in his eyes, Elise took a step back from him. It felt like he could grab her arm and strike her at any moment.

 

 

However, instead of hitting her as he used to, Fritz let out a mocking laugh.

 

“Consider yourself lucky. It would be troublesome if the body dedicated to the esteemed Duke were damaged, so I am leaving you like this.”

 

A grim threat was added next.

 

“So. You better do well, Elise.”

 

Fritz smirked with a chilling smile.

 

“If you fail, I will throw you back into that slum with my own hands.”


It was drizzling early in the morning.

 

Elise patted her chest, relieved that it wasn’t raining heavily. But the damp air and the drop in temperature gave her a chill.

 

Feeling dispirited, she tightly grasped the closure of the cloak wrapped around her.

 

The clothes worn under the cloak were much more luxurious and thinner than before. The ivory silk ribbon that held her hair in a half ponytail was an import from across the continent.

 

To ensure that these expensive items didn’t get damaged, Elise had to move carefully.

 

Vanessa conveyed Gerhard’s words to Elise, who had completed all the preparations.

 

“The Count said it is okay for you not to come home today.”

 

Elise’s face turned pale as she realised what Vanessa meant.

 

Because of the extreme shame, her face burned as if it was pricked by a hundred needles, but she tried to pretend that nothing happened.

 

However, perhaps due to her wavering emotions, her steps outside faltered slightly. As a result, mud splattered on her shoes.

 

“Ah…”

 

Of all things, on the lace-adorned shoes.

 

Fortunately, no one but Elise noticed the mistake.

 

As soon as the carriage door closed, Elise took out her handkerchief and wiped the mud from her shoes. The dirt came off easily, but the stains remained. The more she wiped, the more it spread to the side.

 

Elise suddenly realised that it was useless and stopped.

 

The indelible stain on the lace shoes seemed to resemble her own image.

 

No matter how she adorned and packaged herself on the outside, she was actually a lowly illegitimate child rolling around in the mud.

 

Elise smiled sadly and straightened her back. Her feelings were indescribably mixed.

 

‘…’

 

She took this path feeling that it was almost like gambling.

 

You risk it all and either succeed, or lose everything.

 

“…It’s okay. I can do it.”

 

Elise, with her hands clasped together, looked out the window. The sky was grey from the thick rain clouds.

 

That gloomy and dark colour covered the sky, as if it were showing her future, Elise shivered slightly.

 



 

Norman Crowood was proud of himself as an old butler who had looked after the Vassenberg mansion for a long time.

 

Not only did he serve three dukes throughout his life, but he also possessed discernment and insight recognised by all of the mansion’s employees in line with his extensive experience.

 

However, even for someone like Norman, a challenging problem lay ahead of him.

 

Has there ever been a time when it was difficult to read the master’s thoughts like now?

 

The old butler stared at the closed door of the reception room with a perplexed expression. Then, he recalled a young guest with gentle eyes.

 

‘I wonder if this person can handle it.’

 

According to rumours, the situation was truly pitiful and difficult. The situation facing her right now was harsh.

 

Norman looked worried, and the maid called out to him from behind.

 

“Butler Norman, the tea is ready.”

 

“Give it to me.”

 

Norman took the tray from the maid and knocked on the reception room door.

 

As he opened the door and entered, the person who had been quietly sitting in the designated chair stood up.

 

“You don’t have to get up.”

 

“No, it’s fine. I happened to be a bit stiff.”

 

The woman, with a slightly embarrassed expression, added quietly.

 

“And now, I feel really good.”

 

Norman quickly glanced sideways at the table. The cookies had not decreased in number and the tea in the teacup had cooled down.

 

The neat and elegant dining table remained spotless. The lap blanket, which had been brought for covering, was still neatly folded. Everything seemed untouched, as if the person wouldn’t dare touch it.

 

The traces left by the guest were the chairs pulled out from the table.

 

That gave off a sense of the anxiety and fear of this small, fragile-looking guest.

 

Norman answered with a grin so as not to embarrass the other person.

 

“It is this old man’s pleasure to serve guests who come to this mansion. Don’t feel pressured.”

 

“But I’m causing you trouble…”

 

“Not at all.”

 

Norman casually removed the plate from the table and placed a freshly baked warm pie alongside a new teacup. It was an action that he had already repeated several times today.

 

“It’s an herbal tea with citrus. It’s said to relax the mind.”

 

“Thank you for your concern… Thank you so much.”

 

A faint smile appeared on the young lady’s face. She hesitated for a moment and asked cautiously.

 

“Is… Is the Duke still busy?”

 

“Yes. It looks like the meeting isn’t over yet.”

 

“Oh, okay.”

 

She nodded with an effort to smile. In Norman’s eyes, who had witnessed various situations throughout his life, her appearance seemed pitiful.

 

“How about you leave for today and make an appointment again for next time? You’ve been waiting too long.”

 

“No. It’s my fault for coming without contacting you in advance.”

 

However, she urgently raised her head, wearing a desperate expression as if there might not be another chance.

 

“Please let me wait a little longer.”

 

Norman found it difficult to look at the pitiful sight any longer, and added something he didn’t need to say.

 

“I will tell you as soon as my Master’s work is finished.”

 

“Really… thank you.”

 

After leaving the reception room, Norman let out a silent sigh and looked up at the second floor where the Duke’s office was located.

 

‘What on earth are you thinking, Master…?’

 

When it came to his loyalty to the Vassenbergs, Norman would be second to none. But this time, it was difficult to understand.

 

It would be better to reject her from the beginning. What kind of intention did he have to bring her into the mansion and not meet her?

 

As an impure feeling crept up his spine, Norman shook his head, dispelling those thoughts.

 

‘I can’t continue like this. Should I talk to Master?’

 

In early spring, the days were not long, so the sun was already setting. Fortunately the rain stopped, but the wet roads were still muddy. The way back wasn’t going to be easy.

 

‘I hope Master will call her before it’s too late.’

 

Sitting alone in the reception room, he felt uneasy thinking about the young lady waiting nervously. Anticipating the Duke’s summons.

 



 

The sun set and darkness fell.

 

The one who came to Elise and delivered the news was Michael, not Norman. He delivered the Duke’s call with a characteristic, polite greeting.

 

“I will guide you to His Excellency the Duke.”

 

Elise quickly rose. Having waited anxiously, fearing she might not meet the Duke due to the passage of too much time.

 

“You can follow me.”

 

Elise left the drawing room. It has been seven hours since she came to see the Duke.

 

However, the direction of the path was different from the last time. Elise was taken aback, as she had naturally expected to be escorted to the Duke’s office.

 

“Um… Sir?”

 

At Elise’s call, Michael stopped walking and looked back at her.

 

“What is it?”

 

“Ah… May I ask where we’re going?”

 

“To His Excellency’s bedroom.”

 

Elise’s body stiffened involuntarily, and her bright blue eyes fluttered. Michael spoke calmly to Elise, who seemed very nervous.

 

“His Excellency said you can go back if you don’t want to.”

 

“Oh, no…!”

 

Elise urgently shook her head.

 

“I understand.”

 

After giving a short, short answer, Michael immediately turned around.

 

‘…His bedroom.’

 

Elise pressed down on her heart. An effort to control her constant desire to run away.

 

‘It’s something I was prepared to do anyways.’

 

She already knew about the Duke’s explicit request. Accepting it was her choice.

 

‘I can’t run away now.’

 

Elise followed Michael, trying to suppress her pounding heart.

 

She turned into the passage on the right next to the central staircase and found herself in a long, straight hallway.

 

The lanterns hanging from each pillar flickered and burned, illuminating the dark hallway.

 

Portraits of the previous Dukes of Vassenberg were hung at regular intervals on the walls.

 

Elise lowered her head and looked only at her toes, as if feeling an imposing gaze from the portraits.

 

The stains on her pure white shoes caught her eye in particular. Elise tried not to be conscious of it.

 

As they reached the heavy mahogany doors that opened on either side, Michael straightened his body and spoke.

 

“Please inform me when you are ready.”

 

Elise checked her outfit one last time.

 

Her eyes were pathetically busy, checking to see if her neatly combed hair was dishevelled or if her dress was wrinkled.

 

Meanwhile, Michael just waited quietly. After finishing her preparations, Elise raised her head.

 

“…Thank you.”

 

Michael nodded and opened the door, stepping aside to allow her to enter.

 

Elise took one last deep breath and stepped into the Duke’s bedroom.

 

The door closed heavily behind her.

 

As soon as she entered, a heavy scent seeped into the tip of her nose. It was a scent reminiscent of the Duke.

 

She slowly raised her head, finally realising that she had entered the Duke’s private space.

 

The bedroom was dark, lit only by wax candles. Elise cautiously explored the dark space.

 

Then, she was shocked when she came across the bright yellow irises of an owl lying on the nightstand. The skillfully preserved creature looked vivid, as if still alive.

 

Elise quickly tore her gaze from it and turned her head.

 

Then, she found Cardale Vassenberg sitting on the sofa next to the roaring fireplace.

 

Like a painting, the beautiful man lounged easily, his eyes fixed on her.

Elise held on to her nervousness and walked towards him slowly. Standing at a distance not too far yet not too close, she raised the hem of her dress and bent her knee.

 

“I see you, Your Excellency the Duke.”

 

The man’s indifferent gaze turned towards her. The overpowering and arrogant gaze, made Elise involuntarily shrink.

 

“Do you and I still have anything left to talk about?”

 

Her body trembled at his chilly, indifferent tone. But, Elise saw a glimmer of hope in that Cardale had granted her an appointment.

 

Even if it’s just a thin thread that will break.

 

“I came to offer my apologies for upsetting the Duke during our last encounter…”

 

“Apologize?”

 

Cardale laughed.

 

“Do you think your words can hurt my feelings?”

 

Cardale held back a sneer.

 

“I accept the apology. So, you may leave now.”

 

But Elise hadn’t even gotten to the point yet. When she hesitated and refused to leave, one of Cardale’s eyebrows rose.

 

“Is there anything more to say?”

 

“Actually…”

 

Elise readied her prepared words.

 

“I was wondering if I could ask again. For the proposal you mentioned last time…”

 

“Elise Schuvan.”

 

Cardale cut her off.

 

“I must have made it clear that I don’t change my decisions once they are made.”

 

“That…”

 

“Besides, didn’t you beg me to let you go?”

 

“Um, I was too confused at that moment…”

 

Elise was naturally intimidated by Cardale’s dull and bored expression.

 

“I didn’t know what to do. Please forgive my mistakes…”

 

“I don’t understand what you’re saying.”

 

Cardale now looked blatantly annoyed. Those eyes, still cold and indifferent.

 

“I don’t want anything more from you. Any fleeting interest I might have had for you disappeared long ago. So, go back.”

 

Cardale folded his arms and sank back into the sofa, closing his eyes. It was a clear dismissal. Elise’s face turned pale like a blank sheet of paper.

 

‘What should I do?’

 

It seemed like she would be kicked out by the Duke’s assistant at any moment. If that happened, it was all over.

 

Dizziness overwhelmed her as her vision darkened.

 

‘What should I do?’

 

She felt nauseous, having not eaten anything all day. If things go on like this, her mother…

 

Her heart pounded at her despairing imagination. Anxiety and fear engulfed her like raging waves.

 

“Your Grace, please…”

 

Unable to hold on any longer, Elise fell to her knees in front of Cardale.

 

Under her lowered gaze, she could see the Duke’s sleek shoes. The leather surface, flawless as ever, reflected her pitiful self.

 

When Elise saw her face contorted as if she was about to burst into tears, she realised…

 

Her reality hasn’t changed at all.

 

No matter how hard she tried to wash away the stench of the slums and scrub herself clean, she remained nothing more than a poor, powerless woman.

 

She was the only one who didn’t know the obvious truth. Like a fool.

 

Elise blinked her eyes rapidly as her throat suddenly felt tight, and the corners of her eyes grew hot.

 

‘I can’t cry. He’ll hate me even more if I show him such an ugly side.’

 

Although Elise really didn’t want to, she couldn’t help but think of her mother, Marissa.

 

Her last memory of her mother involved suppressing miserable and sad emotions, smiling brightly towards the Count. Because the Count hated it when her mother cried.

 

Elise believed the Duke would do the same.

 

After all, no man would tolerate a woman whimpering around for the sake of pleasure.

 

But tears kept gathering under her eyes. A dreadful fear crept in, suggesting that she might have ruined everything with a foolish decision, something she could never take back.

 

‘What if the Duke doesn’t accept me?’

 

Elise could finally empathise with her mother’s desperation when she clung to the Count in the past, begging for his forgiveness.

 

‘I’ll keep begging until he forgives me…’

 

She was stuck at a dead end.

 

Behind her, she was being chased by a ferocious beast, and before her eyes was an endless cliff. Her only hope was the single thread that hung precariously before her.

 

She didn’t know if it was salvation or a trap. However, Elise had no room for choices.

 

“Please…”

 

Her voice sounded like it would break at any moment, shaking and holding back tears. 

 

She pleaded.

 

“Please give me one more chance.”

 



 

Cardale looked down at the woman who was earnestly pleading beneath him, her petite shoulders trembling delicately.

 

The outcome was as expected. It was too easy. The Count was frustrated for not having a daughter to offer, and Cardale held things the Count might find interesting in his own hands.

 

What could a woman, who was merely a sacrificial pawn in this deal, do?

 

Elise Schuvan’s mistake started from here. She foolishly believed that she had her own choice.

 

Cardale clicked his tongue lightly.

 

If his interest in this woman had been lessened, she might not have even set foot in this place at all.

 

Other people’s situations and circumstances were not his concern. The same was true of human tears and pleas. All of them were just boring, tiresome, and annoying.

 

But this woman kept touching something deep inside him. He didn’t know what it was about her that made him tick.

 

But whenever he looked at her face, as white and innocent as a snow field, something twisted and distorted inside him.

 

‘How long can you make a face like that? If I capture you and defile you, if I throw you to the abyss- no, if I completely destroy you…’

 

‘What kind of face will you make then?’

 

That was the reason why he tolerated this leisurely hunting that was so tiresome.

 

“Elise.”

 

The woman who was crying raised her head. Desperate eyes turned to him.

 

Water droplets poured out from the bottom of her deep blue lake-like eyes. Cardale was very pleased with the newly discovered expression.

 

He reached out his large hand and stroked her cheek. Her face, as white and dry as snow, was hot and wet. It was completely different from the soft feel from before.

 

This also appealed to Cardale.

 

“Try doing what you can.”

 

Elise’s round eyes widened. The quivering blue jewels were so pitiful and pretty.

 

He gestured calmly.

 

“Hurry.”

 

The woman stared at him in surprise and then blinked her eyes once. Her accumulated tears flowed down her cheeks again. Then she nodded as she understood what he said.

 

Her small hands raised to her waist. Delicate and slender fingers fumbled with the ribbon of her cloak.

 

Perhaps because she was nervous, her hands wandered several times, and Elise glanced at him. However, Cardale remained indifferent, simply observing.

 

Finally, the ribbon was pulled, and the loose cloak fell to the marble floor.

 

“It’s thin.”

 

Calm, red eyes scanned the silhouette of her delicate body. The effect of the Count’s gaze on the garment made it equivalent to indoor clothing. No, it seemed fitting, even for a bedroom, without any hint of discomfort.

 

In addition, the straps on her back were so tight that the fabric covering her upper body hugged her. Clearly exposing the curves of her body.

 

“Did you choose a dress like this on purpose?”

 

When shame rose, not only her face but also the soft skin on the nape of her neck turned red.

 

Cardale noticed the changes one by one. This was also a pleasure.

 

“You have to answer.”

 

“My father recommended it…”

 

“You probably wore it knowingly. Am I wrong?”

 

“…No. The Duke is right.”

 

Cardale was satisfied with the obedient answer.

 

People could be expected to do anything when faced with a desperate situation. There were some exceptions, but for the most part, this was the case.

 

Wasn’t that also the case with the woman thrown in front of him now? Cardale smiled a cruel yet beautiful smile.

 

“I quite like people who are fast learners.”

 

As he wiped the moisture from Elise’s youthful eyes, Cardale spoke.

 

“I can overlook minor mistakes or errors.”

 

Cardale slowly brushed her white cheek with the tip of his fingers, savouring the moist and smooth skin. He trailed down to her chin, lifting it.

 

“Ah…!”

 

He then swallowed the woman’s lips when they opened in surprise. Suddenly, the slender body trembled like a captured bird. He didn’t care and pushed his tongue deep into her.

 

‘It’s sweet.’

 

It wasn’t disgusting or unpleasant. No, it was actually pretty nice.

 

He slowly savoured the soft, delicate moisture of her mouth. The flesh was too soft. If he used just a bit of force, she would end up with a scratch.

 

He slowly explored the inside of her mouth, then suddenly overwhelmed her with his tongue. Elise was startled and tried to break away, so he grabbed and restrained her. The back of Elise’s head firmly held in his hand.

 

“Anngg…!”

 

A mewl escaped the woman’s lips. Cardale tilted her head, entangled his tongue with hers more deeply, and sucked. He engulfed her as if he was going to pull out the root of her tongue. Her muffled escaping the onslaught.

 

The relentless violations continued. The sound of wet flesh sticking together and squishing echoed through the bedroom.

 

Then Cardale suddenly felt a hand pressing on his thigh. 

 

The man’s cool eyes narrowed.

Elise’s small hands were reflected in Cardale’s eyes. It seemed like something she did unintentionally because she was out of breath.

 

Because of his tight muscles, he almost missed the faint touch of her fingertips. If he had pushed harder, she might have fainted. He stopped tormenting her and parted his lips.

 

“Hahh…”

 

The woman took a deep breath, her face flushed. Her small body heaved, and her chest rose and fell quickly.

 

Cardale clicked his tongue lightly.

 

This woman. In response to his suggestion that she become his courtesan, she loosened her cloak with her own hands, and while exchanging kisses, seemed not to know how to breathe.

 

But Cardale really liked it. He didn’t think it would be a bad idea to teach this woman everything, one by one, and shape her to suit him.

 

After taking a long moment to catch her breath, Elise raised her head. Her white skin and the reddened corners of her eyes were the same to him. But her lips, so wet and swollen from the biting and sucking, aroused a particularly strange sense of sadism in him.

 

He stared at the woman’s face and then opened his mouth.

 

“How long do you plan on keeping your hands on me?”

 

Elise, who didn’t understand for a moment, then realised his meaning and was startled. She took her hand off his leg.

 

“S-sorry… Uhh.”

 

Cardale gently pressed his thumb against Elise’s lips. The feel of the soft, wet lips against his fingertip was electrifying. It was so delicate and weak that a destructive impulse arose.

 

‘What would it taste like if I chewed and swallowed her in one go?’

 

‘Okay.’ 

 

Cardale decided to admit it.

 

He was lusting after this woman. After a woman who was nothing more than an illegitimate child. All she had was a meagre body.

 

He looked down at his thigh, where her hand had been touching just a moment ago.

 

He wondered if she knew what she touched. 

 

He let out a laugh as he felt the heavy, throbbing weight underneath him.

 

“How shall we do it?”

 

He removed his hand from rubbing her lips and muttered softly.

 

No one would dare criticise him if he led this woman to his bed right away.

 

Even Elise Schuvan.

 

Cardale’s deep, sunken eyes turned to Elise. Her body trembled as she realised what his gaze meant.

 

Her small lips opened and closed again and again. After a brief hesitation, her shaky voice came out.

 

“Maybe today… If I need assistance…”

 

The heat from a moment ago had disappeared, and her red cheeks had now cooled to a pale look.

 

‘You’re wrong.’ 

 

Cardale clicked his tongue and raised his body.

 

It wasn’t his taste to fuck someone like she was being raped. It was similar to how easy hunting wasn’t fun.

 

“Get out.”

 

“Ah, Duke…”

 

But before Cardale could pull the string, Elise grabbed his sleeve.

 

Cardale saw slender, white fingers barely pulling at the edge of his sleeve.

 

Perhaps it’s because their skin hasn’t touched. But despite the audacious contact, he didn’t push away her hand.

 

“I’ll do well. I’ll make sure the Duke is satisfied…”

 

Elise tightly grasped the hem of her skirt with her other hand—the thin material crumpled between her fingers.

 

“…Please let me stay here. Please don’t send me back.”

 

The blue eyes swayed aimlessly.

 

“If the Duke doesn’t accept me, my mother…”

 

The woman’s head fell down.

 

Suddenly, his first meeting with Elise flashed through Cardale’s mind.

 

The image of a ragged woman coming to the Count’s mansion to ask for his mercy because she needed money to treat her mother’s illness. Her earnest eyes.

 

‘It was the same.’

 

The face of Elise that Cardale saw today was so similar.

 

Her appearance changed as if she had been reborn. But in reality, her situation was the same.

 

She was still a woman who lived a risky and desperate life, as if she were walking on a tightrope over a cliff.

 

‘Mother…’

 

He immediately understood how the Count would have held the illegitimate child’s leash.

 

It was a smart decision. This woman seems to value her mother as much as her own life.

 

‘Not bad.’

 

If there was a weakness that Gerhard Schuvan could exploit, the same applied to Cardale as well.

 

Wasn’t it reasonable to assume that someone with such a weakness to exploit, wouldn’t be limited to just one person to use?

 

He felt no guilt. Such feelings were unnecessary for people of his social status.

 

He silently gazed at the woman who pleaded earnestly. Having pushed her to the limit, it was about to happen soon.

 

‘Good luck, Elise Schwan.’

 

‘Begging to pull you out of this abyss, pleading to be saved.’

 

‘Putting your life on the line…’

 

“I will do whatever the Duke asks me to do. So please…”

 

When the words Cardale had been waiting for finally came out of her mouth, and his smooth lips curved.

 

He has tamed prey many times.

 

The easiest way was to bring it when it was young, having killed its mother and rendered it helpless.

 

Subdue them with absolute force and train them with rewards and whips. After taming it so thoroughly, it could never escape on its own.

 

Just become a gentle animal on its leash and obey his words.

 

Among them, the ones that pleased him were kept close. Then when their usefulness ran out, they were disposed of.

 

It was natural. They belonged to him.

 

And this woman was no different.

 

‘Just a temporary whim anyway.’

 

It was enough to enjoy them, until he grew tired and discarded them.

 

Cardale raised his head, locking eyes with Elise.

 

“Say it again.”

 

Then, Cardale willingly listened to the woman’s plea again, saying she would do anything. A twisted sense of satisfaction filled him.

 

He ordered her with a cruel smile.

 

“Then you should show your sincerity.”

 

“Uh, how…?”

 

When Elise asked with her big eyes trembling, Cardale burst into laughter.

 

‘Should I call you naive or stupid?’

 

‘Otherwise, one could consider it a masterpiece of sorts.’

 

The man who was laughing suddenly became cold. He ordered, looking straight down at Elise.

 

“Get up and take off your clothes.”

 

Elise involuntarily flinched. It was due to recalling what lay concealed beneath the clothing.

 

As she hesitated, unable to move, Cardale narrowed his eyes at her.

 

“What are you doing?”

 

Only then did Elise hesitate but then stand up from her seat. Her body was shaking as shame washed over her. She bit the inside of her lip and tried to convince herself.

 

‘Vanessa said it would be necessary. All men are like this… If only I can capture the Duke’s heart, even in this way…’

 

Elise squeezed her eyes shut, then opened them. She began to take off the clothes that barely covered her body.

 

Her pure white neck, shoulders, and collarbone were revealed one after another. Pulling the thin fabric down and freeing both her arms, the garment, now without a secure place to hold onto, simply dropped down.

 

Her flowing clothes settled around Elise’s thin ankles.

 

Cardale’s eyes narrowed at the woman’s body, clad only in underwear, was revealed. Elise, feeling his gaze, trembled and covered her body.

 

The man’s voice, which was already low, subsided to an insidious level.

 

“Where did you get to wear something like this?”

 

Elise’s skin turned red. She covered her chest with her arms and couldn’t even raise her head properly. It was because she didn’t know how she would look.

 

Maybe… She would be seen as a promiscuous and lustful woman who did not know anything about modesty.

 

“Look at me.”

 

Elise raised her head at the irresistible command.

 

“Put your hands down.”

 

“Ah, Duke…”

 

Elise spoke pleadingly, looking at him with her young eyes. But the Duke seemed to have no intention of showing any mercy.

 

“I told you to put your hands down.”

 

The man spoke again in a low voice. At the sound of his voice, filled with undeniable power, Elise shivered and lowered her arms to expose her chest.

 

A pure white corset decorated with delicate lace was revealed. The garment ran from under her breasts down to her midsection, and had tight straps. Clearly showing off her slender waist.

 

However, the corset highlighted her chest as well. Barely supporting her breasts.

 

Since there was nothing blocking her, her ample breasts were clearly visible. The pink nipples stood upright, exposed to the cold air.

 

Elise blushed at the corners of her eyes as she felt the man’s gaze focus on the peak of her breasts.

 

“What were you thinking when you wore this?”

 

“Uhh…!”

 

Elise shivered as the man’s fingertips flicked her nipple playfully. She hastily shook her head and answered.

 

“Oh, no idea…”

 

“Another lie. That doesn’t work.”

 

“Oh, ugh…!”

 

This time, both nipples were caught and twisted at the same time. A tingling sensation that seemed to penetrate the entire chest made Elise dizzy, and she let out a moan.

 

Elise suddenly lost strength in her legs and collapsed on the floor.

“Your nipples are erect, hoping that a man will touch them.”

 

Those words brought even more shame to Elise. Cardale looked down at the woman, her body trembling, helpless. Her infinitely pitiful face aroused a terrible sadism within him.

 

He wanted to make a mess and make her cry. The woman who came to sell her body, begged for him while wearing revealing underwear, and still looked up at him with innocent eyes.

 

‘Is there anything I can’t do?’

 

A new, sly smile escaped Cardale’s twisted lips.

 

Yes, just play with it. It was just a toy thrown before him. After the hunting is over, isn’t it all about devastation and predation?

 

After thinking, Cardale pushed his foot between Elise’s thighs as she sat on the floor.

 

“Sss…!”

 

Elise was startled and instinctively tried to pull back.

 

“Stay still.”

 

The order was absolute. Elise stopped her movements and looked up at Cardale with fearful eyes. One corner of his mouth tilted up.

 

Without even having time to think about the meaning of that smile, the man’s shoes began moving back and forth.

 

“Ah…!”

 

The hard leather shoe pressed gently against the thin fabric of her underwear. It was a feeling Elise had never experienced before. A thick heat rose from below, and a tingling sensation ran down her spine. Her mind was unable to comprehend the electrifying feeling. 

 

“Huh, ahhh!”

 

Elise suddenly trembled. 

 

This feeling was so strange. 

 

It was really peculiar.

 

“Ah, Duke… Sigh! Duke!”

 

The same was true for the moans that came out of her mouth. It was definitely her voice, but she wanted to believe that it wasn’t. It felt so obscene.

 

As Fritz said, she felt like she had become a whore. but…

 

‘I don’t want to look like that.’

 

So she covered her lips with both hands and swallowed the moan that was about to burst out.

 

But Cardale did not allow even that.

 

“I don’t think those hands are meant for that.”

 

The man’s large hands grabbed both of Elise’s wrists and lifted them above her head.

 

Cardale grabbed her to prevent her from moving, and continued rubbing her lower body with his foot.

 

He raised and lowered the heel of his large shoe and pressed it onto the woman’s nether region. At first glance, he seemed careless, but in reality, he was observing Elise’s reactions.

 

“Huh, huh…”

 

That was why he quickly noticed that Elise was biting her lip and that she was trying to hold on somehow.

 

Well that wasn’t allowed.

 

Cardale pressed his hand that was not holding her wrist between Elise’s lips. His long, protruding fingers pressed down on the woman’s tongue.

 

There was no way a maid would dare bite the Duke’s finger. Unable to cover her mouth in any way, Elise just let out her helpless moans.

 

“Annggg, ahhh!”

 

Then, Cardale discovered the place where Elise’s voice became particularly loud. He twitched one corner of his mouth. 

 

‘Here we come.’

 

The man easily found the woman’s gen!tals and twisted his shoe to focus on that part. Elise twisted her body and pleaded with him.

 

“Tsk, duke, tsk, stop… stop… Haah!”

 

She brought her thighs together and squeezed, trying to block his movement somehow. But she was no hindrance to Cardale.

 

Instead, he snorted and rubbed the bottom even more persistently.

 

He quickly rubbed and stimulated it as if crushing it, and soon Elise arched her back and made her body stiff. 

 

“Ah, huh, ahhh…!”

 

Cardale watched the woman’s every reaction as she reached her climax.

 

He looked down at her eyes, blurred by the stimulation and pleasure she was experiencing for the first time. her parted lips, the heavy breath that leaked out between them, the pure white breasts bouncing obscenely, and the pink nipples that stood even more erect with pleasure. The pure white skin was stained red and hot.

 

“Huh…”

 

Eventually, the woman’s weakened body fell onto Cardale’s shoes. Then, when her vagina touched the hard leather, she shivered again.

 

She was a woman with a sensitive body. Cardale was satisfied. Getting hot easily meant that it would reduce his effort and increase his enjoyment.

 

He rubbed the woman’s vagina as a compliment. The woman, whose body was still shaking from the lingering effects of her climax, sobbed at the surge of pleasure.

 

“Ah, huh…”

 

“Is it that good?”

 

“Oh, no… Ahhhh!”

 

Even in the midst of all this, she answered so faithfully. The woman shook her head with desperation. It was both laughable and pitiful.

 

At first, she was dry and dull, but she soon became wet and felt slippery.

 

Cardale felt satisfied with the differences he had made. When he pulled out half of the shoe buried between her crotch, he could see the tip of the shoe shiny and slick where it had been coated with a fluid.

 

Reddened eyes, breasts shaking with erect nipples, underwear tightened around the waist, and juices flowing down.

 

It was so lewd that it couldn’t be more erotic than this. But far from being vulgar, she was pretty.

 

Cardale deliberately whispered to Elise.

 

“You’re so wet.”

 

Elise’s eyes turned red. 

 

She wanted to say no.

 

But her body didn’t feel like her own. She was so ashamed and embarrassed, but she couldn’t deny that she also felt a thrill of pleasure every time he rubbed and pressed her. Even her bottom was still shaking.

 

So even if he accused her of being lewd, Elise couldn’t deny it.

 

“But the maid who was supposed to serve, ends up being served instead.”

 

Cardale said, pulling his foot completely out from between her legs.

 

“Elise.”

 

Elise looked up at Cardale with her bright eyes. He had such a stoic look on his face that it was hard for her to believe that he was the one who sexually violated her.

 

With that face, he spoke softly.

 

“You have to have tact to be liked.”

 

It was only then that Elise saw that the man standing in front of her had a swollen front lip, as if it was about to burst. It was a contrast to the cold and indifferent face she saw.

 

“If you don’t like it, leave.”

 

“Oh, no…!”

 

Elise urgently shook her head. She lifted her hips and straightened her back in the same kneeling position.

 

Then she slowly stretched out her hand in front of her and tried to place it on the waist of the man’s pants, but then stopped.

 

She paused because she remembered something she had learned from Vanessa. Elise asked Cardale carefully.

 

“Can I untie it with my hands?”

 

Haha, Cardale laughed. 

 

‘You’re saying all sorts of things.’ 

 

He said, rubbing Elise’s lips.

 

“Can you solve it with your mouth?”

 

“I’m not good at it…”

 

“Someone told you to say that.”

 

When Cardale questioned her as if to scold her, Elise told the truth with a frightened look on her face.

 

“When I was at the Count’s residence… Vanessa…”

 

‘Vanessa?’

 

At the sound of the name coming out of Elise’s mouth, Cardale narrowed his eyes. Then, he immediately remembered the dark blue-haired aide who accompanied the Count.

 

He muttered, annoyed.

 

“You were very determined.”

 

Cardale scrunched up his expression. Elise suddenly got scared and quickly grabbed the man’s pants buckle.

 

Fortunately, he watched her instead of criticising her for what she did.

 

Elise gave strength to her hand that kept slipping. She carefully pulled down his pants and briefs, and a huge penis popped out.

 



 

It was quite different from what Elise had seen during her education.

 

The real, throbbing penis was much thicker and longer than that of the model she was shown. The shaft was covered in veins and looked like a terrifying weapon, and the blunt end was already leaking fluid from the opening.

 

Elise stiffened her body and tensed at the unrealistic appearance. Cardale felt that and asked, gently brushing under her chin.

 

“Have you ever sucked one before?”

 

Elise quickly nodded at the man’s voice, which seemed to have softened slightly.

 

She would prefer to do well. Following Vanessa’s teachings, she believed that a man desired novelty with his wife, but sought skill with a woman kept by his side for a short while.

 

“W-when I was practising… with a model…”

 

“You learned well, didn’t you?”

 

Elise nodded her head again. Vanessa was told to act happy at times like this, but she was so embarrassed and ashamed that she just couldn’t do it.

 

“Then try it.”

 

She slowly placed her hand on Cardale’s thigh. 

 

Her small, red lips parted to reveal her shy tongue.

Elise’s small tongue slowly swept up from under his member. She could clearly feel the shape of the thick, prominent veins through her nervous tongue.

 

After licking just below his glans, Elise removed her tongue from it and placed her lips under his tip again. The position of her mouth moved to the side.

 

After repeating this a few times, the man let out a drowsy breath.

 

“Ha… continue.”

 

As the shaft was moistened with saliva, Elise took the round lump of flesh underneath it in her mouth and gently sucked.

 

She stimulated the area between the scrotum and the shaft by pressing it with her lips and tongue like a bird’s beak, then came back up and slowly licked the blunt mushroom-like glans.

 

It wasn’t intentional, but Elise’s slow and meticulous movements were enough to test Cardale’s patience.

 

Finally, as Elise gently rubbed her tongue between the cracks dripping with pre-cum, Cardale threw his head back. The man was framed sensuously under the flickering light of the candle.

 

Cardale grabbed the back of Elise’s head and ordered in an insidious and murky voice.

 

“Suck it.”

 

Elise’s face was pulled closer to the man’s crotch. She blinked her eyes as she stared at his shaft, then carefully wrapped both hands around the base of the massive member. She could feel his warmth as she gently held his thick, firm, flesh in her palm.

 

As Cardale urged her, she tightened her grip on the head.

 

Elise parted her lips as if she were possessed by the most beautiful devil in the world. She opened her mouth and took him in, but the only thing that entered was his thick tip. The fishy yet rich scent filled her nose.

 

“Hahhh…”

 

Cardale moaned lowly as the warm, moist hole held him tightly.

 

‘damn it.’

 

A deep excitement rose. As she licked his tip, he already knew the soft flesh inside her mouth—parts of flesh that were particularly trembling and locations of those that react sensitively.

 

It was his fault that he gave Elise a chance instead of shaking her waist himself. If he were to use her mouth to the point where he was completely satisfied, the soft flesh in her mouth would be ravaged.

 

“Huh, uh…”

 

Cardale looked down at the sound of sucking.

 

Her wide-open, thin lips were pursed, and she was seen taking and engulfing him with difficulty. When he saw the woman, overwhelmed by the fact that she hadn’t swallowed all of his shaft, his blood rushed down even more.

 

The sight of her blue eyes looking up at him, slightly red and helpless as he watched his penis swell and harden in her mouth. It looked nothing short of pitiful.

 

Cardale bent down his upper body and whispered to Elise.

 

“If you can’t open your throat, you’ll have to work hard with your tongue.”

 

It was as if he was showing great mercy. Then, the corners of the woman’s eyes turned redder.

 

“Move.”

 

Elise obediently nodded her head. She caressed his sensitive glans against the curved roof of her mouth, doubling the pleasure.

 

“Ugghh…”

 

Cardale let out a suppressed groan. Everything she did was as if it was intentional. The clumsy play of her tongue, the tearful eyes, and the body trembling as if he was too heavy and large for her mouth. It all stimulated him, even though it seemed like it was her first time.

 

If things continued like this, he felt like he would just grab the back of her head and force himself into her body.

 

The moment he would let go of his reason, he would force her to open her throat and penetrate her deeply, regardless of whether she was in pain or not, or even able to breathe.

 

Therefore, the threat he uttered like a wild beast baring its teeth, was a mercy.

 

“Move properly before I do it.”

 

Elise, who read the intense desire in his voice, fluttered her light eyelashes once and began to move her head back and forth.

 

He let out a satisfied sigh as she brought her lips together and sucked, her tongue flicking and licking his glans.

 

As his thick, fleshy shaft rubbed against her wet lips, the squishy sound of it moving within her narrow, moist hole rang through the room. The inside of her mouth, soaked with saliva and semen, began to accept his member.

 

“Um, whoa…!”

 

The woman’s muffled moans sounded particularly obscene. His pleasure gradually built up from the sound of her wet mouth slidinging against his glistening shaft, and the stimulation of her gently stroking his base. Cardale gritted his teeth to keep from jerking his back.

 

“Tsk…!”

 

Then, at some point, a dizzying excitement spread down his spine and throughout his body.

 

A strong feeling of ejaculation rose up to the tip of his chin, along with a shocking pleasure striking his brain.

 

Cardale tilted Elise’s head back and slipped himself out. Hot fluid erupted from the tip. White semen poured down onto Elise’s lips, neck, and breasts.

 

“Ah…”

 

Elise blinked her eyes blankly as if she still didn’t know what happened. Then she suddenly remembered something, and her body began to tremble, and her lips moved.

 

“S-sorry…”

 

“What?”

 

“…I have to swallow…”

 

“You have been taught so many things.”

 

“Forget about that from now on,” Cardale clicked his tongue.

 

He had just finished tidying up his clothes and took out his handkerchief from his chest pocket. Then, he meticulously wiped away any traces of him from Elise’s body.

 

Elise surrendered herself as he wiped her clean. She felt so helpless that she couldn’t do anything.

 

Cardale personally picked up the clothes Elise had taken off and put them back on her. His hands tying the laces were quite gentle. In the end, she was wrapped in a cloak, completely hiding her naked body.

 

Meanwhile, Elise leaned into his arms and breathed. Then, when Cardale finished dressing her and tried to get up, she carefully held him down.

 

“Uhh… did you enjoy it?”

 

The voice asking the question was faintly trembling. Cardale, looking at the woman in his arms, subtly pulled at the corner of his mouth.

 

“Yes.”

 

As always, Cardale Vassenberg emerged victorious this time too.

 

Perhaps it was natural.

 

The prey can never defeat the hunter. It was an absolute proposition that never changed.

 

Therefore, Cardale was willing to show leniency to the captured prey.

 

“I will allow you to stay here.”

 



 

Although he was often misunderstood because he spoke so little and with a hard expression, Michael actually revered chivalry and justice.

 

That was why he could hardly leave even after the Lady of Count Schuvan entered the master’s bedroom.

 

‘I hope His Excellency doesn’t treat her too harshly.’

 

Despite his respect for his lord, the Duke had a very heartless side.

 

It would not be easy for a young lady, barely an adult, to bear it.

 

While Michael was lingering outside the door, someone quietly approached him.

 

“You are here, Sir Walter.”

 

“Butler Norman.”

 

The elderly butler looked at the door and said.

 

“Master called the lady while I was away. Are they both inside?”

 

“Yes.”

 

Norman said after reading Michael’s confused and worried face.

 

“It looks like Sir is also worried about the lady.”

 

“Of course…”

 

Michael blurted out an honest answer without realising it, but then stopped.

 

“…His Excellency has only recently returned from the battlefield.”

 

The Vassenbergs were born with a lack of emotion. Moreover, after completing their ‘duty’ as weapons of war, they would return with even more loss of humanity.

 

Therefore, the possibilities for Elise that Michael imagined were very cruel.

 

First option, she would probably get hurt greatly and get kicked out of here today.

 

Or second, after staying within the Duke’s residence for a time, she would be abandoned when their master’s interest was reduced.

 

Either possibility was equally harsh.

 

“I don’t know what would be better…”

 

Michael let out a thought that had come to his mind without realising it and suddenly came to his senses.

 

“Me too.”

 

Fortunately, Norman responded with an understanding expression. At that moment, a maid quickly approached and whispered something to the butler. Norman nodded his head and knocked on the door.

 

“Your Excellency, did you call me?”

 

Norman went inside and came out again a moment later. This time, he was with Lady Schuvan.

 

Her outfit wasn’t much different from before. She even fastened her cloak neatly. However, her neatly combed hair was dishevelled, and she looked somewhat clueless.

 

“I’ll show you to the bedroom you’ll be using, my lady.”

 

Norman moved his gaze away from the woman, who nodded her head with her eyes puffed as if she had been crying. She looked at Michael this time.

 

“The Duke is looking for Sir Walter.”

 

Michael entered the Duke’s bedroom without a word.

 

The Duke’s face was relaxed as he leaned back on the sofa. It was an expression he made very occasionally when he was satisfied.

 

Like when he cut off the head of an enemy general, or when he shot an animal in a vital spot.

 

Once Michael was present, he gave direct instructions without any hesitation.

 

“Choose a few useful people and have them guard Elise’s bedroom.”

 

“Yes, Your Excellency.”

 

“For the time being, make sure the wolf-dog is out of sight around the mansion.”

 

This was unexpected. The reason for raising and training wolf-dogs in the first place was to guard the mansion. But how do you keep a wolf-dog out of sight?

 

Michael was curious but answered without showing it.

 

“I will take action.”

 

“And.”

 

The Duke paused for a moment and tapped the armrest. He was lost in thought, as if he was assessing something, but then he opened his mouth.

 

Michael’s eyes widened slightly after hearing the command.

 

The next day, some decorations were removed from the Duke’s bedroom.

 

They all had something in common.

 

Taxidermied animals, fur with vivid shapes, faces and bodies, handiwork made of horns and teeth…

 

All decorations that the Duke had hunted and laid out like trophies.

The room given to Elise was in a quiet place with plenty of sunlight.

 

Norman opened the door. 

 

Elise stopped for a moment before going in.

 

Although the Vassenberg residence was grand and old-fashioned, it had a stiff and solemn atmosphere. The central hall, the Duke’s office, and the reception room were all like that as well.

 

But this room was quite different. It was neat and brightly decorated, giving it a cheerful mood.

 

Norman recommended in a warm tone.

 

“You can come in and have a look.”

 

Only then did Elise enter the room and lightly touch the light mint-coloured wall with flower vines drawn on it. There was a peculiar smell of freshly applied to the wallpaper.

 

“Then I will leave now. I will send the maid in a moment, so you can tell her anything you need.”

 

‘The person who came here to serve, is being waited on by someone else.’

 

Elise felt strange. But instead of showing her expression, she nodded her head calmly.

 

“Then I take my leave.”

 

Elise, once left alone, looked around her room carefully. Inside was a bedroom and a bathroom.

 

The glass in the window looked as if it had just been replaced, and the hinges on the shutters sparkled.

 

Brightly coloured furniture that matched the walls was placed in pleasant locations. Each one was well-maintained and sparkled.

 

Elise gently pressed the palm of her hand against the soft damask pattern of the sofa and carefully sat down on the edge.

 

“…I got a really nice room.”

 

It was much nicer than the room Elise had in the Count’s mansion. It was a space that naturally elicited feelings of excessiveness.

 

As she sat squirming uncomfortably, the maid that Norman had called, arrived.

 

“I will be attending to the young lady from now on. I look forward to taking care of you.”

 

The maid, wearing a pure white headscarf and an apron, bowed and spoke.

 

“I have prepared a meal for you.”

 

By the time dinner was served, it was already past the normal hour to eat. But Elise had no appetite anyways. It was probably because too much had happened during the day, and she was tense the whole time.

 

But even if she had been hungry, she would have refused. She clearly remembered what Vanessa had said.

 

“Pay special attention to the amount you eat. No matter how hungry you are, it is prohibited to eat food late at night.”

 

Reflecting on the pitiful words to an abandoned mistress that couldn’t last, Elise lowered her head.

 

“I have no appetite…”

 

“Then do you want to take a bath right away?”

 

Elise flinched as if her foot had gone numb. The skin where her thick bodily fluids had been splattered felt strangely hot, as if it had been burned.

 

‘The Duke cleaned it, but… maybe there was a trace left behind.’

 

Elise bit the inside of her lip so as not to show her nervousness, then she asked back carefully.

 

“…Can I just ask you to prepare one?”

 

“Are you saying you don’t need any assistance?”

 

“I’m more comfortable alone.”

 

“All right. Please wait a moment.”

 

The maid went into the bathroom without a word. She didn’t seem puzzled or curious at all.

 

However, to Elise, the maid’s calm and businesslike demeanor actually gave her a sense of relief.

 

It wasn’t long before the maid came out of the bathroom, having finished getting her bath ready.

 

“I’ll clean it up later, so you can leave it there after you finish taking a bath.”

 

“I will.”

 

“If you need anything, please call me anytime.”

 

After the maid left the room, Elise crossed to the bathroom.

 

There was a bathtub large enough for two or three people. Steam was rising from the bathtub. Thanks to this, the air was warm.

 

Elise hesitated for a moment and then put her toes into the bathtub. The water was moderately heated; surprisingly, it was perfect for her body temperature.

 

It was very spacious compared to Elise’s size. But she pulled her knees up and sat in the corner. No one judged her, but she just did it naturally.

 

Elise sat down with her body in the warm water as if hiding herself and looked down at herself blankly.

 

Her face was reflected in the calm water. She could see her swollen lips. Elise carefully traced her lips with her fingers.

 

She remembered the kiss from earlier.

 

He seemed like a ruthless marauder. He invaded without hesitation, ploughed through every detail, and took away her every breath.

 

But the actions that followed…

 

Elise’s face instantly turned red. She shook her head hastily to shake off her memories.

 

‘The Duke just… He was just trying to get my obedience.’

 

The Duke had recently made Elise pay dearly for daring to reject his offer. He was soft to her at the end, only after being harshly driven and subjected to complete submission.

 

Thanks to this, Elise had no choice but to accept it even if she didn’t want to.

 

She realised Vanessa was right.

 

“You will have to be prepared to throw everything away, young lady.”

 

Elise’s silver eyelashes fluttered. Not because of extravagant feelings like shame or humiliation.

 

It was because of the anxiety she had been harbouring in the back of her mind this whole time.

 

‘Will I be able to survive here?’

 

It was a position she had barely obtained by begging a man who had coldly tried to throw her away.

 

Therefore, Elise knew very well how precarious her situation is.

 

She would be immediately kicked out of this place if she even showed the slightest hint of going against the Duke’s wishes or rejecting him.

 

“Keep this in mind. You must accept whatever the Duke asks.”

 

Vanessa’s instructions that bordered on brainwashing buzzed in Elise’s ears.

 

‘But… what if it doesn’t work…?’

 

She knew that one day, she would be abandoned.

 

‘A man easily loses interest in a woman once he has her, and soon he feels bored having her.’

 

A mistress was a consumable item that could be replaced at any time.

 

It would have been even more merciless if the Duke’s disposition was cold and cruel because she was just a maid who served him at night.

 

‘I guess I’ll just have to hold on until I can see my mother again.’

 

Elise could barely stay here, but she wasn’t sure how long she would last.

 

‘How could someone like me hold onto the Duke’s heart?’

 

A chill rushed over her as she faced the cold reality. 

 

Elise hugged her knees, curled her body into a ball, and buried her head in her knees.

 

Her fragile body trembled.

 



 

At the back entrance of the Vassenberg mansion, was an entrance through which employees entered and exited.

 

The dukedom provided lodging for its employees, so many of them lived in the mansion, but were also allowed to commute to work.

 

The maid also left the Duke’s residence in a wagon, joining the crowd of employees who were trying to return to their homes.

 

The carriage stopped occasionally, and people got out.

 

“See you tomorrow!”

 

“Only drink a little tonight! If you’re late tomorrow morning, I’ll leave you behind!”

 

The maid quietly got off among the people noisily exchanging pleasantries.

 

The maid put on her cloak’s hood, the laces pulled tight, hiding her face, and moved her feet with a light gait. The trail she was navigating looked very familiar to her.

 

As the maid entered deeper and deeper into her alley, she saw someone’s silhouette. She walked towards him quickly.

 

The man must have been waiting for her for a long time, as he asked without hiding his displeasure.

 

“Why are you so late?”

 

“There was a good reason.”

 

Then the maid leaned in and whispered softly into his ear. After hearing the information, the man opened his eyes.

 

“Is that really true?”

 

“I’m sure.”

 

The maid nodded her head. After asking a few more questions, the man took a money bag out of his pocket and handed it to her.

 

“Remember to be careful not to step out of line.”

 

“Of course.”

 

The maid quickly took the pouch, turned around and walked out of the alley.

 

After the man also disappeared into the darkness, the empty alley was left with an eerie atmosphere, as if there had never been anyone to begin with.

 



 

Having finished her bath, Theresia lay down, granting her body to the maids’ skilled hands.

 

The maids applied flower-scented perfume to her and carefully massaged her entire body. Theresia, receiving this attention, opened her eyes lazily. She was in a good mood for the first time in a while.

 

“The rumour has spread that that girl is an illegitimate child?”

 

Lady Rosenthal, who was giving instructions to the maids nearby, responded.

 

“Yes. There is almost no noble of Nodrat who does not know this.”

 

“Really?”

 

Her red-painted lips curled in satisfaction. Theresia did not hide her joy.

 

“I didn’t even know it would end up like this. I was concerned for no reason and wasted precious time worrying about an illegitimate child… ouch!”

 

Theresa suddenly let out a short scream and grabbed her hand. The maid who was trimming her nails cried out in surprise, dropping the tool.

 

“Waa, Your Highness!”

 

The Princess raised her hand and looked down at her fingernails. Due to the sudden pull of her arm, her thumbnail was halfway trimmed, but it seemed like it wouldn’t be a problem if properly cut again.

 

But Theresia calmly curled her fingernails and hid them in her hands. Her eyes turned to the maid, who bowed her head.

 

‘Did she say she was the second daughter of a viscount?’

 

She was aiming to marry a high-ranking noble, and her family gave a huge amount of money to her to become the Princess’s maid, so she was temporarily brought into the palace.

 

“A supposed maid of the royal palace can’t even cut a nail properly?”

 

Theresia clicked her tongue, and the maid’s complexion turned pale. 

 

The maid submitted, raising her innocent eyes.


“I guess the young lady is not good enough to be my maid.”

 

“I’m sorry, Your Royal Highness! If you give me another chance-”

 

“Didn’t you make a similar mistake before?”

 

The Princess recalled the incident when this maid pulled too hard while combing her hair. The servant replied, unsure of what to do.

 

“I will do better in the future. So please…”

 

“That’s difficult, young lady. I hope I won’t have to see you in my palace anymore.”

 

Theresia responded coldly and waved her hand. Lady Rosenthal was quick to notice and wrapped her arms around the shoulders of the young maid, who was now shedding tears, and led her out.

 

‘Half a year, that’s a long time. You endured for quite a while.’

 

Rosenthal thought the maid couldn’t have endured the harassment from the other maids and even expected her to quit, but it turned out she clung like a parasite. Which was annoying.

 

In any case, having received money and being a nobleman’s daughter, Rosenthal couldn’t drive away the maid without a proper reason. Therefore, she intentionally set her up to make a few mistakes.

 

‘After her mistake during the last hairdressing, I was worried about how she would handle it. I thought there might be a chance for this woman to show improvement. But there was no need for that. This should have happened way sooner.’

 

Theresia, wearing a long gown, sat down at the dressing table. A maid quickly picked up a hairbrush and tidied her long hair.

 

‘She won’t complain that I didn’t find her a good maid, right?’

 

Originally, Theresia would have had to find herself a good maid, but she had no intention of doing such a troublesome thing herself. Especially since she already brought Lady Rosenthal into the Princess’s palace.

 

‘I kept her for six months; she should have found her own place. The reason she hasn’t been able to find a suitable marriage partner is because her abilities are limited.’

 

Theresia, coming to her own conclusion, then looked at herself in her mirror.

 

She saw a beautiful woman with gorgeous red hair flowing down her back.

 

Her elegant and alluring grey eyes, fair skin, and bright red lips. She was beautiful enough to captivate any man.

 

After looking at herself, Theresia’s gaze turned to the side. She observed one of her maids, busy grooming herself by her side.

 

While not as striking as herself, she was a young and pretty woman. As noble-born ladies-in-waiting, they possessed sufficient culture and qualities.

 

‘…They’re annoying.’

 

Among Theresia’s maids, there were those who had assisted her for a long time and those who had been childhood companions. However, Theresia didn’t trust any of them. 

 

Whether they were maids or friends, they were meaningless to her. They were nothing more than hyenas and competitors, all eagerly eyeing the same thing she desired.

 

Excluded from them was the Countess of Rosenthal, Lady Rosenthal. The representative of the Princess’s palace maids and the only person with whom Theresia could lower her guard.

 

‘Anyway, I should refrain from having a maid for the time being.’

 

Now that she was working to monopolise Cardale Vassenberg and get him to marry her, it would be better to reduce any unnecessary noise.

 

‘Well, I guess for the time being, I don’t need to worry. The Duke must have heard the rumours about that woman.’

 

There was no way Cardale Vassenberg would keep a mere illegitimate child by his side.

 

Because his pride wouldn’t allow it.

 

‘At least I won’t have to see that girl fussing anymore.’

 

The corners of Theresia’s mouth tilted up, and she burst into laughter.

 

“Oh really, the more I think about it, the more ridiculous it gets. I can’t help but laugh, right?”

 

This situation was so humorous that Theresia couldn’t ignore it. Just imagining what that woman’s face would look like right now, it made her feel like an old ache was easing up.

 

“How anxious she must have been with her fear of being discovered. Isn’t that right, Madam?”

 

Lady Rosenthal, who had just returned to the powder room, quickly responded.

 

“It’s clear that her situation has become difficult. The breakup of the engagement with Little Marquis Raymond Hartmann has also become a fait accompli.”

 

“Haha… Ahahaha!”

 

There was no revenge more exhilarating than this. Theresia, revelling in the joy of victory, thoroughly mocked the woman who had dared to look at a tree she couldn’t even climb.

 

Her massage and brushing were completed while she was basking in the joy of her triumph. Theresia, dressed in her negligee, walked out of the dressing room.

 

“Her Royal Highness.”

 

“Sir Klein.”

 

The Knights of the Princess’s palace, each wearing a unique uniform, showed courtesy. Theresa looked around at her maids and opened her mouth.

 

“Thank you all for your hard work. Go and rest.”

 

“Yes, Your Royal Highness.”

 

After the maids filed out, Countess Rosenthal was the only one left in the room.

 

Theresia hastily called on her knight.

 

“Dietrich, have you heard anything new?”

 

Dietrich Klein, the Princess’s direct bodyguard, raised his head and looked at his master. Her eyes were sparkling with anticipation.

 

“Yes, Your Highness.”

 

“What is it? Speak quickly.”

 

Dietrich let out a silent, mixed breath and opened his mouth.

 

“It’s not good news.”

 

Theresia’s eyebrows narrowed, not knowing what he was talking about.

 

‘What bad news can there be in the courtyard where that illegitimate woman was kicked out?’

 

“It’s okay, just tell me.”

 

Dietrich eventually began to reveal the information he had obtained. As his words continued, the Princess’s face gradually hardened and became distorted.

 

“…The duke brought that woman into his mansion?”

 

Theresia’s harsh voice was life-threatening.

 

“Yes.”

 

She clenched her teeth. Two eyes burning with anger glared at Dietrich.

 

“Tell me again.”

 

“Elise Schuvan is staying at the Duke’s residence.”

 

“AAAAHHHHH!”

 

Theresia could not bear it and screamed. The items on the living room table fell to the floor with a loud noise.

 

“Your Highness the Princess!”

 

Dietrich and Lady Rosenthal tried to dissuade her, but the Princess’s anger did not subside easily. The guards and maids who were guarding outside rushed in due to the commotion, but Theresia screamed in a fit of rage.

 

“Get out! Can’t you hear me? to get out!”

 

The Princess, after yelling for so long, managed to calm down when her voice became hoarse. Lady Rosenthal poured a glass of water and offered it to her, but Theresia refused.

 

The Princess, while sitting quietly with her head down, finally raised her face.

 

“This is really fun.”

 

However, the expression on her face was completely gone.

 

“Countess Rosenthal.”

 

“Please speak.”

 

Theresia asserts, her sinister eyes shining.

 

“I must see His Majesty the Emperor.”

 



 

Elise had trouble sleeping all night.

 

Even the expensive bedding, that was so soft it made her body feel like it would melt, couldn’t calm her worries and anxiety.

 

She struggled until almost dawn, and as a result, woke up later than usual.

 

So the next day, Norman met a restless Elise.

 

“Lady Elise…?”

 

Norman’s eyes widened as he wondered what was happening. The maid who followed Elise explained.

 

“The lady came looking for the butler.”

 

“Alright. Please show her in.”

 

The maid bowed her head and turned to leave. Norman asked politely so as not to startle the gentle, nervous -looking woman.

 

“You’re looking for me?”

 

“Oh, yes. That’s right.”

 

Elise stuttered to explain the purpose of her visit.

 

The reason was that she overslept and was unable to serve the Duke.

 

“I see. But it’s okay, my lady.”

 

As Norman smiled and reassured her, Elise’s eyes widened.

 

“His Grace often rises early. Sometimes, he starts his work before the servants are up. Moreover…”

 

Norman paused for a moment and scratched his eyebrows. Elise, who noticed that he was worried about whether or not he should speak, quickly stopped him.

 

“Well, if you’re uncomfortable you don’t have to… ”

 

“No, it’s fine. It’s something the lady needs to know now.”

 

Norman shook his head and continued to explain.

 

“His Grace doesn’t particularly prefer personal attendants, so he does most things himself. Changing clothes or bathing, it’s the same.”

 

Elise slightly widened her eyes.

 

“Are you surprised?”

 

“A little.”

 

She answered honestly. In response, Norman’s lips curved into a gentle smile.

 

“I understand. It’s an uncommon habit for nobles like His Grace.”

 

Then he added,

 

“So this is something you don’t need to worry about in the future.”

 

Only then did Elise feel truly relieved.

 

“Then where is the Duke now…?”

 

“I heard he went to the training grounds earlier, but ah, it seems he’s back now.”

 

Norman looked out the window and clapped his hands. He left first, saying he would meet the Duke.

 

Elise, now left alone, inadvertently walked to the window and looked outside. She could see the Duke walking towards her.

 

The man was wearing a white tunic that was easy to move around in, pants that hugged his strong legs, and high boots. He looked much more free-spirited than usual.

 

Perhaps because of the training, but at the same time, he gave off a rough and intimidating atmosphere. Even those who were far away were overwhelmed by his distinctive presence.

 

Elise inadvertently held her breath.

 

Suddenly, Cardale lifted his head.

 

His crimson eyes looked exactly at the window where she was standing.

 

Their eyes locked.

 



 

Elise took in a sharp breath and quickly stepped back. She almost tripped over her own feet.

 

‘Did he see me?’

 

Before she knew it, her heart was beating violently.

 

Perhaps it was because she was so surprised.

‘What do I do?’

 

Elise toyed with the tips of her fingers and then stopped, startled.

 

‘Another bad habit I can’t seem to shake off.’

 

In an instant, it felt like Vanessa’s reprimand would come flying at her, and her body involuntarily shrank.

 

“What are you doing here?”

 

A deep voice echoed down the hallway.

 

Elise reflexively turned her body and saw Cardale.

 

“I asked what you are doing here.”

 

“I, I…”

 

Even though she tried not to be nervous, she simply couldn’t. It was always like that when she was in front of this man. Her mind turned blank, and she couldn’t even understand what she was saying.

 

What Elise blurted out was all because of that tension.

 

“I was wondering if there was anything the Duke needed assistance with…”

 

And, she immediately regretted it. She had just heard from Norman that the Duke would not be attended to.

 

Elise realised she was being stupid, and blamed herself.

 

“Assistance, huh?”

 

A playful voice fell over her head.

 

“You are a maid who is faithful to her duties.”

 

Elise carefully raised her head and looked at Cardale. Fortunately, he didn’t seem upset.

 

“But I won’t really need anything for the time being.”

 

He opened his mouth, looking at her closely as if watching her reaction.

 

“I plan to leave the mansion for a few days.”

 

“Ah…”

 

Elise was overwhelmed with just the task of cultivating her skills as a lady. Therefore, she couldn’t even imagine how enormous the responsibility and work the duke carried was. 

 

Maybe it was something so difficult and dangerous that she couldn’t even fathom it.

 

Elise was wondering what to say, but she decided just to be honest.

 

Her little lips trembled.

 

“Please take care and come back safely.”

 

At once, Cardale’s straight eyebrows twitched.

 

He stared at Elise for a moment, with a face that seemed to be looking at a creature that was incomprehensible.

 

“Wouldn’t it be a good thing for you if I never came back?”

 

“What?”

 

Elise paused. At first, because she didn’t understand what Cardale said, but then it was due to the blatant sarcasm that left her bewildered.

 

“If I break a bone or get stabbed by a knife, it would make things easier for you in many ways.”

 

“Well, it’s not like that.”

 

She shook her head and denied it, but he didn’t seem to believe her. His cold contempt returned.

 

“Really, it’s not…”

 

“I guess that’s what you say.”

 

The man cut her off and turned around.

 

Elise didn’t understand what went wrong. She couldn’t guess what mistake she might have made, as she felt like she had somehow offended the Duke’s feelings.

 

But she didn’t have the courage to ask what mistake she had made.

 



 

She stared blankly at Cardale’s back as he walked away and then lowered her head.

 

Maybe her very existence was the problem.

 

As she guessed, he had already lost interest a long time ago.

 



 

In the dead of night, Inghel. 

 

There was a place that was as magical as dazzling chandelier lights.

 

The area with the highest floating population is Inghel. In Melvik, the 7th district, the largest downtown area and a crime-ridden area. Where accidents occur every day due to the high concentration of lodging establishments and bars.

 

The streets were bright as if there was a festival, with gas lamps installed on certain streets and shops that were open until dawn.

 

The unique, lively atmosphere was enough to catch the attention of travellers.

 

Exciting sounds of musical instruments were playing somewhere, and intoxicated men were giggling with their arms around each other’s shoulders. The solicitation to attract new customers was also fierce.

 

A boy shouted in front of a bar located on the main street.

 

“With three drinks, you get one free! If you drink three drinks, you get one free!”

 

With the jingling sound of the bell, the boy shouted vigorously. However, perhaps due to trying too hard, he accidentally let the bell slip.

 

“Oops…!”

 

This was when the boy followed the rolling bell, and bent down to pick it up.

 

A pitch-black boot stepped right next to it with a dull thud. The light reflected off the smooth leather and sparkled.

 

The boy was also a shoe shiner during the day, so he knew the status of most people who wore shoes that were spotless.

 

He gulped, swallowing his saliva, and his still-young throat was shaking.

 

It was then that long fingers wearing black gloves picked up the bell and handed it over.

 

“T-Thank you.”

 

The boy politely accepted the bell that fell into his palm.

 

“Do you work at that store?”

 

At that question, the boy raised his head. Then he saw a man so beautiful that it took his breath away.

 

The man frowned as he looked at the boy, who had yet to respond.

 

“I asked if you worked at that store.”

 

“Yes, yes…!”

 

The boy, fascinated by the man’s face, belatedly looked back at the store and quickly nodded his head.

 

Then the man straightened his back and dropped a silver coin as if to give the boy a hand.

 

“This is for today’s work.”

 

“Yes…?”

 

The boy just blinked, not knowing what was going on. It was the reaction of someone who encountered incredible luck.

 

Instead of explaining why he gave the boy the silver, the man turned and walked away. Men in pitch black clothes, who the boy didn’t see behind the man, followed him inside.

 

“It might be dangerous to stay, so it’s best for you to go home now.”

 

Another man spoke to the boy who was sitting blankly.

 

“Take care of that money so it doesn’t get stolen.”

 

“Oh, right!”

 

Only then did the boy hurriedly shove the silver coin away.

 

“Thank you!”

 

The boy jumped up from his crouch, bent his waist halfway, and bowed. However, the man who kindly warned him, was already heading into the store. Following the man who had just given him money.

 

“What the hell is going on?”

 

The boy’s puzzled expression quickly transformed into a curious one as he dashed across the street to the tavern on the other side.

 

And after a while, loud noises and screams rang out from the bar.

 



 

How do you hunt down the remnants of an enemy from Helmut, who entered Nodrat?

 

Cardale’s method was simple and clear.

 

First, find all the foreigners who entered Inghel. Anyone who was not a citizen of the Nodrat Empire was required to leave an entry record when entering the city.

 

Then, by identifying the gender, age, purpose of stay, etc. Begin surveillance on individuals with a high likelihood of being involved, capturing any suspicious behaviour.

 

There may have been some who even forged their nationalities and IDs, but it didn’t matter. What was really needed was the end of the line.

 

If you just hold on to it, it was expected that others would follow suit.

 

It didn’t take long for his capable subordinates to single out the most likely suspects.

 

“I have information that they are making contact at a tavern in District 7.”

 

And finally, some good information came in. It was about Helmut’s spies making contact with local informants.

 

“We’ve caught them at a very interesting moment.”

 

“Really?”

 

“No.”

 

The smile disappeared from Cardale’s face in an instant. The man now only had an eerie expression on his face, his subordinates trembled without realising it.

 

The Duke personally stepped onto the scene.

 

“Wait here.”

 

“Yes, Your Excellency.”

 

When Michael nodded, the soldiers quickly surrounded the store. There were a few people snooping around to see what was going on, but they quickly tucked their tails and retreated due to their murderous looks.

 

“I can’t stand anything noisy.”

 

Cardale clicked his tongue lightly and entered the store. Then, the loud store suddenly became quiet.

 

He stood out too much. 

 

A beautiful face, sculpturally perfect and an overwhelming physique with an aura that was hard to match.

 

Cardale raised an eyebrow and glanced inside. Then he pinpointed a table.

 

“Over there.”

 

Cardale muttered softly as he looked at the five men sitting at the innermost table, closest to the back door.

 

The reaction was immediate.

 

“Who the hell are you?”

 

With the dull noise of a chair falling on the floor, they pulled out the swords at their waists.

 

The customers, startled by the drawn swords, jumped up and started screaming while running out of the store.

 

“Run!”

 

Tables fell over randomly, making loud crashing sounds. The smashing of plates and glasses mixed together with the screams, and the place instantly became chaotic.

 

Cardale drew his sword without wavering even in the disarray. There was a soft metallic sound as it slid against the sheath.

 

“Kill him!”

 

As the man who seemed to be the leader shouted, those holding swords brandished their weapons fiercely. They rushed towards Cardale.

 

Blades stabbing from different directions flashed with deadly force. However, Cardale swung his sword with an indifferent expression.

 

“AAARRGGHH!”

 

A man was lying on the floor, clutching his ankles and screaming. Blood spurted from both ankles, where the ligaments and tendons had been cut.

 

“W-what…!”

 

Other men paused for a moment and took a step back.

 

‘I couldn’t even see the sword’s trajectory properly!’

 

They swallowed as they looked at their colleague, who had become crippled in the blink of an eye.

 

“Don’t back down! It’s only one person!”

 

They came to their senses as the voice woke them up. Yes, there was only one opponent in front of them, and there were still four of them.

 

No matter how good of a warrior he was, it was almost impossible to avoid the swords of four skilled men.

 

Up until that moment, they believed that to be true.

“ARRGGHHH!”

 

However, when another man fell, incapable of fighting, they realised that there was no hope for them to continue like this.

 

“This won’t work! Get your guns out! Now!”

 

They became so desperate that they took out the pistols hidden in their waistbands and aimed at Cardale. Cardale didn’t even blink when he saw the guns.

 

TAANG, BANG, BANG!

 

Fire spewed out from different muzzles.

 

However, the screams came from someone besides the man who should have been shot.

 

“How did this happen…?”

 

The man left alone muttered in shock as he looked at the four fallen men.

 

He was the one giving instructions to his colleagues just a little while ago.

 

“Now there’s one left.”

 

Cardale’s low voice sent goosebumps down the man’s back. The man grit his teeth.

 

‘Can I even beat this guy?’

 

No. It was realistically impossible.

 

‘Then I have to run away… But how?’

 

His eyes darted around the room, looking for a way out of this situation. Behind Cardale’s back, he could see his colleagues sprawled on the floor, struggling to pick up a gun.

 

‘Good. If you do it right…!’

 

He decided to speak to the man standing in front of him to hold his gaze.

 

“My name is Gunther.”

 



 

“Who the hell are you?”

 

The man didn’t answer. Of course, it didn’t matter. His colleague had finished aiming and was about to pull his trigger.

 

TAANG!

 

“Gasp…!”

 

Gunther was shocked by the screaming and the absurd scene before his eyes.

 

His colleague who had been aiming at the man just moments before was the one shot.

 

His colleague, head half blown off, somehow held the muzzle of the gun to his chin. Smoke was still billowing from the muzzle of the gun.

 

“This.”

 

The man who was gently pressing the smooth body of the pistol with the tip of his sword removed the sword and said.

 

“My sword is dirty.”

 

Gunther froze in place. A chill flowing through his veins and spreading throughout his body.

 

‘He is not an ordinary human.’

 

It was only a fleeting moment. But the man completely changed the direction of the gun pointed at him, just with the tip of his sword.

 

‘This man is…’

 

His body shook from overwhelming fear. The sound of teeth chattering reached his ears.

 

‘Cardale Vassenberg!’

 

Gunter belatedly remembered the man’s name. In the war between Helmut and Nodrat, the commander of the enemy nation was said to have swept the battlefield with inaction that seemed inhumane.

 

And his notoriety did not just come from there.

 

“I was thinking of putting your life on hold.”

 

Cardale took a step. The sound pierced Gunther’s ears.

 

“But now that I think about it, I don’t think it’s necessary.”

 

He swung the creepy blade indifferently.

 

The blade plunged into his colleague’s heart, the one who fainted from a loud sound.

 

“NOOO!”

 

Gunther screamed and stretched out his hands. No, he tried to. But he couldn’t move. A powerful intangible force was restraining him.

 

“Save me…!”

 

One colleague, unable to move from his cut tendons, and another lying down with broken limbs. Both stopped breathing.

 

“It only takes one person to confess.”

 

Cardale said, looking back at Gunther. Gunter was horrified by that indifferent face.

 

A calm face as if nothing had happened. Even if you step on an ant and kill it, there would be a greater reaction.

 

“Oh, you devil…” 

 

“How cliche.”

 

Cardale roughly swung his sword and brushed off the blood and fluids from the blade.

 

“Is there a more unique expression?”

 

He put back the cleaned blade and walked towards Gunter, who was frozen in place and trembling. 

 

“You’re lucky. As the last survivor, you have the chance to keep your life.”

 

At the same time, a piece of cloth was stuffed into Gunther’s mouth.

 

“But it would be difficult if you accidentally committed suicide.”

 

“Ugh, ugh…!”

 

Gunter struggled. But his body was out of control and no longer his.

 

Cardale turned away from the struggling man.

 

“You may come in.”

 

As soon as the order was given, Michael and the other waiting soldiers entered the building.

 

Cardale pointed to the man he had subdued.

 

“He’s a Helmut spy. Take him and interrogate him. Search their luggage thoroughly.”

 

“At your command.”

 

Gunther was dragged out by the soldiers.

 

Not long after, Michael found a large piece of parchment and brought it to Cardale.

 

“It’s a map.”

 

It was a map containing major strategic points of the Nodrat Empire, including Inghel. Quite different from an ordinary map.

 

“Only military facilities are marked.”

 

“Yes. The location is very accurate as well. Whoever the insider in communication with the enemy is, I suspect their access to information is quite high.”

 

“I guess so.”

 

After carefully examining the map, Cardale folded up the parchment and handed it back. Michael asked as he took the map.

 

“Would you like to return to your residence, Your Grace?”

 

Cardale, about to turn around and go outside, stopped dead in his tracks.

 

“No.”

 

Contrary to his seemingly indifferent answer, his face became eerily dark.

 

“I think I should conduct the interrogation myself.”

 

“Your Excellency, are you saying you’ll do it personally?”

 

“Is there a problem with that?”

 

“No, Your Excellency.”

 

Michael quickly shook his head.

 

“I’ll place a mole in the mansion. When should we set the date for it?”

 

“Well.”

 

A cruel smile appeared on the man’s sculpted face.

 

“It will all depend on the spy’s cooperation.”

 

Michael knew the various methods the Duke would use to obtain that cooperation.

 

None of them are very gentlemanly.

 

Above all, he noticed the Duke was not in a good mood, so Michael asked cautiously.

 

“Your Excellency, are you okay?”

 

Then the man’s head tilted as if he heard a strange question.

 

“Is there any reason not to be okay?”

 

Michael was about to reply that he looked dizzy, but then changed his mind.

 

“…No.”

 

“Tedious.”

 

The duke said a cold word and then left.

 

Michael muttered, letting out a long sigh.

 

“It’s troublesome.”

 

He looked at the already dead spies and thought they were lucky.

 

He could already smell the bloody wafting from the interrogation room.

 



 

Even without the owner, life at the Duke’s residence went on as usual.

 

Elise felt alone among the people doing their own thing.

 

Nothing, really. She was doing nothing.

 

‘It shouldn’t be like this.’

 

Elise recalled the Duke’s cold eyes. His face seemed to say that he could get rid of her at any time.

 

Before he could do that, she had to prove that she was somehow useful. No matter how insignificant it may be.

 

With her worries, Elise went to see Norman.

 

“Lady Elise?”

 

“I’m sorry for coming to you so suddenly.”

 

She apologised to Norman, who must have been surprised by the sudden visit, and then asked.

 

“Is there anything I can do? Even if it’s a very small thing, it’s okay.”

 

When Elise felt Norman’s curious gaze, she tightly clutched the hem of her skirt. It was a strange request, she knew better.

 

Fortunately, Norman soon answered her with a gentle smile.

 

“Now that I think about it, I have accumulated a lot of letters for my master. I need to send a reply, so if you don’t mind, could you help me?”

 

“Is it okay if I see a letter for the Duke?”

 

Elise asked worriedly.

 

“It’s okay they have already been separated. Most of them are invitations to parties or balls.”

 

Elise’s expression brightened slightly. She could write a letter simply declining the invitations.

 

“If that’s the case… I can help you as much as I can.”

 

Elise nodded, careful not to overtly show her joy.

 

“Please wait in your room for a moment, and I will bring you the letters.”

 

Elise returned to her bedroom and waited.

 

Soon, she saw Norman come with a box containing letters. Inside were several letters, neatly organised.

 

He spoke as he placed each item he had brought onto her desk.

 

“You can use this for paper and ink. I have prepared a medium-sized quill, but if it is inconvenient, please let me know.”

 

“Thank you, Norman.”

 

“No. In fact, this is something I’m thankful to you for.”

 

Norman smiled and answered. Then he left the bedroom, telling her to call him whenever she needed anything else.

 

Elise sat down carefully in front of the desk. When her feet touched the floor, she was a little surprised.

 

She always had to sit on her tiptoes at home, as her desk did not fit her height. But here, the desk was tailored to her body, as if it were custom-made.

 

She somehow had the courage to think she could do well. Elise took out her first invitation, read it, and lifted her quill.

 

Her movements were careful as she picked up the ink and placed it on the paper.

 

‘Clearly, without mistakes…’

 

Soon, a crunching sound spread throughout the quiet room.

 

After some time, Norman came to Elise to bring her tea and was surprised.

 

“Oh my God, Lady Elise! Have you been writing letters this whole time?”

 

He quickly checked the time. Several hours had passed. He had no idea that she had been writing letters without moving until now.

 

But what was more perplexing was Elise’s reaction upon his return.

 

She said, unable to hide her sorry face.

 

“It took too long, sorry. I’m not used to rejecting invitations… I’m almost done. Could you wait a moment?”

 

“Are you saying you did all that in one day?”


Unlike the surprised Norman, Elise finished what she was writing as if it was no big deal.

 

“I just need to finish what I’m writing now. Ah, it’s done.”

 

Finally, Elise carefully inserted the quill back into the ink bottle and looked at Norman.

 

“Well, but…”

 

When Elise hesitated, Norman quickly asked.

 

“Is there anything you need?”

 

“That…”

 

She hesitated and then asked cautiously.

 

“If you have time, could you read the replies I wrote? If you tell me what to fix, I’ll write it again.”

 

For a moment, Norman couldn’t believe his ears. It was such a surprising request.

 

At first, he thought Elise was joking, but when he saw the expression on her face he realised she was serious.

 

So Norman fell into even greater shock.

 

He answered in a softer voice than usual so as not to offend her.

 

“Miss. Thank you for trusting me with such a request, but I cannot dare to evaluate the letter you wrote. Master will check it anyway…”

 

But as Elise’s face went pale as he continued to speak, Norman asked.

 

“Lady Elise?”

 

“…It could be possible.”

 

Elise held her hands tightly and bowed her head. Seeing that she seemed completely discouraged, Norman even felt guilty.

 

“Miss, I’m sorry, but could you say that again?”

 

A small voice came out from her as she licked her lips for a while.

 

“What if what I made was too messy? I can’t show that to the Duke…”

 

Elise raised her head. Her desperation was clear on her earnest face.

 

Even after seeing such an expression, Norman was not cold-hearted enough to ignore it, citing the virtues of his subordinates.

 

“Then would you mind if I take a quick look and see if there is anything I can help you with?”

 

Elise’s face suddenly turned bright red. She handed Norman the neatly stacked letters.

 

Norman picked up the first letter and looked it over.

 

The first thing that caught his eye was the straight print font. The handwriting was clear and written with great care, you could even feel the sincerity.

 

Norman’s eyes quickly scanned the contents. When he read it to the end, surprise appeared on his face.

 

It was a plain rejection letter without any unnecessary details. Yet, it did not lose its politeness. Although it graciously expressed gratitude for the victory congratulations, it drew a gentlemanly line.

 

‘This…’

 

Originally, Norman had no intention of evaluating his master’s woman.

 

It was very common for high-ranking nobles to have lovers or mistresses by their side. So if the Duke decided to have them in this mansion, Norman simply followed suit.

 

Because of his soft heart, he could not do anything evil to those under him. So as long as there was no trouble in the mansion, that was enough for this butler.

 

In other words, it wouldn’t have mattered if Elise Schuvan was an incompetent person who couldn’t do anything.

 

He appreciated her willingness to help in any way she could, but he honestly had no expectations of her.

 

She was an illegitimate child and routinely ostracised in the Empire, so it was impossible for her to receive a proper education.

 

However, after reading just one letter from Elise, Norman realised that his thoughts were completely wrong.

 

‘She wrote it flawlessly and neatly. I heard that her origins were unclear, but how could it be to this extent?’

 

The prejudice he didn’t even know he had for her was shattered.

 

Norman folded the letter again and put it in the envelope, straightening his posture.

 

Elise waited for his words with an anxious look on her face.

 

“Is it very strange…?”

 

“No. In fact, it’s the opposite.”

 

He bowed deeply. Then Elise was embarrassed and waved her hands.

 

“Norman…!”

 

“Thank you, Lady Elise.”

 

Norman bowed politely and smiled warmly.

 

“This was really helpful.”

 

Elise stood blank and paused at the unexpected words.

 

But as her expression straightened and the corner of her mouth began to twitch without her knowledge, she hurriedly caught up with all her thoughts.

 

‘I can’t get excited like a fool. Norman is a kind and good man. He may only have been nice to me.’

 

Not long ago, she had countless flaws pointed out by Vanessa. She often heard criticism that her skills were not improving.

 

“I’m glad I was of some help.”

 

That was why Elise tried not to expect too much.

 

“Then… Can you tell me what to fix? There may be many shortcomings, but if I work diligently, I will be able to finish it by tomorrow…”

 

“I’m sorry, but that might be difficult, Miss.”

 

Norman shook his head with a smile on his face.

 

“You wrote it so well that it is pointless to comb for mistakes. This is a letter worth sending right away.”

 

Elise blinked. She could clearly hear it with her own ears, but she couldn’t believe that he was saying this to her.

 

“Would you believe me if I told you that I would be embarrassed to give you my opinion?”

 

“Really…?”

 

Elise looked at Norman. When he nodded his head in the affirmative again, her mouth fell open.

 

‘I never dreamed that I would be told that I did a good job…’

 

Elise, who had always been criticised for not being able to do anything right, began to feel very strange.

 

‘It feels like I’m dreaming.’

 

In her head, she knew that she shouldn’t be arrogant and take what Norman was saying at face value. But for some reason, a corner of her heart kept getting itchy.

 

“I don’t know how to thank you, Lady Elise.”

 

“Well, it’s not a big deal.”

 

Elise held out her hand. A blush of joy that she could not hide appeared on her cheeks.

 

Elise gathered her shy courage.

 

“Can you tell me if there is anything else I need to write in response to the invitations? Let me help you. But… only that’s okay with you.”

 

“Are you sure you want to do this?”

 

Now that Norman was truly glad for her help, Elise’s heart was soaring like a hot air balloon.

 

“Of course.”

 

Elise nodded her head.

 

After repeatedly expressing his gratitude to her, Norman gathered up the replies Elise wrote and walked out.

 

Elise placed her hands on her heart and closed her eyes.

 

‘This is what it feels like to be recognised by someone…’

 

For some reason, her heart swelled. She was so happy that she had done something right.

 

‘I hope the Duke likes it too…’

 

Elise made a wish, remembering the red eyes that shone mercilessly.

 

‘So it would be nice if I could last a little longer here.’

 

Elise hoped that the man who owned this huge mansion would recognise her usefulness at least a little.

 



 

It was the fourth day after the owner had left the Vassenberg residence, and it became more noisy than usual.

 

It was because an uninvited guest came.

 

“Butler Norman, we’re in big trouble!”

 

A soldier guarding the Duke’s residence quickly ran over and announced the identity of the visitor.

 

Norman had a feeling that something was about to happen.

 

He checked his attire as a butler once again and headed toward the front door. Even from afar, a large, ornate carriage could be seen outside the massive iron gate.

 

The carriage was shiny and decorated with gold leaf as if to show the status of the person riding it.

 

As Norman approached the front door, he bowed to the carriage and greeted it.

 

“Her Highness the Princess.”

 

The face of an uninvited guest was revealed through the open carriage window. Theresia asked coldly.

 

“What are you doing without opening the door?”

 

Norman responded calmly.

 

“I’m sorry, but His Excellency the Duke is away on important business. So, could you please make an appointment to visit us later and come back?”

 

“That’s rude. You probably don’t know who I am, right?”

 

“You are Theresia von Oldenhilt, the First Princess of the Empire. How could I not have known? However, as I said, His Excellency is away–”

 

“I don’t care.”

 

Theresia cut Norman off.

 

“Because it’s not the Duke I have come to see.”

 

Suddenly, Norman’s mouth hardened. But he pretended not to know and asked back.

 

“Then may I know why you decided to visit?”

 

Theresia seemed to be amazed, and she laughed.

 

“I’m not going to answer that. Don’t you know why?”

 

“As I get older, I’m not as good at reading customers’ intentions as I used to be. Please help me understand.”

 

“Is this a request to understand? Or are you giving me orders?”

 

“If you feel that way, it’s my fault. I apologise.”

 

Feeling that she could no longer do what she said, Theresia bluntly explained the purpose of her visit to the mansion.

 

“Elise Schuvan.”

 



 

“I need to see that woman. Right Now.”

 

And it was a big deal.

 

The Princess’s spirit was unexpectedly strong, and Norman was unusually nervous.

 

‘But I can’t do as the Princess wishes.’

 

It was obvious what would happen when the Princess and Elise encountered each other.

 

That was why Norman answered with a calm smile on his face.

 

“I don’t know how you can find the Lady of Count Schuvan here…”

 

“Shut up.”

 

In an instant, Theresia’s tone completely changed. Her mood froze.

 

“I’m not here to play with words. How long do you plan on humiliating me?”

 

Her focus shot up fiercely. Her cunning grey eyes sparkled like a snake seeking its prey.

 

“Do I have to order that woman to be dragged outside for you to understand?”

 

One of the guards who came with the Princess took out a piece of paper from her arms and unfolded it.

 

“This is an order for Elise Schuvan to have an audience with His Majesty.”

 

Norman’s face hardened as he checked the order with the Emperor’s seal.

 

‘It’s a threat. If you don’t let me meet the young lady, I will drag you away under the Emperor’s orders.’

 

Norman, realising the seriousness of the situation, winked at the Duke’s soldier.

 

‘Go and inform His Excellency of this.’


The soldier, who had clearly understood the message, took advantage of the confusion and quickly disappeared.

 

Norman looked at the Princess with her calm face, hiding his worries.

 

Theresia spoke with a wicked smile on her face.

 

“What are you going to do?”

 

With the Emperor’s order issued, it was impossible for Norman, a mere butler, to stop the Princess.

 

‘But I must protect the young lady somehow.’

 

Norman straightened his back. The smile that was always on his face had disappeared. He spoke in a firm yet firm tone.

 

“I will take you inside.”

 

The corner of Theresia’s mouth curled up.

 

“I wish you had done that from the beginning. Hurry and open the door.”

 

“Instead, the only person who can enter the mansion is Her Highness the Princess.”

 

“What?”

 

“I hope you understand that this is a minimum safety measure.”

 

Theresia’s face froze.

 

“Are you now insulting the honour of the knights of the Imperial Palace in front of me?”

 

Despite the harsh stares, Norman responded without giving in.

 

“Even if it’s an escort, a soldier is still a soldier. I am telling you that coming into a noble’s private property with these people could be problematic.”

 

Norman added a word.

 

“Even in a mansion without an owner.”

 

This time, Theresia couldn’t find the words to respond.

 

Leading soldiers into a nobleman’s mansion unexpectedly was something that happened only when they committed treason.

 

If Cardale Vassenberg made an issue of this, she would be in trouble.

 

After Theresia had finished her calculations, she lifted her chin and spoke haughtily.

 

“Good. Then just take one escort.”

 

“Then, is it okay for Lady Elise to have an escort as well?”

 

Theresia glared at Norman with her menacing eyes, but he did not flinch.

 

The Princess quietly gritted her teeth and spoke as if chewing.

 

“I will go in alone.”

 

“Her Highness the Princess!”

 

This time, her Imperial knights tried to dissuade her, but Theresia pushed them away.

 

The Princess glared at Norman as if she would tear him apart.

 

“Lead me in.”

 

Finally, the door to the Duke’s residence opened, and only the carriage carrying the Princess came inside.

 

Norman left the Imperial knights outside and turned back to the locked door.

 

He hoped that the soldier could reach the Duke as soon as possible to inform him of the situation so that the master could return to the mansion before it was too late.

 



 

“Miss, if something urgent happens, please pull the cord in the living room.”

 

Elise nodded her head at Norman’s request.

 

“Thank you.”

 

“No. Don’t say things like that.”

 

A look of guilt appeared on Norman’s face. He asked again.

 

“Wouldn’t it be better for me to be with you?”

 

“Her Royal Highness said she wanted to see me alone.”

 

Elise smiled for Norman.

 

“Nothing will happen. Do not worry.”

 

Then she headed to the reception room where the Princess was waiting.

 

But contrary to what she said, Elise was afraid. She was scared to even look the Princess in the eyes.

 

Because her eyes were very similar to the Count, the one who had trampled her mercilessly in the past.

 

“Your Royal Highness, this is Elise Schuvan.”

 

There was silence for a moment before an answer was heard. During that short time, Elise had a fleeting hope that maybe the Princess had left.

 

“Please come in.”

 

Elise held her breath. She suppressed the trembling in her body and went inside.

 

“I see you, Your Royal Highness…”

 

“You damn bitch.”

 

Slap!

 

Elise’s head jerked to one side with the sharp sound of a hand hitting her face.

 



 

Elise blinked. With a blank look on her face, she wondered what had happened, she slowly raised her hand and cupped her numb cheek.

 

“You made this happen.”

 

Her cheek felt like it was on fire. It felt like the inside of her mouth was bursting from a metallic taste.

 

Elise bit her lip, holding back the pain that surged through her.

 

“You became the Duke’s maid, right?”

 

Elise couldn’t say anything in response to Theresia’s sharp questioning. She would be lying if she said she didn’t, and she thought that saying yes would make the Princess even more angry.

 

“Aren’t you going to answer?”

 

“…Yes, Your Royal Highness.”

 

But Elise had no choice but to answer the question.

 

“I learned you were an illegitimate child, and you seem to have no sense of shame. This is why we should not associate with things of a poor origin.”

 

Instead of answering, Elise lowered her head. Then Theresia asked.

 

“Did you sleep with him?”

 

Elise’s body flinched at the Princess’s explicit question.

 

It was unfortunate that her reaction was misunderstood by the Princess. At that moment, Theresia’s eyes rolled back, filled with uncontrollable anger.

 

“How dare this lowly thing!”

 

Before Elise could sense danger, a dull sound struck her ears.

 

Ting!

 

It was a shock that felt like a bell ringing.

 

Elise couldn’t even scream and fell helplessly to the floor.

 

Before her eyes flickered like a broken gas lamp, and her head spun. Elise couldn’t even raise her body and only gasped lightly.

 

“Wake up.”

 

A voice mixed with hatred and contempt landed on Elise’s head as she fell to the floor.

 

“How can you be so abominable? Can’t you get up?”

 

In response to the Princess’s yelling, Elise barely managed to raise her body with shaking legs.

 

Theresia, glaring down at her with her, chewed and spat out.

 

“Do you know what happened to Raymond Hartmann because of you?”

 

“W-what…?” 

 

Elise’s eyes wavered.

 

“I hear he is living alone in his mansion because of the shock of breaking off your engagement. He is leaving the Islands, and word is going around that he’s coming down to the estate soon. It means that Hartmann’s noble successor has virtually given up his social life.”

 

For a moment, Elise felt as if she was being strangled. She had been so worried about her own situation that she hadn’t even thought about Raymond.

 

‘I had just read that letter… I thought he was okay…’

 

Elise lowered her head. If it weren’t for her, Raymond would have ended up with an elegant and dignified lady who matched his class.

 

She couldn’t raise her head because of the guilt.

 

“You have a face that says, ‘I had no idea.’ Well, maybe you should at least pretend to be that innocent? How many men have you deceived with that fragile facade?”

 

Anger and vitriol poured out like a waterfall. Elise just suffered and endured because that was all she could do.

 

Suddenly, Theresia asked.

 

“Did you like it?”

 

As Elise looked up at the Princess with an incomprehensible look on her face, Theresia twisted her lips.

 

“It must have been nice to curl up in bed, together with Cardale Vassenberg.”

 

Elise was so surprised that she held her breath and only pursed her lips. It took time for her voice to come out properly.

 

“Nothing…”

 

Elise stuttered, her cheeks swollen from the blows, the throbbing increased with every word she spoke.

 

“Nothing happened…”

 

“Don’t be mistaken.”

 

But instead of listening to her answer, Theresia gave a warning.

 

“If you believe that you can marry a Duke when you’re just a girl who only wants to warm up his bed…”

 

“It’s not like that.”

 

Elise shook her head vigorously.

 

“I really am nothing.”

 

She spoke urgently, looking at Theresia, who furrowed her eyebrows.

 

“The Duke is just keeping me by his side for a time. What Her Royal Highness is worried about… It will never happen.”

 

After finishing speaking, Elise clasped her hands tightly and hugged her shoulders.

 

Theresia looked down at the timid woman’s head for a moment, then calmed down a little.

 

“It looks like you have a grasp of the situation.”

 

The Princess’s index finger lifted the tip of Elise’s chin. Her sharp, manicured nails grazed her delicate skin, scratching her.

 

“You should remember that well.”

 

Theresia laughed at Elise, who couldn’t even make eye contact with her, and shook off her hand that touched her chin.

 

The wind caused Elise’s body to sway greatly, and she fell to the floor.

 

“It seems like you understand what I am saying, so I think I’ll leave it at this.”

 

The arrogant Princess turned away, leaving Elise alone.

 

Then she stopped in front of the door as if she had suddenly remembered something. Theresia looked back and gave a final warning.

 

“Not long ago, the Duke had many mistresses before you who died. Good luck, Elise Schuvan.”

 



 

“Oh my God, Lady Elise!”

 

Norman shouted in astonishment.

 

“Call the doctor, warm water and clean cloth, hurry!”

 

The instructed maids rushed out. Norman helped the collapsed Elise sit on a soft sofa, giving her warm water.

 

“What on earth did Her Highness do…?”

 

“It’s okay, Norman.”

 

Elise reassured him with a smile on her pale face. Norman shook his head.

 

“Why didn’t you say anything before this happened?”

 

“It wasn’t serious enough to call you.”

 

When Elise responded with a shy smile, Norman became even more confused.

 

‘I was complacent. The Princess and the young lady should not have been left alone.’

 

Norman, fully aware of his responsibility in this, bowed his head heavily.

 

“Please wait a moment. The doctor’s house is not far from here, he will be here soon.”

 

“Yes.”

 

While Elise quenched her thirst with the water Norman brought her, Norman placed a thick blanket on her knees.

 

At that moment, the harsh sound of horses’ hooves was heard from outside her curtained window.

 

“Looks like he has arrived.”

 

Norman was about to get up to greet the doctor, but Elise carefully called out to him.

 

“Nor-Norman.”

 

“Yes, Miss. Do you need anything?”

 

Elise hesitated as if she was saying something difficult. After a while, a small voice left her lips.

 

“I was wondering if my appearance is too ugly…”

 

“Miss?”

 

“If I get treatment… The wound can heal quickly, right? So, until the Duke comes home–”

 

However, Elise could not finish her sentence.

 

It was because the door opened and a man appeared. 

 

The Duke.

 

The startled eyes of Elise and Cardale met. As soon as he saw her, his eyes hardened coldly.

 

“Norman Crowood, explain.”

 

A voice subdued by anger rang low throughout the room.

 

“Everything without exception.”


Elise hastily lowered her head. It was an attempt to hide her swollen cheeks somehow.

 

But it was of no use, the man had already seen everything.

 

Cardale walked over with long strides and lifted Elise’s face.

 

Sigh…!

 

She couldn’t bear to face him and closed her eyes tightly. Her small body trembled.

 

‘What should I do if I get kicked out because my face is ugly?’

 

“Did the Princess do this?”

 

Tears came to her eyes. Beneath her closed eyelids, her eyes became wet little by little.

 

‘No. If I cry, I’ll really look bad.’

 

Elise bit the inside of her lip to stop herself from crying. That was when her wound opened, and the stinging pain spread.

 

The man’s hand grasping her chin, tightened.

 

“Open your mouth.”

 

“Ah…!”

 

Her small voice burst out, and Elise’s lips naturally opened. Surprised, she opened her eyes in confusion and had to face the bright red eyes in front of her.

 

“S-sorry…”

 

Cardale’s brow stiffened at the words that came out reflexively. Seeing the man’s face become even harsher than before, Elise flinched again.

 



 

He studied her face without saying anything. Unable to turn her head from his captivity, Elise had to take in all of his gaze.

 

“It would be troublesome to scratch it like this.”

 

The man started by gently rubbing her lips with his thumb.

 

“Without my permission.”

 

Elise’s heart sank.

 

She hadn’t looked in a mirror, she didn’t realise how messed up she looked. And, of course, the Duke would be displeased with this ugly appearance.

 

‘No. If I get kicked out…’

 

She lifted her trembling hands and grabbed the man’s wrist, still holding her chin.

 

“Sorry. I was wrong.”

 



 

“Can you please wait just a little while? I can get better really quickly.”

 

The tears that had gathered under her eyes slowly flowed down her cheeks. How unsightly it must be… Even this didn’t go as planned, and Elise became even more sad.

 

[“Why is it that the more you try to do well, the more you fall into trouble? Why does it end up being such a mess when you try to fix it?”]

 

[“It’s all because of your lack of proper manners.”]

 

[“You are so stupid that you can’t even learn this easy and simple thing properly. And then you still want to meet Marissa?”]

 

[“Once you become a dog, you will live as a dog until you die. Yes, you.”]

 

Numerous things she had heard poured into her head. She had no time to sort out the situation.

 

Elise was unable to come to her senses because the violent words were swirling in her head. It felt like someone had stuck an iron rod into her head and was waving it around as they pleased.

 

Eventually, her vision became blurry. Suddenly, the world turned white, and nothing was visible.

 

She must have had her eyes open, but maybe they were closed.

 

But then it shouldn’t be white everywhere but pitch black, so why…

 

Suddenly, her thoughts were interrupted.

 

Cardale caught Elise’s body, which fell like a puppet with cut strings. 

 



 

There was a tense atmosphere in the Duke’s office.

 

“When the Princess left, I went into the drawing-room… After that, it was just as you saw.”

 

After telling the truth about everything that happened, Norman bowed his head.

 

“It’s all my fault.”

 

Cardale’s cold gaze landed on the butler’s old, wrinkled face.

 

“If they had even brought in the Emperor’s orders, there was nothing you could have done.”

 

After staring at Norman for a while, he withdrew his gaze and said.

 

“I will leave this matter to myself. It won’t happen twice.”

 

“I will keep this in mind, master.”

 

Only then did Norman straighten his body.

 

“But isn’t it fun?”

 

Cardale leaned against the back of a black leather chair and opened his mouth.

 

“Michael Walter, what do you think?”

 

“…What do you mean?”

 

Michael, who was waiting with a straight posture next to his desk, asked.

 

“How did the Princess find out?”

 

Michael thought carefully before answering.

 

“It was only a matter of time before news of Lady Elise became known. Above all, it is difficult to rule out the possibility that it was leaked from Count Schuvan’s side.”

 

“No, I’m not asking about that.”

 

The corner of Cardale’s lip twitched.

 

“How did she know I was away from the mansion so she could come visit?”

 



 

Only then did shock spread across Michael’s face. Norman, who was also listening to the conversation, did the same.

 

“No way…”

 

“It looks like there’s a mole in the mansion.”

 

Michael swallowed. If that was true, then this was bad. No, there was a high probability that they already had a mole.

 

He looked at his master’s complexion with a nervous face.

 

There was a leisurely smile on the Duke’s lips. However, his eyes were not smiling, giving off an extremely creepy atmosphere.

 

Michael looked at Norman with a nervous expression. Sure enough, his face was pale.

 

“I only went outside for a moment, did I show too much leniency?”

 

“I’m sorry, Master.”

 

Norman got down on his knees. His eyes tightly closed.

 

“I will accept any responsibility.”

 

The Duke’s eyes looked down at the old butler, so cold that no emotions were betrayed.

 

“You look like you’re ready to die.”

 

The voice was so gloomy it sent a chill down the listener’s spine. Michael quickly intervened before the situation got any worse.

 

“Your Excellency, no servants entered the mansion during the war with Helmut.”

 

“So?”

 

A cold voice flowed from Cardale, filled with cynicism.

 

“There is nothing we can do about the servant being bribed, so let’s move on?”

 

“No. I’m just asking you to take the circumstances into consideration.”

 

The Duke’s eyes narrowed. His bright red eyes shined sharply, as if trying to find out his inner thoughts. 

 

“Since my aide is making this request, I will give you a chance to make up for it.”

 

Norman bowed his head.

 

“Just tell me what to do.”

 

“Find the mole.”

 

The eyes of the man giving the order were nothing short of terrifying.

 

“Every single one. Find them.”

 



 

Late that night, a figure visited the bedroom of the collapsed woman.

 

The guards in front of the door noticed the owner of the shadow and bowed their heads in an appropriate posture to show respect. Then, without delay, opened the closed door.

 

Cardale entered. In the quiet room was a spicy herbal scent.

 

Cardale walked slowly across the attached drawing room and into the bedroom next to it.

 

Only the sound of his footsteps echoed in the quiet space.

 

The bedroom was immersed in darkness, without a single light turned for her deep sleep. All that was visible was the little moonlight that seeped through a gap in the curtains.

 

But the eyes of a man who had no problem hunting at night, thanks to the Vassenberg bloodline, quickly adapted to the darkness.

 

His focus landed on the bed in the centre of the bedroom.

 

No, to be exact, on the small woman sleeping in the bed.

 

[“The doctor said she lost consciousness for a moment due to extreme tension. He said that if she gets enough rest, she will come to her senses in no time.”]

 

[“He advised that if we apply ointment regularly to the wound, it will not worsen and heal well.”]

 

Cardale looked down at the sleeping woman’s face.

 

Maybe it was because her swollen wounds were covered with sticky white ointment. Even in the darkness, the woman’s pale face stood out.

 

The impassive man’s gaze slowly examined the woman.

 

A round, white forehead, neat eyebrows, a small, pointed nose, and…

 

Suddenly, he stopped. It was her lips that were cracked, burst, with white ointment. Those lips, so small and cute, and the soft skin that would swell up just from a little bit of sucking, were torn into a mess.

 

He felt a faint sense of discomfort as he remembered her lips that were as moist as fruit.

 

He recognised his feelings as he felt them.

 

She was prey that he marked as his, harvested, and quietly locked away. There was no way it couldn’t be unpleasant since this was bitten by a dirty, wild animal that he didn’t allow into his home. 

 

‘Since it can’t understand what I’m saying, should I kill it? It was clear that it would become a larger nuisance if I did that, so I left it alone. But since it still crawls without knowing who it is dealing with, I will need to take action.’

 

Of course, he had to reprimand his own ignorance and foolishness for not even knowing his own weakness and not coming before the beast. But punishment for this was something that came later.

 

Because those sad, wet blue eyes softened his anger just a little.

 

Moreover, the feeling of having a small, soft body in his arms was not as bad as he thought it would be. He must have lost his mind.

 

It was beautiful that she recognised her owner and returned to his arms.

 

So the man, who had easily shown mercy, left the woman’s bedroom.

 

The guards outside the door bowed again. His eyes looked as indifferent as always to them, but in fact, they were colder and sharper than before.

 

“Is it due to stupidity that one does not know the meaning of their job, or is it a guest who betrays their obedience?”

 

“…Please kill me.”

 

The soldiers both kneeled. Even though they were wearing armour, the movement didn’t make a sound.

 

He could have done as he wished. If he willed it, the guards heads would fall in the blink of an eye.

 

But Cardale remembered that human blood smelled quite rancid. If it seeps into the crevices of the floor or walls, it will be difficult to erase, and a trace will remain for a while.

 

For some reason, he didn’t really like that right now.

 

Thus, the Duke passed by those who failed to fulfil their master’s orders, instead of granting them an honourable death. 

 

Unbeknownst to the guards, it was simply a stroke of luck that they were spared.

The Duke saw blood everywhere.

 

The target was the remnant of the enemy Helmut captured from a tavern in Melvik.

 

Helmut’s spy was bleeding from holes all over his body. This was no longer torture to get a confession. He continued the tenacious execution even after extracting everything he needed from the spy’s mouth.

 

The scene was so gruesome that it aroused considerable fear in anyone unfortunate enough to witness it.

 

The spy’s suffering ended only when it became a mercy to be killed.

 

“Burn him.”

 

Cardale washed himself in the shower room next to the torture room and put on fresh clothes.

 

He buttoned the shirt himself and tied his cravat, and the way he fastened his cuffs with cufflinks seemed familiar and natural.

 

When he was finished, a perfect nobleman stood in front of the mirror. He was the well-known Duke, Cardale Wassenberg.

 

He went straight to the Imperial Palace.

 



 

“This is a record of the arrest and interrogation of Helmut’s remnant.”

 

Emperor Johann opened his eyes slightly wide. He looked at the Duke and the materials handed to him through his servant, then looked appalled.

 

‘How on earth did you capture a spy who eluded even my direct informants?’

 

He clicked his tongue and looked at the report. The content of the interrogation was quite specific. Of course, there were some cases of false and fabricated confessions, so he couldn’t believe them immediately.

 

“What is the credibility?”

 

“You say such interesting things.”

 

Cardale let out a low laugh.

 

“Evidence needs to be secured, but the information obtained through this confession is likely reliable. It wouldn’t be easy to fabricate plausible lies during the interrogation.”

 

As he added, goosebumps appeared on Johann’s forearms.

 

“If you’re curious, I can explain the interrogation process for you.”

 

“No, that’s quite enough!”

 

The Emperor hastily threw up his hand. He didn’t want to skip a meal because he was told something he didn’t need to hear.

 

Cardale laughed invisibly.

 

“Then, I will report the situation later as things progress.”

 

Johann could not bear to stop the Duke leaving the throne room with a flimsy excuse. The atmosphere he gave off was too eerie for him to try.

 

Cardale walked down the corridor with an upright posture, as always. Then, he took a different route than usual.

 

It was in the direction of the Princess’s palace.

 

Meanwhile, once the Duke’s visit to the Princess’s palace became known, Theresia jumped up.

 

“Why would you wait to tell me something this important now?”

 

Theresia scolded the innocent servant and quickly prepared to greet the Duke.

 

“Take me to the parlour. The tea should be prepared with the highest quality.”

 

There wasn’t enough time to change her dress so she checked her outfit.

 

The dress was decorated with expensive jewels and lace, as gorgeous and beautiful as always. Her soft shoes made of sheepskin were embroidered with gold thread. 


‘Ah, I don’t look bad.’

 

“The headdress needs to be changed. Something bigger and flashier. Oh, that would be nice. Emerald.”

 

She met Cardale after she had finished decorating her elegantly braided hair with her own hands.

 

“Lord Cardale, what brings you here?”

 

His face turned to the Princess with eyes so cold that even Theresia flinched for a moment.

 

“I heard you came to the mansion.”

 

It was an extremely dry voice, devoid of emotion.

 

“You came to the manor while its owner was away, and dared to touch what’s mine.”

 

As soon as he finished speaking, Theresia’s face distorted, and her cruelty appeared.

 

“Did that girl tell you something recently?”

 

“Does that matter?”

 

The countering voice was soft. It was so different from the Princess, who reacted sharply, that she seemed isolated even though she was in the same room.

 

That drove Theresia even more crazy. She screamed inwardly, losing her composure.

 

“She is just the mistress! Are you treating me like this because of a woman who is just a toy to you?”

 

As she cried out, Cardale stared at her with a neutral expression, as if looking at a pebble on the side of the road.

 

“You’re right. My toy, my mistress. What my hands have claimed as mine.”

 

At the same time, his eyes shone with a mysterious light. A sense of unrestrained bloodlust overtook Theresia.

 

“Oh my God!”

 

Her throat felt like it was being pressed down. The Princess’s eyes widened in fear as she felt her air passages tighten. 

 

Theresia fell to the floor, clutching her neck.

 

When she looked up with her wide eyes, the man was watching her without any interest.

 

The pressure on her body suddenly disappeared. Theresia gasped, taking in deep breaths.

 

“I don’t like having my things touched.”

 

his voice rang above the Princess’s head.

 

“It’s my job to dirty it, break it, and ruin it.”

 

His last words were somewhat gloomy and damp. However, it did not reach the ears of Theresia, who was continuously breathing in her effort to survive.

 

“You should avoid doing more than necessary. Even turning a blind eye has its limits.”

 

After he finished speaking, the Duke took a step back. Then he gave an extremely polite bow and turned around.

 

“Cardale!”

 

Theresa followed him late and held his hand.

 

“Let go.”

 

With a thud, Cardale’s hand mercilessly slapped her hand away. Theresia read the disgust in the Duke’s eyes. It was so infuriating.

 

“How could you do this to me?! How can you do this to me!!”

 

“I’ve said this several times. Your Highness and I have no relationship whatsoever.”

 

After completing his business with her, the man left the drawing room, leaving Theresia.

 

Theresia was alone, her tearful eyes wide and her fists clenched as she glared at the door.

 

‘Just because of a lowly illegitimate woman…’

 

‘I didn’t like that girl from the beginning. This was the result of my efforts to ignore her, dismissing her as an unnecessary anxiety.’

 

‘Elise Schuvan.’

 

Theresa’s eyes darkened as she quietly chanted that name.

 

Lady Rosenthal came to her side and carefully asked, “Your Royal Highness, are you okay?”

 

“Do I look okay to you?”

 

Theresia shot back venomously, and Lady Rosenthal shut her mouth. Theresia trembled with anger, but after a moment, she opened her mouth in a calm voice.

 

“Summon the Lady of Vassenberg immediately.”

 



 

When the Duke came out of the palace, the waiting Michael held out a prepared handkerchief. It had been soaked in water beforehand.

 

The man wiped his hands with his handkerchief meticulously as if he had touched something dirty.

 

The handkerchief was passed from the Duke to his aide and then back to the coachman.

 

“Where do you want to go, Your Grace?”

 

Cardale was silent for a moment. This was a first for a man who always moved with a clear goal and direction.

 

But because the silence was so short, no one noticed. 

 

“To my residence.”

 

“Yes, Your Grace.”

 

The Duke got into the carriage. Michael followed. The coachman checked that the door was properly locked, then climbed into the driver’s seat and swung his whip.

 

Gradually, the carriage pulled by two horses began to speed up.

 

In an moment, a handkerchief fell from behind the carriage, away from the Imperial Palace, and landed on the street.

 



 

Knock, knock, knock

 

The sound of tapping on the window was regular. The sound paused for a moment, as if waiting for a response, then repeated after a certain time lag.

 

Elise, who had lost her consciousness and was asleep, began to hear the sound in her ears faintly.

 

Even in her half-asleep mind, it felt familiar. She had definitely heard it. Sometimes, no, quite often…

 

‘Where did I hear that sound before…?’

 

Her mind suddenly grabbed hold of something. Her eyes shot open with the realisation.

 



 

She quickly looked around to find where the sound came from. Then, outside her window with its white curtains drawn, she saw something the size of her fist fluttering.

 

Knock, knock, knock

 

Elise suddenly trembled again. There was no way she couldn’t recognise this sound. She has been taught many times and has heard it enough to set her ears on fire.

 

Elise hastily got out of the bed. She moved so quickly that she couldn’t even put her slippers on, so she almost slipped and fell.

 

Knock, knock, knock

 

The sound was particularly loud.

 

‘Don’t get caught…!’

 

Elise’s head whipped around to the door. Fortunately, it was tightly closed.

 

She headed straight across the room to the window to see who else would notice it. She pulled back the curtain of the window, where a dark figure was hovering.

 

There was a pitch-black bird.

 

Black feathers and ominous glowing purple eyes. It was Count Gerhard Schuvan’s bird.

 

The bird stared at Elise, then the designated time arrived and it pecked at the window.

 

Knock, knock, knock

 

Elise hurriedly opened the window and brought the bird inside.

 

As the bird entered, it let out a chilling cry, then opened its beak wide and spat out what it had in its throat.

 

Elise quickly retrieved the falling scraps of parchment. Clutching the pieces in her hands as if hiding them, she scanned her surroundings once again.

 

Only after repeatedly checking that no one else was there, did she carefully unfold her parchment.

 

The unique, powerfully scribbled handwriting caught Elise’s eye. The content was brief.

 

[Did you sleep with the Duke?]

 

Elise’s blue eyes wavered aimlessly.

 

Caw-

 

The bird’s cries urged her to answer. Elise quickly went to her desk and wrote down her answer with a quill.

 

[I’m sorry.]

 

Even if someone else were to read it, the message was crafted to be understood by the intended recipient.

 

Elise folded up the parchment and handed it to the bird, who swallowed it whole.

 

It was when Elise, having sent off the message, sighed.

 

“What are you doing?”


Elise, startled and turned around.

 

“Duke…”

 

When did he come in? There was no one there before. She didn’t hear anything.

 

‘What if I got caught?’

 

Elise’s trembling gaze examined the Duke’s face.

 

The gaze of the man standing near the door was so calm and serene that it was impossible to tell what he was thinking.

 

Elise became more afraid. Her fingertips grew cold, and her body began to tremble.

 

‘Father said I should never get caught.’

 

Elise tightly grasped the hem of her skirt. She felt like crying because she thought she made a grave mistake.

 

The Duke must have arrived a long time ago, while she was just sleeping leisurely.

 

“Well, I…”

 

A voice came out between barely opened lips.

 

Thud, thud

 

Elise’s shoulders flinched at the sound of shoes hitting the floor. While she was unable to think of an excuse, the Duke approached her.

 

As his hand reached out to her, Elise flinched again.

 

But the man’s hand went past her.

 

There was a click as the window closed and the latch locked.

 

“Do not open the window for the time being.”

 

Boom, Elise’s heart sank. Her dry, chapped lips trembled.

 

‘What excuse should I make? Even if I come up with a good one, can I get through this safely?’

 

The Duke’s voice continued in her ears as she held her breath.

 

“Isn’t there a cold wind blowing?”

 

Elise opened her lips and closed them again. Instead of speaking hastily, she carefully observed.

 

‘Is it just that? Did he really not see?’

 

Her heart was pounding as she felt nervous and anxious.

 

“Are you sick?”

 

A large hand cupped her cheek. Only then did Elise come to her senses and quickly shook her head.

 

“Oh, no… ah…!”

 

Her cheeks were pinched . The tingling pain spread across her, and her mouth opened.

 

“You’re lying.”

 

“Huh…!”

 

A finger was pushed past her teeth. Elise’s body trembled like a bird shot by an arrow.

 

She wouldn’t dare to bite; she couldn’t give him an answer. She didn’t know what this strange behaviour from him was.

 

‘Vanessa didn’t tell me about this…’

 

A strange feeling of shame arose. But strangely, more odd feelings also bloomed together.

 

Cardale’s fingers were swimming around her mouth, rubbing everywhere.

 

Her teeth, the roof of her mouth, the soft lining of her inner cheeks, and even the delicate flesh beneath her tongue.

 

All the while, Elise lost control of her body and was unable to move.

 

For some reason, she could feel her breathing becoming heavier and her body heating up. Her swollen cheeks were gradually turning red.

 

When she couldn’t take it anymore, he removed his fingers. But the relief was fleeting, and her lips met his.

 

Ssskk

 

The force of his tongue trying to open her lips and enter was quite fierce.

 

“Open up.”

 

It wasn’t that Elise was closing herself off intentionally. She just couldn’t keep up with his speed.

 

But instead of waiting for her lips to part, he gently bit her lip.

 

“Ah…!”

 

When her lips opened with surprise mixed with a little pain, his tongue pushed in.

 

What followed was an unstoppable violation. The squishy texture was lost between her lips. It was extremely obscene and promiscuous.

 

The soggy and humid sounds continued incessantly in Elise’s ears.

 

Heat rose from somewhere inside her. She felt like she was being cooked slowly over a low heat until she became mushy.

 

‘It feels like my body is melting.’

 

It was strange. She really felt it.

 

Elise was ruminating over the subject. But she still has a price to pay.

 

She had to accept whatever barbarism the Duke subjected her to, would have to beg him to commit the deed or even get drunk enough for it.

 

So she was right to feel terrible, she had to be in pain and miserable.

 

She did, but strangely, she also didn’t. Even though she felt afraid of his predatory kissing, she did not dislike it.

 

‘Strange…’

 

The man’s large hand wrapped around the back of her head. Their lips were pressed together without a gap. He let her go only after he had sucked and licked her for long enough to swallow her whole.

 

Elise suddenly looked up at Cardale with a bright red face. A glimpse of anticipation flashed through her blue eyes.

 

But the faint wind disappeared.

 

He had such a calm expression on his face that it was hard to believe he was the same person who had kissed her so persistently and obscenely just a moment ago.

 

So she felt embarrassed and ashamed for seeming to be alone in her feelings.

When she was sent here, she was told to put aside her shame.

 

Her face felt hot.

 

She lowered her gaze because she wanted to hide her obviously flushed face.

 

“Raise your head.”

 

A gentle voice fell directly over her, as if he couldn’t tolerate it. Elise clasped her hands together and slowly lifted her face.

 

But she could not bear to meet his eyes, and her gaze lingered only around the corner of Cardale’s chin.

 

He grabbed her chin and lifted it. Her brief resistance to avoid his gaze quickly became meaningless.

 

As always, his face looked cold and emotionless. However, his eyes were as intense as their red colour.

 

As if he would pierce through her, as if he was going to tear her to shreds.

 

“Elise.”

 

“Yes…”

 

“Think about what you should do next.”

 

Her large, round eyes wavered with slight anxiety. Elise moved her lips for a moment before finally answering, “Yes.”

 

Only then did the Duke let her go. He left without hesitation, as if he had finished his business.

 



 

Her tension was relieved all at once.

 

Her entire body became weak, and her legs became unsteady. Elise leaned her body against the window behind her. She felt the coolness of the glass behind her. A light, long breath came out.

 

“Thank God… … .”

 

The reason he didn’t ask about her entire life or why he didn’t bother to investigate her actions further was probably because he didn’t see anything.

 

She was relieved that she hadn’t been caught.

 

But something strange remained.

 

Elise rolled her hand and placed it near her heart. She felt her heart still pounding rapidly.

 

Maybe it was because she was so nervous. Was it a remnant of her fear?

 

Elise didn’t know why this trembling didn’t subside.

 



 

The woman lied.

 

And Cardale hated such tricks. In fact, he never condoned deception.

 

However, when her long, silver eyelashes fluttered like a butterfly’s wings, he decided to pretend he was ignorant to the duplicity. 

 

The sight of her small lips pursed gave him a strange impulse.

 

He remembered when he sensually nibbled on her soft lips. The tantalising sensation, as if plunged into thick cream, also came to his mind.

 

No matter how many times he asked, she would not be able to refuse him. Even though she was crying, she would open her mouth as told.

 

And she will look up at him with her wet, soft eyes.

 

He could have been as rough as he wanted. It wouldn’t be bad to see her crying from being overwhelmed. Even though he shamefully urged her to open her lips, she had somehow closed her small mouth…

 

Cardale paused in his thoughts.

 

He really wanted to destroy everything. The urge to make a complete mess overwhelmed him.

 

When he realised his urges, he had already haphazardly ravished Elise’s mouth, going so far as to swallow her lips.

 

She was a very sloppy kisser. She heard of how to do it from somewhere but she didn’t know how to actually do it properly. He had to part their lips several times because she couldn’t breathe.

 

But she seemed reluctant to keep up.

 

He liked when her cheeks flushed, as the nape gradually got warmer, and her body twitched and shook.

 

When he explored her mouth to its full capacity then let her go, the woman’s lips were properly swollen again.

 

The wound that had been healing ruptured a little, but he didn’t care. He was rather satisfied with covering up the traces of someone else’s hands with his own.

 

Normally, he would have lost interest and put her away because the very idea of someone touching her was so annoying, but it was also a rare exception to get to this level.

 

He needed to remind her of his mercy.

 

With just that one word, his calm eyes seemed to encounter a storm. It was a whimsical yet pitiful sight.

 

Now the white deer had a decision to make.

 

Either surrender to the hunter’s embrace, or face the chilling fate of fleeing just to be hunted down and shot.

 



 

Victoria Vassenberg, the Duke’s mother, was once a celebrity who dominated many social circles.

 

With a powerful lineage, the position of a noblewoman since birth, impeccable qualities as a distinguished lady from a prestigious family, and breathtaking beauty. She lacked nothing.

 

She later married the Duke of Vassenberg, and even after coming down to the Brillion estate, reigned at the top of the social world there as well for a long time.

 

Victoria’s position began to shake when her son, Cardale Vassenberg, ascended to the Duke’s throne after her husband’s passing.

 

Originally, she planned to take over the real power of the Dukedom.

 

Cardale was not yet of age, so she could have exercised power as his sole guardian.

 

That is, if her son agreed to it.


 

“You’ve worked hard all this time, Mother.”

 

“Now, please lay down that heavy burden and spend the rest of your life in peace.”

 

“As Mother suggested, I am doing my best to help you escape from the difficult and challenging responsibilities of leading the family.”

 

Her son ascended to the throne when he was only seventeen, and took away her powers one by one.

 

Even her rights as a hostess.

 

“Mother is no longer a Duchess.”

 

“You’re not even married yet! What will you do when there is no woman to take care of the house?”

 

“That is not Mother’s concern any longer.”

 

Less than a year later, Victoria was completely excluded from all family affairs.

 

She chased him, scolded him, threatened him, and even cried for days. But her son would not relent.

 

“My mother seems to be mentally and physically unstable, so we will have to send someone to take care of her for a while.”

 

Rather, he drove her away to the Duke’s retreat villa in Southern Brillion.

 

“The more I think about it, the angrier I get. I can’t bear it. At this rate, I’ll get so furious that it will lead to my death.”

 

Anytime she thought about her past humiliation, Victoria still grit her teeth. And her son’s insults still continued.

 

She was immediately ahead of the curve, even though she was forced not to attend the victory banquet.

 

Victoria was excited by her son’s victory and even planned to go to the islands for the first time in such a long time, but she was left in a sudden state of anger and shame when she received the rest of the news.

 

“I raised such a monster as my son. Is there any mother in the world more foolish than me?”

 

As she entered a carriage going to the island, she muttered something to herself.

 

The maid bowed her head as if she hadn’t heard anything. She feigned a feeble attempt at consolation, well aware of the experiences of her predecessor.

 

The noble circle was a place where a servant had to pretend not to see anything, not to hear anything, to know nothing if she wanted to survive.

 

“If only I had had one more son, I wouldn’t have suffered this humiliation.”

 

Tsk tsk, Victoria clicked her tongue. As if there was no one else in her carriage, the maid in front of her had a presence as if she were a piece of furniture.

 

Then, out of the blue, Victoria asked a question.

 

“Will we arrive today?”

 

Due to the prolonged journey of the past few days, Victoria’s nerves had become noticeably sharper. The maid quickly responded.

 

“Yes, Madam. When we departed earlier, it was estimated that we would arrive at the castle in about two hours, so it should be soon… Ah, there it is!”

 

The maid pointed outside the window and exclaimed. Her voice contained a sense of relief that she could avoid any awkward questions.

 

The carriage, without slowing, soon reached the large gate leading to the mansion. The soldiers guarding the gate quickly identified the occupants of the carriage, and with force, they saluted.

 

After passing through the castle walls, the carriage ran along the road that crossed the island. While passing through the centre, Victoria deliberately opened her window and looked outside.

 

“I feel like I can finally breathe easier after coming to the island.”

 

When she saw the sophisticated and luxurious atmosphere, her stuffy feelings lifted and she felt like she could live here. For Victoria, who had lived in the most luxurious of residences, the Brillion estate was dull and boring.

 

“Did you tell that child I was going to come?”

 

Victoria asked, deliberately treating her son as immature. It was a struggle to salvage her pride.

 

“Oh, yes! I heard so, Madam.”

 

“Hmph, if I get bored while staying at the Imperial Palace, I guess I could stop by the Duke’s residence.”

 

The maid worried silently about the inevitable trouble that would occur this year, but she kept to herself.

 

It wasn’t long before the carriage arrived at the Imperial Palace.

 

Victoria got out and her emotions swept across the familiar landscape, though her face was calm.

 

At that moment, the Royal Guards who had been waiting by order of Princess Theresia, approached her.

 

“Welcome, Grand Duchess. Her Highness the Princess is waiting.”

 

As the guards greeted her with a polite bow, Victoria gently pursed her lips.

 

Victoria, already feeling better alive and well, seemed to have been appeased. She nodded her head and answered.

 

“I would like you to guide me to Her Highness the Princess.”

 



 

Theresia greeted her  guests with a huge smile on her face.

 

“Welcome, Grand Duchess. I don’t know how long it’s been since I’ve had the pleasure of seeing you again.”

 

“Thank you for the invitation, Your Royal Highness.”

 

Victoria greeted her, and Theresia quickly led her to the prepared seats.

 

Expensive tea and fancy refreshments were placed between the two of them.

 

After taking a sip of the tea, Victoria smiled and spoke.

 

“It’s the highest quality product from the Belvre Kingdom.”

 

“I’m glad you noticed. When this was ordered for the palace not long ago, I thought of the Grand Duchess, so I prepared this for you.”

 

A maid handed Victoria a beautifully wrapped box. A flush appeared on her face.

 

“I am touched that Her Highness the Princess pays such close attention to me.”

 

“Well, it’s only natural for the lady of the house, isn’t it?”

 

Theresia secretly prayed.

 

Victoria, who did not know the Princess’s true intentions, quietly placed the box she had received on her table and sighed softly.

 

“All of that glory is a thing of the past. Now I am just miserably just getting older without my husband.”

 

“Don’t say that.”

 

Theresia quickly got up and sat down next to Victoria to comfort her. Victoria continued to lament. 

 

“My son is so indifferent to his mother. There isn’t a day that goes by where I don’t weep from my sorrows.”

 

The discord between the lady of the house and the duke had spread so far that it was now common knowledge.

 

Instead of trying to hide the facts that had already spread, Victoria decided to use them to her advantage.

 

In social circles, even arousing sympathy could be powerful.

 

“As you know, Your Royal Highness, I was not able to attend the Victory banquet or even the New Year banquet.”

 

Right at this moment.

 

“Even though he is my son, I was so upset that no one stopped him.”

 

Victoria indirectly expressed her displeasure at the Princess for not having backing her up and stopping the Emperor’s decision.

 

Theresia, who did not know this, quickly grabbed both of her hands and gave her the excuse she had prepared.

 

“His Majesty was genuinely concerned as well. When I mentioned inviting the lady of the house, His Majesty insisted that she should lack nothing during her stay at the palace.”

 

“Oh my goodness!”

 

Victoria let out a gasp. She then insisted on asking what she had already noticed.

 

“Are you saying that you will consider allowing me to stay in the Imperial Palace?”

 

“Yes. I will give you the best rooms available in the Princess’ palace.”

 

“I’m so grateful.”

 

As Victoria looked happy, the Princess also smiled.

 

But her intentions were completely different.

 

‘…So annoying.’

 

In fact, Theresa did not like this old lady all that much.

 

Victoria’s personality was as unusual as the reputation she once had in social circles.

 

Her pride was strong, and she was stubborn, so her temperament was the complete opposite of Theresia.

 

‘But I really need this woman on my side so I can marry Cardale.’

 

Although some say it was outdated, parental permission was still an important factor in aristocratic marriages.

 

In the past, there were many cases of people who would be married despite never having seen each other’s faces before. So it was a practice that has since improved.

 

Meanwhile, Victoria also made her own calculations while looking at the Princess.

 

‘Princess Theresia is not a bad match for Cardale to marry. Her lineage goes without saying, and the dowry she will bring will be substantial.’

 

If she was lucky, she could one day become the Emperor’s mother-in-law. Although it was unlikely, it was not uncommon in the history of the Empire for the successor to suddenly die and the throne to be passed on to another member of the royal family.

 

‘At least I can get my position back.’

 

Even if she couldn’t regain all the power she lost as the Duchess, having the princess indebted to her for the marriage would ensure she wouldn’t be ignored.

 

‘If that happens, I can live like I had before. Not just as the Grand Duchess of the Duke of Vassenberg, but as a truly prestigious lady.’

 

And she would be able to enjoy things she had long been denied from.

 

It was when Victoria smiled secretly, imagining a future where things went as planned. That Theresia got to her point.

 

“By the way, have you heard, Grand Duchess?”

 

“There is news?”

 

“Ah, you didn’t hear it either.”

 

As Theresia let out a sigh, Victoria’s complexion hardened a little. For some reason, she had a bad feeling.

 

“I don’t know if it’s okay to tell you this. It’s something I can’t bear to put into words…”

 

When the Princess deliberately trailed off her words, Victoria’s body tensed. Growing frustrated, she urged, pulling herself forward.

 

“Tell me, please. What is going on?”

 

“Actually…”

 

Theresia leaned down and brought her face closer to Victoria’s. Even though no one was listening, she covered her mouth with her hand and lowered her voice.

 

“What do you mean, Duke Vassenberg has a mistress?”

 

As the Princess’s story continued, Victoria’s face became drastically distorted.

 

“…Yes.”

 

Theresia smiled that the lady could not hide her anger, although she tried hard not to show it.

[If you don’t plan on missing the opportunity like a fool, somehow make time to be with the Duke.]

Elise looked down at the piece of parchment and let out a long sigh.

Gerhard seemed to think she was dragging her feet with hesitation. But he didn’t know the whole situation.

Realistically, there were only two ways for Elise to meet with the Duke.

Either he finds her first, or she stumbles upon him.

But it was difficult to expect either.

The Duke was very busy and went out often. But above all,  it wasn’t easy for Elise to find him first or even talk to him.

‘What do I do…?’

After sending out her reply, Elise went and stood in front of the mirror.

Her bruised face was almost healed. All that remained was a small wound at the corner of her mouth.

While her cheek was healing, she never saw the Duke.

‘If he forgets about me like this…’

Elise’s silver eyelashes fluttered.

‘Would it be better to wait outside where the Duke might pass by?’

But Elise shook her head as another thought suddenly came to her mind.

‘I don’t know what to say even if I see him… I don’t know.’

If only she had been a true noblewoman. If only she had been a little more clever or beautiful…

[“I don’t want anything from you anymore. What little interest I felt has long since disappeared.”]

The Duke’s voice, colder than a glacier in midwinter, lingered in her head.

Despite having no desire for it, she found herself pushing her head up forcefully. Becoming someone who mindlessly focused on her useless thoughts and the mere act of eating just to survive.

Elise turned her head. Her neatly organised desk was bare and clean.

“I wanted to write more replies to some invitations…”

She was glad that there seemed to be something she could do, even if it was just a small task. However, Norman didn’t bring any more invitations. He said there were no more coming.

He added that for the time being, it would be better for her to focus on her recovery.

But Elise suspected there was another reason.

“What I wrote… I guess it was bad.”

Norman praised her writing and said it was really helpful, and he even thanked her, so Elise thought she had done a good job.

In fact, she was just saying it out of consideration because she was worried that the Duke would be disappointed in her.

‘Still, Norman is a kind person. So if I ask him again, would he give me another chance?’

She was left alone in this mansion while everyone else had work to do.

She had been living a busy life before, always doing something and being pressed for time. But suddenly, she was in the exact opposite environment, and she wasn’t getting used to it. As a result, she became increasingly anxious.

As Elise was wandering around her room alone, someone knocked on her door. It was Norman.

“I’m sorry… You were on a break, Miss.”

“Ah, what happened…”

“I came to ask you a favour. If you don’t mind, could you possibly help me?”

“Me?”

Elise’s blue eyes widened. Then, after a while, her expression brightened a little.

She was so grateful to Norman for the request, as if he was listening to her concerns right next to her.

“Uh, what do you need?”

She wished it was something she could do, Elise thought for that brief moment.

Norman stepped away from the door, and there was a tray. The teapot and teacup on the tray looked very luxurious at first glance.

“This…”

“I have prepared tea for you and Master.”

Elise blinked her eyes. Then maybe…

“I urgently need to guide my subordinates, so I have no choice but to ask you this favour. Can you take care of it, just for today?”

Elise had also learned tea making. Vanessa said it was a basic skill that any woman from a noble family must know, so she practised until she could pour tea with her eyes closed.

Of course, even though she worked hard, she did not have the skills to satisfy Vanessa.

Elise hesitated for a moment because honestly, she wasn’t confident.

‘But maybe this will be my last chance.’

Elise clenched her fists. She knew she was useless, but she couldn’t pass up this offer.

“I just need to serve the tea… I think I can do it.”

By the time she came to her senses again, she was standing in front of the Duke’s office with her tray.

Before she could regather her thoughts, the door opened.

Elise ignored her pounding heart and pushed the tray inside.

The Duke was busy with work. Behind him was a large window with thin curtains.

The afternoon sunlight poured down on his neatly combed black hair. Beneath it were beautiful and handsome features that would make any heart stop.

For a moment, Elise was mesmerised as sunlight sparkled on the Duke’s long eyelashes while he looked down at his documents.

Then, she suddenly came to her senses, quickly adjusted her posture, and offered her greeting.

“Hello, Duke.”

Cardale lifted his head. As soon as he noticed her, his always straight eyebrows twitched.

“Tea for the Duke to drink…” 

“Who told you to come into the office as you please?”

“S-sorry.”

Elise was startled by such a cold reaction that she flinched. So she didn’t notice how Cardale’s gaze fell on the wall.

“Well, I was asked to do so by Butler Norman… he urgently needed someone to serve tea for the Duke… so…”

Elise couldn’t bear to look at Cardale again, so she lowered her head and spouted gibberish excuses.

‘I didn’t know you would hate me this much.’

It was when her eyes wandered along the floor she was pulled from her thoughts.

“Then I’ll give it a try.”

“Yes?”

When she raised her head, the Duke stood up and walked towards her. Then passed her and sat down on the sofa.

“What are you doing? Didn’t you say you were preparing tea?”

“Ah… yes!”

Elise, who had been standing there in a daze, hurriedly pushed the tray and approached Cardale.

But he frowned and got up again, walking back around the table and sat down on the sofa across from her again. His seat facing the wall.

“Sit across from me.”

It was a difficult action for her to understand, but before Elise had time to think about it, she did as Cardale had instructed and sat down.

‘I can’t make mistakes.’

Elise placed the teapot and teacup on the table and began to brew the tea with great care.

Because of her excruciating repetition, her hands moved on their own.

Now, all that was left was to transfer the tea from the teapot into a teacup.

‘…Ah?’

As the blue-coloured tea water dripped into the wide-mouthed teacup and the rich scent of tea filled the tip of her nose, Elise paused.

‘I think I’ve smelled something like this before.’

The scent of this freshly brewed tea was strangely familiar.

‘When was it?’

Elise traced her memories. But she couldn’t think of anything.

“It’s going to be too much.”

“Yes? Ah…!”

Elise was unconsciously tilting the teapot, but then she noticed that the tea was about to overflow, and she hurriedly stopped.

“Sorry…”

“It’s okay.”

Elise’s face turned pale as Cardale cut her off.

She made a mistake again.

She had been told countless times not to relax for even a moment, to think carefully about every word she said and every movement she made.

Elise’s eyes started to sting. She felt like he would immediately overturn the teacup and order her to leave.

But contrary to Elise’s fearful imagination, the Duke simply raised his teacup.



The rim of the cup touched his thin, red lips and then tipped over. Cardale’s brows narrowed slightly as he held a sip to his mouth.

Elise looked at him with anxious feelings.

Standing, holding the warm teapot in her arms as if it were her only comfort.

After her chest rose and fell several more times without a sound, Cardale finally removed the teacup from his lips and placed it on the saucer.

“It’s rather good.”

That brief evaluation was nothing short of salvation for Elise.

Fortunately, Elise finally let out the breath she had been holding.

“You wrote a reply to an invitation, right?”

Elise, who was relieved, paused. Anxiety appeared in her blue eyes once more.

“That… I was just trying to be of some help… I had no intention of interfering. Really.”

For the first time, Elise began to feel a small amount of resentment towards Norman. Why did she bother to write such a messy letter for the Duke?

“Interfering?”

When the man said that and frowned at her, Elise became scared.

It seemed like he was going to ask a question like, “What on earth do you know how to do?”

‘I just came forward and did it without reason…’

She bit her lip so hard that she felt like she was going to burst into tears.

“I happened to be hiring someone temporarily to write those invitation replies.”

Cardale opened his mouth.

“I saw what you wrote. It was pretty good.”

For a moment, Elise thought she had heard wrong. She was so desperate that she wondered if she was hallucinating.

Because of that, she couldn’t react and just blinked. But Cardale continued to speak.

“Would you like to take charge of it?”

Elise’s lips parted slightly because she couldn’t believe it.

However, the Duke did not withdraw his words, as if waiting for her answer, and Elise gradually faced reality.

‘I did it.’

Elise gave strength to her hand holding the teapot.

She wanted to be useful. No matter how trivial and insignificant the task seemed, she was extremely desperate to do something. So she was happy.

“Thank you for the opportunity, really… I will work hard.”

Elise mustered up her courage to answer. But for some reason, she didn’t get a reply from the man.


Elise carefully raised her head. Making eye contact with the man who was staring at her.

“…Duke?”

“You’re almost better.”

‘You were checking the wound.’

She answered, carefully putting down the teapot she was still holding in her arms back on the table.

“Yes. Thank you for giving me good medicine to use.”

“But the scars still remain. Why didn’t you apply the medicine?”

“Ah…”

In her embarrassment, Elise scratched her heated ear with her fingertips.

‘I forgot.’

She had skipped applying her medicine because of Gerhard’s letter and because she was worried about what she would do afterwards.

But she couldn’t say she had forgotten.

“I thought I was only supposed to apply it in the evening…”

Even in her opinion, it was a poor excuse, so Elise trailed off.

But instead of questioning her or laughing, Cardale stood up then took out one of the boxes from a dresser on one wall.

Elise didn’t know what he was doing, so she just stared at Cardale.

He returned to his seat and looked at her.

“Come here, Elise.”

A low, gravely voice called her name. Elise’s heart thumped a little louder.

Strangely enough, her name felt a little different than usual. It wasn’t a common name, but somehow it seemed special when he said it like that.

“Hurry.”

Cardale urged again. Elise stood up from her seat as if she were mesmerised and walked towards him.

“Sit down.”

Elise paused. The seat next to him was empty, but he didn’t seem to imply it was for her.

After her short thought, she knelt down in front of the sofa where Cardale was sitting.

The man’s eyes narrowed.



Cardale looked down at the woman.

It was laughable to show off one’s pride excessively, but it was also not good to be too servile.

“What are you doing?”

“You told me to come and sit…”

“I took in a maid, not a slave.”

Elise’s cheeks instantly turned red with shame. The blush even reached her ears and the nape of her neck.

“Well, then…”

The woman leaned up on her knees and tried to get up again.

‘That won’t work.’

Cardale lightly stopped her by pressing her shoulder. The woman sat down again and looked up at him surprised.

Her innocent eyes blinked, ignorant.

‘Funny.’

‘That’s the kind of expression you make when you kneel between a man’s legs? Do you have no idea what your actions imply?’

‘Or maybe you are doing this on purpose.’

He sneered coldly.

There have been countless women who have approached him before.

All kinds of women rushed to him to satisfy their desires. There were women who would throw themselves at him, like moths to a flame. They were all disgusting and ugly people.

The man’s gaze, looking down at Elise, suddenly became cold.

‘It will be the same for her anyway.’

This was a woman whom Gerhard Schuvan had taken in by washing her identity. 

‘Whatever the reason. She is just like them with how she approached me with a purpose?’

However, there was a difference…

Cardale removed his hand from her shoulder, preventing her from moving. Then instead, lifted her chin.

He saw her eyes widen. As blue as the clear sea, with a faint shake.

It was a gaze filled with instinctive fear.

But that wasn’t everything. It was funny to see her filled with a bit of anticipation.

She was naive but had a purpose. She was trying to seduce him, but it was clumsy.

She wasn’t contemptibly stupid, but she wasn’t disgustingly worn down either.

Yes, she wasn’t bad. Strangely enough.

Cardale opened the box. It contained several medicine bottles, bandages, scissors, etc. He took out some ointment for wounds and opened it.

Elise’s eyes widened as she realised what he was trying to do.

“It doesn’t hurt anymore.”

After spitting out her words incoherently, she bit her lip again. Her face suddenly turned pale, showing a self-reproach for saying something pointless.

“Don’t bite your lip.”

As he spoke, he pressed his thumb against her lower lip. Elise’s lips parted.

Cardale applied medicine to the corners of Elise’s lightly crusted mouth. When his fingers touched her wound, he felt a small twitch.

‘Why is this woman so thin?’

He thought again. For some reason, she seemed to get thinner every time he saw her. Even so, her pure white skin was now light enough to be called ‘pale.’ The only place where she had colour was her red lips.

Subconsciously, Cardale stretched out his large hand and caressed Elise’s cheek. He wanted to make her blush and he knew how to make both cheeks look presentable.

“Elise.”

Round, gentle eyes turned to him. Each time she blinked, her long silver eyelashes fluttered.

‘It would be okay to have just a taste.’

Cardale had no intention of getting lost like last time. He easily rationalised this by saying the Princess’s judgement was just a little misguided.

Then, suddenly, the table caught Cardale’s eyes.

To be exact, the teacup he was drinking from.

Half of the blue tinted tea remained in the teacup. Cardale’s frown narrowed slightly as he remembered its contents.

That unique scent still lingered in his mouth. Tea, which tastes like a strong herb, was never meant to be enjoyed for its taste and aroma.

Cardale straightened his waist again. Elise’s eyes widened slightly at that. He chuckled.

“Why are you disappointed?”

“Oh, no…!”

The woman shook her head. However, she must have been embarrassed, so her pale cheeks turned a little red.

His goal was achieved, so it didn’t matter. However, Cardale muttered after feeling strangely dissatisfied.

“I guess I’ll have to tell you to bring my water to drink from now on.”

“Are you thirsty?”

Elise asked. Seeing the face of this woman he knew nothing about, made him really thirsty. An impulse was also there.

‘Should I just swallow it all at once?’

Looking for water to rinse his mouth, was such an unreasonable consideration. Cardale just laughed at his actions.

If it weren’t for this special situation, that tea would have been given to the woman to drink instead.

But was there even a problem? Even if just a bit of tea is mixed with his saliva when it touches her delicate and soft flesh, wouldn’t she still get some of the drink?

Just like that, his ego reared its head. But suddenly, someone knocked on the door.

“Master. This is Norman.”

‘You’re lucky.’

Cardale sighed and spoke to Elise.

“Just get up and clean this.”

The woman, who was finally allowed to stand, carefully raised her body.

She stumbled a little because her legs were numb, but she soon straightened and cleaned the table.

Cardale looked at the sheepish Elise.

After she finished, the last thing her eyes landed on was the box containing the medicine.

“Thank you for applying the medicine… thank you.”

Cardale’s gaze persistently followed Elise’s back as she pushed the tray out of the room.

Only after the woman’s appearance had completely disappeared did he turn his head to Norman.

Even then, orders came first.

“Remove the taxidermy from the office.”

“Yes, Your Grace.”

“Why are you here?”

It had to be something important.

Cardale’s cool, red eyes turned to the old butler who had interrupted his entertainment.

Norman reported.

“We found the mole.”



It was finally a holiday. 

The maid came out to the downtown area of the island to enjoy her long-awaited break. Today, she planned to buy a lot of the things she had been eyeing.

A pleasant, jingling sound came from the inside pocket of her skirt. The maid’s mood improved, as did the weight of the coins in her pocket.

“Oh, you’re here!”

Every store she entered, the clerks greeted her warmly. It was natural because right now she was being a generous spender.

“Thank you, goodbye!”

The maid walked down the street with excited steps, still being greeted by store clerks who almost bowed halfway.

‘It’s so easy to make money.’

She laughed as she remembered when she was first offered this undercover work, she was so scared she would get caught.

‘It wasn’t that difficult, so I don’t know why I was so scared.’

Fortunately, the information the other party wanted was nothing special. It was information that any employee of the Duke with a decent eye could notice.

‘So I was lucky.’

The maid truly thought she had been chosen.

The money she received in exchange for some paltry information was quite large, and it quickly enriched her life. As she is doing now, she often indulges in extravagance.

‘Even if I can’t be one, wouldn’t this be at the level of a lower noble’s expenses?’

The wages she received from working at the Duke’s house were considerable, but compared to the compensation she received for handing over information, it was nothing more than pocket change.

Now she was working at the Duke’s residence to obtain information.

‘I can just work a little longer like this and quit when the time is right.’

As she walked down the street humming, she found herself in a dubious place. She went to the meeting place, as was her habit.

“Hey, what are you doing here… Ugh!”

The maid turned around in the alley and started to leave, but her eyes widened. She wasn’t able to scream because her mouth and nose were already blocked.

‘Let go of me!’

The maid struggled with all her might, but it was no use. It seemed as if her body was slowly losing its strength, and soon, her vision went black.

She came back to her senses in a dark basement. 


The maid opened her eyes in shock as cold water splashed her body.


“Aaaggh…”


When she came to her senses, the first thing she noticed was the cold that washed over her and the pain that gripped her body.


When she lowered her head, she saw she was tied to a chair. Like a criminal being interrogated.


‘Where am I? Who brought me to a place like this…!’


She quickly looked around and saw a dark stone wall. And all kinds of chains and confusing tools were hanging on the wall.


Seeing them all covered in unknown stains sent goosebumps down her spine.


The feeling of freezing water dripping from her hair and down her back was painful.


Thud


The door opened in front of her. Someone approached with heavy footsteps.


The moment she saw that face, the maid had no choice but to freeze.


“So you were the mole of the mansion.”


It was the Duke of Vassenberg.





The interrogation was boring.


As soon as Cardale appeared, the maid was so frightened that her whole body trembled. Before he could even get to do anything exciting, she was already talking.


“This is all what Her Highness the Princess told me to do…!”


“What did Princess Theresia order you to do?”


“She asked me to keep her informed of any women coming in and out of the Duke’s mansion…”


The maid told Cardale everything she knew. She remembered every detail of what she had passed on and shared it without exception. Because she knew that if she didn’t, the red-hot iron in the furnace would burn her skin.


Then she begged him to spare her life.


Cardale straightened his body, looking at her with an impassive face.


In fact, the interrogation was meaningless from the beginning anyways. Even if a maid tried to use his seal, she wouldn’t have been able to pass on any meaningful information.


It would have been easier to just deal with it cleanly and without any fuss.


Still, there was a reason why he dragged this maid here.


It was because she was the maid assigned to Elise. He needed to check if she was talking nonsense to the Princess.


As soon as Cardale had finished his business, he turned around and ordered.


“Take her with you.”


Then the maid, sensing a threat to her life, shouted, “If I disappear, my lady will think it’s strange!”


Cardale was arrogant. 


‘After making a profit from selling a woman’s information, was she really going to beg for her life in the Princess’ name?’


He turned and responded.


“It’s not a big issue to remove just one maid.”


However, the fact that she even got a reaction from the Duke gave her hope that she could save herself.


“That’s not true!”


The maid began to chatter as her words came out. She went on and on about how many conversations she had already had with Elise and how she had helped her.


“The lady likes me! The lady is relying on me!”





“So, if her maid suddenly changes, she will definitely have a difficult time. Maybe she will have doubts about my disappearance…”


“Good.”


Cardale interrupted the maid.


He gestured and the soldiers untied the ropes from the maid’s body.


The maid was raised from her seat and gave Cardale a puzzled look.


“Leave the mansion immediately. Don’t be seen again.”


Colour suddenly returned to the maid’s pale face.


“Thank you! I will not forget this mercy…!”


The maid slipped out in haste, guided by a soldier.


After the maid’s steps could no longer be heard, Cardale opened his mouth.


“Handle it quietly.”


“Yes, Your Excellency.”


His subordinates quietly slipped into the shadows. Cardale left the quiet interrogation room.





He knew that everything she said about how close they were was a lie.


If it were really true, when she was told to leave the mansion, she would have asked to be allowed to say her final goodbyes.


But the reason the maid was doomed to her fate was not because she simply lied.


‘The lady is relying on me!’


If she had wanted to save her life, she shouldn’t have said that.


Cardale twisted his lips and smiled coldly. Rather than saying useless things, it would be better to simply close the door. 


Forever.





“Your Grace.”


As Cardale left the building and was about to board the carriage, Michael approached him.


“The Esteemed Lady sent a letter.”


Cardale laughed as he checked the seal pattern on the letter.


“I see she still wears that signet ring.”


It was written by the landlady of Vassenberg. Even though she was kicked out to the villa in Brillion, she deserved recognition for her tenacity in taking the signet ring with her.


That’s probably why she still annoys him from time to time.


“What should I do?”


“Burn it.”


Cardale didn’t even open the letter. It was obvious even without looking at the contents within, that it was useless to him.


He had already received a report that the Esteemed Lady had left the territory and set off for the Islands. The reason was said to be an invitation from the Princess.


It was so clear what Theresia thought she would accomplish with inviting the Esteemed Lady, that Cardale didn’t feel it was worth dealing with.


‘Even so, it doesn’t mean anything.’


The arrogance of assuming the Vassenberg bloodline would be bound by aristocratic customs was laughable.


The Princess won’t be able to do anything. And the same was true for his mother.


He would get to personally choose the woman who would become the Duchess, and he had no intention of giving his mother any power over whoever that would be. Therefore, the Princess or any woman favoured by the Esteemed Lady, was not relevant to Cardale’s consideration.


A healthy body to produce an heir, appropriate lineage, and an obedient personality. The conditions he wanted were detailed and meticulous, like choosing the right product at a store.


Suddenly, Cardale thought of the woman he had brought into the mansion. The docile and gentle prey he had chosen.


But soon, he became dumbfounded by the fact that he was thinking of Elise.


A woman who was nothing more than expendable to him?


His mood sank. It was unpleasant to have the thought pop into his head like this and eat up his time.


In the first place, the letter from the Esteemed Lady was just the beginning.


He ordered Michael.


“From now on, you don’t need to report to me about her. Just handle it on your own.”


“Yes sir.”


Cardale got into the carriage.


But his discomfort did not lessen, so he felt like he wanted to have something refreshing.


For example…


Like the tea she had prepared.





Elise skipped dinner out of habit.


Her maid did not particularly encourage or dissuade her from skipping meals for reasons Elise understood.


Because all the food she had leftover went to the maid.


But she didn’t want to blame her maid, and she pretended not to notice because she thought that if her precious food was going to be thrown away, it would be better for her to eat it.


But that didn’t mean she didn’t still feel hungry, so to reduce her hunger, Elise drank some water before laying down on her bed.


Enduring hunger was familiar. In fact, she never ate well anyways.


When she lived in the slums, it was because she was poor. Before that, she lived with her mother in the Count’s house…


“Ugh…!”


At that moment, terrible memories came to mind. A sudden rush of nausea made Elise gag.


‘I have to come to my senses.’


Even though her body was shaking, she grabbed the blanket covering with both hands. She shook her head and spoke out loud, trying not to let fear consume her.


“It’s already happened.”


‘Now I can eat at any time. Right now, I just didn’t eat on purpose. As Vanessa said, I have to impress the Duke.’


‘I’ll do anything for my mother.’


Only when Elise remembered Marissa, was she able to calm down the anxiety that had begun to plague her.


‘Mother, are you okay…?’


After tossing and turning, her consciousness slowly sank into a deep sleep.


And in that uncontrollable unconsciousness of hers, Elise was confronted again with her horrid memories.





Marissa suffered greatly after being whipped in the rain.


While Marissa was recovering, the mother and daughter stayed at the Count’s main house, and that period was just as terrible for Elise.


This was because they were exposed to Fritz’s bullying anywhere else.


So when Marissa regained consciousness and some of her health. When she was able to return to her villa, Elise was really happy.


But soon, the mother and daughter faced a big problem.


Marissa’s face hardened at the food the maid brought.


“…Is this all there is to eat?”


“Yes.”


Bread that was hard or half burnt, cold soup with almost no ingredients, and dried apples.

The amount was so small that it wasn’t even enough for one person to eat.


As the quality of her diet began to decline rapidly, young Elise cried often.


She cried because she was hungry. 


She cried because the soup was bad. 


She cried because her teeth hurt when she chewed the bread. 


And she cried because she had an upset stomach after eating spoiled food.


At times like that, Marissa hugged Elise tightly.


Then she handed out some of her own food, soaked the hard bread in water to make it soft, and rubbed and soothed her upset stomach.


Then, one day, it happened.


The serving tray, that was always so light before, made a rattling sound and was full of dishes.


It was quite different from usual.


Freshly baked soft bread, thick stew with pork and potatoes, salad with seasonal fruits, steak grilled in butter…


Among them was a tart filled with custard and sprinkled with cinnamon sugar that was Elise’s favourite food.


Elise loved it so much that she forgot her manners and ran wild without even realising it.


So she didn’t see the sneer on the lips of the maid who brought it to her nor the paleness of her mother’s face.


“This is a special gift from the owner, so enjoy it.”


With those words, the maid left the room. Elise held her mother’s sleeve, and her eyes twinkled.


“Let’s eat quickly, Mother!”


Elise wanted to eat so badly, especially the tart tempting her with its sweet scent.


“Mother, come on…!”


“Elise.”


But Marissa took Elise’s hands in hers and bent down onto one knee to meet her gaze. Her face was stiffer.


“This is food you shouldn’t eat.”


“What?”


The child who did not understand tilted her head.


The maid brought it to them to eat, so why was her mother saying she shouldn’t eat it? And why was her mother making such a scary face?


But before Elise could ask her questions, Marissa stood up and began gathering the food into a large wooden bucket.


When Elise saw the appetising food being mixed together, she became confused and cried out.


“Uh, mother…!”





“Please don’t do that, Mother. Mother? Please…!”


Elise begged, grabbing Marissa’s arm. But her mother, who had always listened to her affectionately, did not give in this time.


Marisa scooped up all of the food without hesitation, then picked up the handle of the bucket.


As her mother went out to the backyard of the annexe, Elise followed her, crying.


Marissa dug up dirt with a shovel that had been leaning against the wall of her shed, and poured out the food she brought.


Elise cried as she saw all the food being buried.


She couldn’t figure out why her mother was doing this. She was so sad and hungry.


Finally, after cleaning up all traces of the food, Marisaa turned around, wiping away her sweat. She had a tired look on her face. But her eyes had returned to their usual warm state.


“Elise.”


“Wahhh!”


When Marisa opened her arms, Elise ran to hug her and burst into tears. Guilt and sadness appeared on her face.


“I’m sorry, Mother. I’m sorry…”


Marissa held Elise in her arms and soothed her until her tender-hearted daughter stopped crying.


From then on, things like that would happen occasionally.


After experiencing the same thing a few times, Elise began to wish that the delicious food would just never come.


Because at times like that, she couldn’t eat anything.


Then, the incident happened.


Delicious food came out one meal after another. Marisa had to bury all three of her meals in the backyard, starting from lunch the previous day up until the next morning, and Elise couldn’t bear her hunger and burst into tears again.


She knew that her mother was heartbroken when she cried, but she just couldn’t bear it.


While Marissa was comforting Elise, she got up and seemed to have decided something.


“Mother… ?”


Elise whimpered and looked at her mother as she prepared to leave.


“Elise, you must keep the door locked in your room until I come back.”


Then she got scared. Elise asked with an anxious look on her face.


“Uh, where are you going?”


“Back to the main building to get something to eat. It’ll only take a moment.”


Elise was afraid of being left alone, but her mother’s expression looked so determined that she couldn’t bear to tell her not to go.


So the child had to nod her head through the tears streaming down her face.


“Mother will return soon. Understood?”


Elise clung to her window, stood on her tiptoes, and watched Marisaa disappear.


‘I hope she comes back soon.’


She was scared, but she was also excited. She wanted to eat something today, even just a tasteless soup.


But no matter how long she waited, her mother hadn’t returned yet. The child was alone and anxious, and she eventually left the room herself.


‘She said she was going to the main house.’


There was a scary Fritz in the main building. And then there was the Countess, who was even scarier than Fritz.


But what scared her more was her mother not coming back. So Elise gathered her courage.


The noon sun shone brightly on the road, making everything dazzlingly bright. Elise hoped that her mother would suddenly appear and scold her for not listening.


But no such luck for her. Instead, it was something she had hoped would never happen happened.


“… !”


She had made eye contact with the Countess, who was walking around the garden.


Elise quickly hid. She crouched down and prayed desperately for nothing to happen.


‘I’ll hide like a rat.’


But this time too, God did not listen to her earnest prayer.


“Do you want to bring that girl?”


The maids dragged Eliase by her arms, following the Countess ahead of her. She was so scared that she couldn’t even scream.


The place where the Countess stopped was a terrace leading to the back garden behind the main building.


There was a tea table decorated with all kinds of breads, pies, and cookies. All prepared on the floral tablecloth.


The Countess sat alone at the table and enjoyed a leisurely tea time. The maid stood Elise in front of her.


The child clutched her stomach as she watched the tasty food be eaten by the Countess, one by one.


Rumbling, the stomach made a twisting sound. The Countess’s red lips turned upward.


“Are you hungry?”


Elise nodded her head. For a hungry child, just having to watch someone else eat was a huge hardship.


Hmm, the Countess let out her snort. She seemed somehow happy. The Countess, who seemed to be contemplating what to do, snapped her fingers and opened her mouth.


“Give this child some food.”


Soon after, a rich pie slice was placed in front of Elise as if it were a lie. The glossy treat gave off a savoury smell.


“Eat.”


Elise stretched out her hand as if possessed. She carefully lifted a piece, and the delicious smell hit her.


But even to her young mind, this felt strange. She wondered why the Countess gave her food. The child lifted her head slightly, and she glanced at the lady.


The Countess was smiling. She could see her lips curve.


‘Maybe she is in a good mood today and decided to do something nice.’


With truly childish innocence, Elise looked down at the meat pie again.


She opened her mouth wide and took a big bite of her…


She was about to raise her hands and bring the pie to her mouth.


“Ahh!”


Something large hit her body, and Elise fell.


When she came to her senses, her pie had already fallen to the ground, and a large dog was devouring it.


‘I guess the dog was hungry too. It’s okay, there are still a lot of pieces left.’


Although she was a little startled, Elise soon recovered. She was willing to give up a piece of pie to a reliable dog.


Elise still smiled happily without being dissuaded.


“Kang! Kang! Kang-kang!”


Suddenly, the dog started writhing on the ground in pain, convulsing. Elise’s eyes widened as if they would pop out of her head.


‘Why all of a sudden…?’


The dog struggled desperately, before miserably falling limp. White foam bubbling from the corners of its mouth.


Goosebumps ran down Elise’s spine. It felt like her whole body was frozen.


“Uh, about food…”


Two fear-filled eyes turned to the Countess, meeting bright golden eyes like a snake that had found its prey.


“What are you doing? Eat quickly.”


Elise’s body began to tremble. Now everything was starting to make sense.


She wondered why her mother wouldn’t let her eat the food, why the Countess suddenly showed her kindness.


Then… Where was her mother now?


When the Countess read Elise’s fear, she parted her lips and smiled. Then her face became grotesquely contorted.


“Don’t worry.”


It was a horrifyingly friendly voice that didn’t match what she said. Those shiny yellow snake-like eyes were filled with murder.


“If you die, your mother can live.”


Elise’s body began to tremble, tears welling up.


‘Where is my mother? Maybe, maybe my mother also…’


She felt like her heart would explode from fear.


“I, I was wrong.”


Elise got down on her knees, put her hands together, and begged.


“Sorry. I was wrong. Please, please save me…”


Please forgive me, please forgive me. Elise pleaded. The child knew the words intuitively… and that her very existence was her sin to bear.


“I already did, ungrateful child.”


“I’m sorry, save me…”


“Feed her.”


As if she had been waiting, many claw-like hands reached out and violently restrained Elise. The child struggled, but she couldn’t withstand the strength of several adults.


‘No, no! Help me! Mother…!’


Her mouth was forced open, and she was given a piece of pie. The foul smell of the meat filled her mouth.


“Huh…!”

 

At that moment, Elise opened her eyes in horror. Her flailing arms suddenly stopped.

 

“Ahh, ahh…”

 

Her heart was beating frantically, her breathing wasn’t slowing.

 

Elise covered herself with the blanket and wrapped her hands around her shoulders. Her body was shaking in the aftermath of her shock.

 

A memory from her childhood. But it was still so vivid, tormenting her as if it were yesterday.

 

Elise curled up in the dark, as always, and caught her breath. Calming down little by little.

 

After that, she slowly regained her senses.

 

Elise pulled down the blanket she had covered herself with. The day was already bright.

 

‘I guess I had that dream because I was so hungry last night…’

 

Out of habit, Elise blamed herself and got up.

 

She managed to calm down, but her chest still felt tight and constricted. She wanted to get some air.

 

She went to the window and opened it. At the same time, something landed on the window frame.

 

It was the bird again.

 

Coughing, the pitch-black bird spat out a note and stuck out one of its claws. Elise saw a small bottle tied to its ankle. It was small enough to be easily hidden in a clenched fist.

 

When Elise untied the string, this time, the bird flew right away. Meaning there was no need to reply.

 

Her eyes wavered as she looked down at the bottle in her hand.

 

It was an opaque black bottle to hide its contents. It made her feel eerie. It reminded her of something, just like…

 

“No, let’s not think about that right now.”

 

Elise opened her letter, trying to shake off the fear creeping into her.

 

This message was longer than usual, and Elise’s face grew darker as she read.

 

The letter held detailed instructions but ended with an ultimatum, a threat.

 

[Marissa is doing well.]

 

Tears welled up under her bright blue eyes. Elise bit her lip hard to stop herself from crying.

 

That was when her hand tightened around the bottle.

 

“Lady Elise, may I come in?”

 

Elise quickly hid the vial and rubbed her eyes, wiping away the tears. She then cleared her voice and opened her mouth.

 

“Yes. Come on in.”

 

The door opened, and a middle-aged woman walked inside. She was dressed similar to the maids, but with more elaborate decorations.

 

“Nice to meet you, Lady Elise. I am Linda, the head maid of this mansion.”

 

“Hello, Linda.”

 

Despite the unexpected visit of someone new, Elise offered her greetings.

 

“What’s going on…?” 

 

Linda then explained politely.

 

“Unfortunately my lady, the maid who used to serve you, has stopped working here and I have come to inform you of this.”

 

It was an answer that somehow seemed to draw a line for her. Elise thought this was a little abrupt and cautiously asked.

 

“What brings you here…? Is this a bad thing?”

 

“No. She said she was going to her hometown.”

 

“Okay.”

 

She was a little surprised that the maid left without saying a word, but she soon came to terms with it.

 

She wasn’t that close to the maid, and she didn’t think she was that important in this mansion.

 

“The maids will take turns attending the young lady for the time being until another exclusive maid is appointed.”

 

Elise nodded.

 

“I have your meal ready. Shall I bring it to you?”

 

For a moment, Elise’s face became pale. Her memory mixed with her dream.

 

Her appetite was gone, and her stomach felt nauseous. She was in no condition to eat anything. Elise shook her head.

 

“I… am not hungry.”

 

Doubts appeared on Linda’s face but didn’t linger. Instead of inquiring further, she obediently lowered her head.

 

“All right.”

 

After the maid left, Elise took out the bottle of medicine she had hidden away. A nervous look on her face.

 

“Will the Duke return home today…?”

 

Elise looked out the window several times before pacing around her room.

 

Then it was time for her lunch, and she ate some of the food. But she still ate much less than the average person.

 

This time, an even bigger concern appeared on Linda’s face than earlier. She asked in a cautious manner.

 

“Miss, do you not want to have any more?”

 

Elise looked embarrassed as she checked the barely empty plate.

 

“…I’m just not feeling well.”

 

“Should I call a doctor?”

 

“Oh, no.”

 

Elise quickly shook her head.

 

“I don’t normally eat a lot, so you don’t have to worry.”

 

“If that’s true… then I understand.”

 

Linda put away the plate without saying anything more, her face betraying a mixture of discomfort and worry.

 

It was around that time when the sun began to set over the horizon slowly.

 

Elise could hear the sound of several people moving around behind the open window. Elise jumped to her feet.

 

In the distance, she saw a person riding a horse coming from the main gate. It was quite a distance. But the black hair was so vivid under the red sunset that Elise immediately recognised who he was.

 

Several employees were seen busily lining up on both sides of the stairs outside the front door to welcome their owner home.

 

When she saw that, Elise became impatient without realising it. When she came to her senses, she was already out of the room and with the employees.

 

Cardale leapt lightly from the horse’s saddle. Despite his height and solid, majestic physique, his movements were agile and smooth.

 

The man with an indifferent and cold face walked at a pace that was neither slow nor fast.

 

He passed by indifferently without looking at the employees greeting him, then suddenly noticed something that made his eyebrows twitch.

 

A silver colour that shone like the sunrise over a lake at dawn.

 

He continued walking without stopping, without taking his eyes off that spot.

 

He only saw the top of her head as it was hidden by the others, but one by one, the servants moved and revealed her. Her eyes and cheeks, her chin and the nape of her neck, and her slender body.

 

Standing tall, Cardale stopped. The woman standing in front of him was startled and quickly bent her legs in greeting.

 

“You are here.”

 

She looked up at him. Her bright blue eyes seemed as transparent as jewels, so much so that he wanted to grab them with one hand and shatter them.

 

“Duke.”

 

The woman who usually couldn’t even look him in the eye was very active today. At first glance, she seemed determined.

 

It was worth it.

 

As the situation was going as planned, Cardale’s mouth tightened slightly.

 

But this was the place for employees. He meant this wasn’t the place for her.

 

But for some reason, it was annoying to see her standing as if this was her rightful place.

 

“Who told you to stand here?”

 

The woman was unable to hide her embarrassment at the sudden question. Seeing her big, round deer-like eyes shaking with unease, Cardale softened his voice a little.

 

He didn’t want her to get scared and start to cower again.

 

“You should be doing your job, not standing here like this.”

 

“I have… something to do…?”

 

Cardale was willing to wait until Elise realised what he meant. She was not a stupid woman, so she will understand eventually.

 

After a while, Elise gasped softly. After licking her lips, she held her trembling hands together and lowered her gaze. A small answer similar to a whisper came out.

 

“Can I come visit you in the evening?”

 

“Not too late.”

 

“…Yes.”

 

Elise’s voice trembled as he gave his final answer.

 

Of course, he didn’t mind.

 

Wasn’t this the terms they agreed to from the beginning? He had already given her enough time to prepare. No, on the contrary, it dragged on far too long.

 

The women wouldn’t know that though.

 

Cardale briefly glanced at Elise’s delicate fingertips, they were faintly shaking, then turned his body and went inside.

 

“I have prepared some bath water for you.”

 

When Norman followed him and reported, Cardale gave instructions instead of answering.

 

“Don’t let anyone near my bedroom tonight.”

 

Norman paused for a moment but then lowered his head.

 

“Yes, Master.”

 

Feeling the presence of his loyal butler getting farther away, Cardale walked to the bedroom.

 

In fact, he had already noticed that Elise had been anxious to get noticed for a few days now.

 

However, he deliberately pretended not to notice and did not leave her side.

 

‘That will make you more nervous and anxious. So you will desperately cling to me.’

 

Now, the woman would come directly into his arms.

 

A slow smile appeared on the man’s face as he foresaw a perfect hunt.




Three maids visited Elise’s room.

 

“We will help you.”

 

Elise did not decline because she remembered the Duke’s command not to be late.

 

She didn’t know how long his patience would last, but she understood she didn’t have enough time.

 

The maids soaked her in water with a delicate floral scent, and washed her thoroughly. It was as if even a single trace of dirt would not be tolerated.

 

After washing her body, several people clung to her. One wrapped Elise’s hair in a thick towel to dry it, and one trimmed her short fingernails to make them even shorter.

 

So she would not accidentally injure the Duke’s precious body.

 

Then a maid poured perfume and anointed Elise’s body. Making her white skin smooth and even gain lustre.

 

After that, a maid took out a pure white negligee from the dressing room, made from very soft and thin silk.

 

Elise looked very beautiful, with delicate lace on her shoulders, cuffs, and the hem of her skirt.

 

However, the translucent fabric clearly revealed its purpose.

 

“I’ll help you dress.”

 

Following the maids’ nimble hands, the thin cloth covered Elise’s body. The hem of her long skirt slipped down.

 

“Do you feel uncomfortable anywhere?”

 

“I am okay.”

 

Finally, after donning a long cloak that reached down to her ankles, all that was visible was her white face and neck.

 

The maids left the room as soon as they finished their work, parting without any poignant words or unnecessary action.

 

Elise, left alone in her room, looked around out of habit and opened the third drawer of her desk.

 

As she reached deep into her drawer, she caught the bottle of medicine she had been hiding.

 

The black medicine bottle flashed an ominous light, but she did her best to ignore it. She then recalled Gerhard’s instructions written on her parchment.

 

‘It will be fine. It just said it was a medicine to help with the night.’

 

Then someone knocked on the door. Elise startled and almost dropped her bottle.

 

“Lady Elise, may I come in?”

 

It was the voice of Linda, the head maid. Elise managed to hold on to the bottle and held her breath as she cradled it tightly in both of her hands.

 

She then asked, hiding her nervousness.

 

“What’s going on?”

 

“Master is looking for you, my lady.”

 

“Now…?”

 

“Yes. This is a message from him telling you to come as soon as you receive this call.”

 

In her nervousness, Elise clenched the bottle hidden in her fist. Her hands were sweaty.

 

The head maid urged again.

 

“Lady Elise?”

 

“I’m going out now.”

 

Elise took the medicine bottle and held it tightly to not let it be seen. The cloak covering her negligee obscured her hands.

 

“I’ll guide you to the bedroom. Please follow me.”

 

Following behind the maid, Elise nervously clasped the bottle.

 

‘What do I do…?’

 

She brought it haphazardly, and she wasn’t confident she would be able to use the bottle’s content without anyone knowing.

 

Worry and anxiety appeared on Elise’s face.

 

‘I have to find an opening somehow.’

 

Elise glanced around herself.

 

She could tell that the Duke’s mood was a little different from usual.

 

No one else was in the hallways or stairs. She couldn’t even see the soldiers who would usually be standing guard. Moreover, she didn’t know if it was her, but the path she was taking felt darker than before.

 

‘Perhaps…’

 

Elise swallowed.

 

The head maid looked in front of her as she walked, and with no one else around, now was her chance.

 

‘I can avoid getting caught right now.’

 

When Elise’s hand from under her cloak carefully grasped the stopper of her bottle.

 

“Are you feeling okay?”

 

Elise suddenly trembled. When she raised her head, she saw that the maid had turned and was looking at her.

 

“I was worried because you ate so little.”

 

Elise replied, discreetly removing her hand from the stopper. Luckily, she didn’t seem to be caught.

 

“I am okay. It’s nothing.”

 

The head maid looked at Elise blankly for a moment. Elise tried to pretend she was fine.

 

“All right.”

 

The maid turned her body again and started walking away. Elise grabbed the bottle, her hands so sweaty she felt like she was going to lose the bottle.

 

‘The only time is now. But what if I take it out and get caught?’

 

While Elise couldn’t make her decision easily, she had already arrived in front of the Duke’s bedroom.

 

The maid spoke, as she stepped aside for Elise.

 

“You can go inside.”

 

Elise looked at the maid. She seemed to be watching until Elise went into the bedroom.

 

‘The Duke must be inside.’

 

Her expectation was that she would be able to take the medicine while avoiding the maid’s notice, but she lost that chance.

 

Elise bit the inside of her lip.

 

‘I’ll have to hide it in my cloak when I take it off…’

 

After making her decision, Elise pushed open one of the doors. The well-polished wood was heavy but opened smoothly.

 

Elise carefully entered.

 

The bedroom was quiet in the thick darkness. Only the sound of the crackling fireplace echoed in the quiet bedroom.

 

“…Duke.”

 

Elise couldn’t move any further and called out to the owner of this space in a low voice.

 

But without an answer, she didn’t even feel like he was present.

 

Elise carefully looked around the room, but the Duke was nowhere to be seen.

 

‘Where are you?’

 

Suddenly, a scent wafting around the room caught the tip of Elise’s nose. A spicy, herbal scent. It was the smell of the tea she prepared for him before.

 

Sure enough, when she turned her gaze, she saw a teapot with tea cups placed on a table surrounded by sofas.

 

Elise took her steps towards the table. The teacup was more than half empty. The little remaining tea water glowed in the red fireplace light.

 

Elise looked at that scene for a moment and then suddenly came to her senses.

 

‘This is not the time.’

 

Now that the Duke was away, it was her only opportunity.

 

Elise revealed the bottle. She was holding it so tightly in her hand that it became hot.

 

‘I must hurry before the Duke comes.’

 

When she grabbed the top of the stopped bottle, she made a popping sound as the cork was pulled out. Inside the bottle, there was a sweet smell like melted sugar.

 

‘This…’

 

Elise swallowed with a dry mouth. She was told there was nothing wrong, but there was no way she wouldn’t be afraid of using a drug she had never seen before.

 

So, she only hesitated for a moment.

 

Thud!

 

At that time, someone roughly grabbed her wrist.

 

Elise was startled. A frighteningly low voice penetrated the silence and penetrated her ears.

 

“What are you doing?”

 

The voice was so threatening that it sent shivers down her spine. 

 

Her heart sank.

 



 

Cardale looked at the woman’s hand held in his grasp, or more precisely the bottle she was holding, then slowly lowered his gaze and looked at her face.

 

“Ah, Duke…”

 

The woman’s face immediately turned pale when she saw his expression. Her small body began to shake.

 

She looked pitifully scared, but he didn’t care.

 

“I asked what kind of trick you were doing.”

 

He didn’t even show his anger. Her thin body wouldn’t be able to withstand the slightest pressure.

 

Nevertheless, the woman’s body trembled as if she had taken a direct threat to her life.

 

“I was wrong.”

 

Tears quickly filled her blue eyes.

 

“I’m sorry. Please forgive me.”

 

It was a truly foolish and thoughtless choice for her to beg him for mercy.

 

Rather, he despised women who believed that they could solve something by just crying about their mistakes.

 

For example, like his mother, the Esteemed Lady.

 

What value did crying have?

 



 

So, this was an unfamiliar experience for him. He almost felt inclined to forgive the pleas of a woman who committed such an obvious deception.

 

So, in the name of interrogation, Cardale gave the woman a chance to make her excuses.

 

“Is it poison?”

 

“No.”

 

The colour drained from Elise’s face. She shook her head urgently.

 

“Then what is it?”

 

“I do not know, but…”

 

Elise hesitated for a moment before a small voice came out from between her parted lips.

 

“It’s a medicine that relieves tension…”

 

“Elise.”

 

Cardale’s voice suddenly lowered. He warned, slowly stroking Elise’s cheek.

 

“Even if you lie, you must be sincere. This is why you can’t fool me even if you wanted to.”

 

“Ah, it’s not a lie…”

 

However, instead of listening to Elise’s answer, Cardale asked another question.

 

“So, who are you planning to use this medicine on?”

 

His eyes turned to his cup of unfinished tea.

 

“Were you planning to put it in the tea and make me drink it?”

 

“No! This is for me…”

 

Elise continued her words in tears.

 

“I meant to drink it.”

 

“You don’t need to ask for my forgiveness if you were planning on drinking a drug that just relaxes you. Is that it?”

 

Elise, speechless, pursed her lips. Without taking advantage of that opportunity, Cardale whispered in her ear.

 

“You actually have an idea what this is. Am I wrong?”


Long silver eyelashes fluttered like the wings of a butterfly.

 

“I am… Duke, I…”

 

“Elise.”

 

Cardale gave the correct answer to his poor prey that was so lost and ignorant to the dilemma she stumbled herself into. 

 

“Answer honestly.”

 

‘Then I will decide whether or not to forgive you.’

 

As he subtly entrapped her, the woman blinked. The tears she had been building up in her eyes, as clear and blue as a lake, fell.

 

“Let’s take care of this first.”

 

Cardale removed his hand from Elise’s wrist and took the vial instead. The woman gave it away without any resistance.

 

The artificial sweetness stung his nose and aroused discomfort.

 

Of course, he knew the identity of this drug. He had been approached by many women over the years, some of which had done stupid things such as using drugs like this.

 

‘It’s useless anyway.’

 

Cardale threw it into the fireplace without a care, followed by a faint sound of the small bottle breaking.

 

“Now the evidence is gone.”

 

He cupped Elise’s wet cheek with one hand. Her lithe body flinched as his thumb gently wiped away the tears hanging under her eyes.

 

“Say it.”

 

‘I’ll make it like nothing ever happened.’

 

He coaxed again. Still, Elise couldn’t let the words leave her mouth easily.

 

“Do you want to go back to the Count’s mansion?”

 

“Oh, no…!”

 

Only after hearing the threat did she open her mouth.

 

“If I drank it… I was told it would relax me and make things easier.”

 

“Makes what easier?”

 

Elise licked her lips for a while and then lowered her head. Before she knew it, the tips of her ears were turning red.

 

“…I guess…”

 

Cardale’s lips were taut.

 

“I can’t hear you very well.”

 

Of course, that wasn’t true. As well as his superior physical ability, he also had excellent senses. No matter how quiet Elise’s voice was, he never had a problem hearing it.

 

‘At least it was true that you tried to drink it.’

 

Cardale lifted the woman’s chin. Her eyes were tinged with shame.

 

“Say it again.”

 

So the reason she had to say it again was purely to appease him.

 

“Duke…I think I’ll be able to satisfy you well…”

 

Now, the woman was red all the way to the back of her neck.

 

In fact, that was only the extent of her exposed skin. If he removed her cloak covering her body, the rest of her skin would look the same.

 

“Okay.”

 

He slowly slid the finger he had placed under Elise’s chin. Elise let out a nervous breath as his fingers slowly moved down her neck and pressed against the tender skin.

 

“Did the Count tell you to gather my seed?”

 

“Huh, no…” 

 

Elise hastily shook her head as she answered. Cardale looked down at the woman and lowered his finger to caress her collarbone, then caught the ribbon that fastened her cloak.

 

Elise stuttered her answer.

 

“Well, I can’t get pregnant…” 

 

“That’s right, you can’t.”

 

‘Because I never gave you permission to.’

 

After finishing speaking, he pulled the ribbon.

 

The unfastened cloak fell off the woman’s body and to the floor.

 

The thin, translucent negligee and its silhouette were fully revealed before his eyes.

 

“Ah…”

 

‘You act like a shy deer.’

 

It was ridiculous that she was trying to hide her body out of embarrassment.

 

However, he also found himself falling for an obvious trick.

 

Her skin showing through the thin fabric stimulated him, and the reddened nape of her neck aroused a strange impulse.

 

No, in fact, it had been that way ever since she held back her cries and prayed with her wet eyes.

 

She repaid his patience by pushing him to the edge over something that was insignificant and making her cry.

 

He crowded the helpless woman. When Elise instinctively took a step back and tried to avoid his gaze, he spoke softly.

 

“You have to seduce me, Elise.”

 

Elise flinched, stopped, and looked up at him. Her shaky blue eyes seemed to be asking what to do.

 

Cardale gave an order in a slightly murky voice.

 

“Kiss me.”

 

The voice urging her to kiss was low as if he was suppressing something. The sharp, red eyes flashed like those of a wild beast, but his pupils were somehow deeper.

 

Elise hesitated for a moment and then slowly approached him.

 

Carefully, she placed her small hands on his chest and leaned up to him. The moment their lips were about to gently meet, he wrapped his strong arms around Elise’s waist and pulled her in tightly.

 

Then, before Elise could even realise the situation, her lips were swallowed.

 

“Ang…!”

 

Her lips opened in surprise, and a thick tongue pushed inside.

 

Even though she hadn’t consumed anything, there was still a sweet taste on the woman’s lips. In fact, it seemed to be more concentrated than last time.

 

She said she was going to drink the medicine.

 

He took the small mouth in one go. When her insides stirred loudly, the woman’s small tongue was startled and tried to run away.

 

‘How dare you?’

 

He chased the small lump of flesh, then immediately wrapped around it and pulled with his own tongue. 

 

With his other hand, he grabbed the back of the woman’s head to prevent her from moving.

 

“Um, hmmm…!”

 

Cardale greedily plundered Elise’s breath.

 

There was no part of the tender flesh in her mouth that was spared. As if not to miss any small gap, he rubbed and scrubbed every nook and cranny, leaving his mark like a brand.

 

Their saliva mixed together. A humid and noisy sound flowing incessantly.

 

Elise couldn’t come to her senses. Her body, unable to move, was just waiting to be swept away by him.

 

While he was kissing her, she didn’t know where she was being led.

 

Elise was losing her focus. She could no longer endure her breathlessness and tried to twist her head away.

 

Their lips parted for a moment, then fluttered, and her body fell backwards.

 

It was only after she felt tender sheets covering her entire body that she realised that she had been laid down on the bed.

 

Although she was preparing herself, the fear still remained, and Elise shuddered.

 

Blue eyes tinged with fear and anxiety turned towards the man, casting a long shadow over her.

 

Cardale looked down at the woman and licked his lower lip.

 

He savoured her pure white body in a negligee that she wouldn’t be wearing for much longer, her pale fingers tightly grasped the sheets, and even her silver hair spread out across the sheets.

 

A strange sense of sad!sm arose as her transparent, bright blue eyes became watery.

 

‘If you’re crying already. You’ll be crying for me all night long.’

 

His thoughts towards the woman were becoming rougher, imagining her moaning and begging made his lower body ache.

 

“Elise.”

 

Cardale whispered, wiping Elise’s wet eyes.

 

“The time to run away is now.”

 

Without any intention of letting her go, he offered the deception mercifully. As if to give her a chance when, in reality, there was only one option.

 

And, of course, Elise shook her head.

 

There was no need to add words like, ‘It was your choice.’

 

He took Elise’s negligee in his hands and pulled it to either side of her.

 

Squeak, the thin fabric tore easier than paper.

 

Her clothes were removed smoothly, revealing her pure white and naked body.

 

As her breasts and the pink peak above them swayed before his eyes, he lowered his lips.

 

“Aangg…!”

 

When he placed his tongue on the raised bump and licked, Elise’s body flinched, and she let out a small moan. Cardale swallowed her pink nipples.

 

He rolled his tongue over the peak and cupped her other breast with his free hand.

 

He held her chest tightly in his large hands. She was so soft and tender that when he applied just a little force, her flesh pushed out between his fingers. Everywhere he touched, she melted around him like dough.

 

Nasty, wet sounds continued to flow from Cardale’s mouth. Her moans grew louder as he took her free nipple between his fingers and rubbed it. At the same time, Cardale sucked strongly on the chest he was biting.

 

“Uhh…!”

 

Cardale grabbed and pressed her arching waist, increasing the intensity of his harassment.

 

While licking and sucking her are0las, he suddenly bit her nipples, causing the slender female body below him to tremble. Before she knew it, the bed was shaking pitifully.

 

He raised his fingertips and scratched the most sensitive part of her nipple with his nail.

 

Elise grabbed his arm and tried to push him away.

 

“S-stop… Sigh…”

 

“Well, I know what comes next.”

 

The man who had freely teased her chest raised his upper body. Then, he grabbed Elise’s tightly joined thighs and spread them to the sides.


The shiny red flesh, like a wet fruit, was exposed to him.

 

Elise blushed as the shameful posture exposed her most private parts. Her whole body, heating up.

 

It was so embarrassing and shameful…

 

Elise begged, lowering her hands to cover herself without realising it.

 

“Don’t look, don’t look…”

 

“Is that possible?”

 

Cardale twisted the corners of his lips in amusement. He lowered himself and placed his lips close to Elise’s ear, whispering.

 

“I want you to know exactly where I’ll put myself.”

 

“Huh…”

 

His explicit and obscene words filled my ears. Elise sobbed softly from the shame.

 

“Get your hands away.”

 

She cried and shook her head. It was so embarrassing and strange how hot she was feeling, it didn’t even feel like this was her body.

 

“Well then…”

 

Cardale grabbed the torn fabric lying on the bed. It was once a negligee until just a moment ago. It was moderately long, elastic, and soft.

 

“We have no choice but to help you enjoy this to your heart’s content.”

 

He reached up and tied Elise’s wrists, pinning them to the bedside.

 

In the blink of an eye, Elise lost freedom of her hands and was bound, looking up at Cardale with fear in her eyes.

 

“Ah, Duke…”

 

“You should listen to me carefully, Elise.”

 

No sooner had he finished speaking when Cardale’s long fingers touched her vagina.

 

“Haah…!”

 

Elise was shocked and reflexively closed her thighs, but it was a meaningless action that caused him no inconvenience. 

 

Cardale used a hand to push one of Elise’s thighs upwards, holding it in place. Elise’s body turned red as her posture became even more shameful, but she could do nothing to resist.

 

Thick fingers dug into her crevice and slowly, gently pulled open her closed labia. Then he began to rub the delicate skin inside.

 

As he gently rolled the protruding flesh, using her slight wetness as lubricant, she gradually became hard and swollen.

 

Elise flinched at the unfamiliar stimulation, not knowing what to do. As her arms exerted a lot of force, the cloth she was tied with was pulled taut.

 

“Tsssk, tssssk…”

 

He leisurely observed her reactions and watched her excitement build. Elise’s moans gradually became louder, and the intervals between them became shorter.

 

The strangely exciting sensations swept over Elise. The unfamiliar feeling, unable to escape and pooling in her body, became increasingly unbearable for her.

 

She kept biting her lip, feeling like she was going to make strange, vulgar sounds. Then the man’s finger came in between her lips.

 

“Don’t bite.”

 

Cardale continued to stimulate her. In fact, he could have let her tip over sooner, but he deliberately waited. He wanted to watch more of the woman’s dirty expressions.

 

When Elise couldn’t hold back any longer and reached her limit, he pressed her clit hard with his calloused fingertips.

 

“Aaangg..!”

 

Elise’s vision turned white as she felt firecrackers exploding in her head. As she reached her shallow climax, her back arched like a bow, and juices poured out between her legs.

 

Elise flopped back onto the bed. Her body trembled at the extreme sensations she was experiencing for the first time.

 

Looking down at the woman’s features and eyes blurred with heavenly pleasure, Cardale licked his lips in satisfaction.

 

“It would be a shame if that was just once.”

 

He placed his hand below where he had been teasing. It was wet enough to his liking from her climax.

 

After lubricating her vaginal opening, which was still quivering from the aftermath of her climax. Elise took in a breath as his thick finger plunged into it.

 

“Uhhh…!”

 

“It’s tight.”

 

Even though he only used his middle finger, it was so tight that it wasn’t easy to get in.

 

He gently rolled his thumb over her clit, sliding his finger into her to make a path then pulling it out again. At the same time, he did not forget to rub her inner walls.

 

Before she knew it, his fingers had increased to two. The finger that was rubbing inside her with the intention of unfolding each and every fold, pressed hard on something that was sticking out, and a sharp cry came out.

 

“Hahhh!”

 

Elise, surprised by her lustful moans, urgently tried to cover her mouth, but it was no use.

 

Cardale deliberately pressed that part again, and he felt her lower abdomen tightening as he did so.

 

“Uh, uh, this, that’s…”

 

“You have to be honest.”

 

Cardale pushed in another finger, then increased the friction, as if punishing her.

 

“It feels good. Doesn’t it?”

 

“Ah, no… Uhh, oh, ah…!”

 

Elise desperately shook her head. She felt like if she admitted it, she would become a lewd and shameless woman.

 

Cardale chuckled.

 

Moving his three fingers back and forth, he began stimulating her in different directions. At the same time, his thumb still rubbed against her clitoris, Elise’s moans grew louder.

 

Her sopping wet bottom was squishing and making obscene sounds.

 

“I’ll bring you over one more time, so enjoy it.”

 

He lowered his lips to the appropriately swollen red nub. At the feeling of hot lips kissing her lower body, Elise twisted her body as if frightened, but it was useless as his strong hands held her waist tightly.

 

“Ah, ah… No, Duke… No…!”

 

“Too late.”

 

As if everything until now was just a joke, Cardale’s hands began moving back and forth rapidly.

 

Every time she felt his fingers move in and out, there was a slopping sound from how wet they were. As he strongly sucked the flesh between her legs, Elise suddenly reached her second climax.

 

“Uhh, ah, uh… Ah, ahh!”

 

Her toes curled, and her thighs trembled with great strength. He slowly withdrew his fingers from her, feeling the inner walls contract and relax.

 

Cardale slowly raised his body and looked down at the woman on his bed, flushed red from her orgasm.

 

She was tied up and unable to resist, her body flailed around, looking so pitiful and pretty.

 

However, her delicate skin where it was being rubbed by the cloth was slightly red.

 

He had tied it loosely on purpose, but he never thought it would still be this bad.

 

Cardale clicked his tongue, untied the cloth that bound Elise’s wrists, and lightly massaged the area. Then, he gently kissed the sensitive and soft skin on her wrist several times.

 

Every time he did, Elise’s entire body became sensitive, and she kept twitching from the pleasure. It was the response of her well-prepared body.

 

Without taking his eyes off her heated body, he untied the straps of his own gown. The slick cloth fell to the floor.

 

The man’s sturdy body appeared in the dark room lit only by a few candles. His tightly-knit muscles rippled under the reddish light.

 

Cardale grabbed one of Elise’s ankles and spread it to the side. The small entrance was slowly shrinking.

 

It took him great efforts to free it.

 

Lightly clicking his tongue, he aligned his member with her narrowing entrance and pushed inside slowly. As the tight entrance opened for him and her inner walls clung to him, swallowing his glans. He could feel a pleasure strong enough to make his hairs stand on end.

 

“Huh!”

 

Elise’s eyes widened and she gasped from feeling something hot and huge digging inside of her.

 

She hurriedly stretched out her free hand in front of her, waving it in the air before grabbing Cardale’s shoulder. Then she clung on with all her might as if he were her only lifeline.

 

Cardale also narrowed his eyes and let out a low groan as he felt her inner flesh tightening around him, he felt like he was going to tear it.

 

“Huh, relax.”

 

‘I’m not even halfway in yet. So tight.’

 

But Elise couldn’t do anything about the pressure of the large shaft filling her. She could even feel it in her stomach.

 

“Huh, huh…”

 

The combination of the unfamiliar pain, the shame of showing her naked body to this man, and the pleasure she was experiencing from it all caused Elise to burst into tears.

 

Cardale placed his lips on the woman’s mouth.

 

This time, he kissed her softly, unlike before.

 

He lightly sucked on her upper and lower lips and ran his tongue between her lips as if asking for permission. As Elise’s lips parted, he slid in between them.

 

So as not to startle her, he slowly intertwined her tongue with his and rubbed it, gently squeezing her breast with one hand. As he gently rolled and smoothed her sensitive peak with his fingertips, as if soothing her, a moan escaped her lips again as she joined him in this act of pleasure.

 

Cardale, feeling that the opening below him had become a little easier, began to move his waist slowly.


He pulled out, leaving only the glans in, and then slowly inserted himself again, repeating the insertion and withdrawal. So he pushed in little by little.

 

“Ah, huh, ah… slowly…”

 

“How can I move any slower than this?”

 

Even though he didn’t push all the way in on purpose, Elise was still having a hard time. Cardale willingly lowered his upper body and put himself within Elise’s grasp, scratching his shoulder.

 

However, because of her close-cut nails, no matter how hard she dug her nails, there wasn’t even a small scratch on his strong back.

 

“Sh!t…”

 

Cardale let out a low curse.

 

‘Next time, I won’t let her cut her nails. It would have been better if she scratched and seen even a little blood.’

 

He felt like he was being tested and was barely able to exercise his patience. He stopped pushing and caressed the woman while he waited for her to adjust.

 

Cardale’s lips left red marks all over Elise’s body, her fair skin sucked in several places to create bruises.

 

He gently kneaded her breasts, rubbed her nipples, or even flicked her clit to make her arch her back.

 

“Aah, ah, hmm… ah!”

 

At some point Elise’s voice, once crying in pain, began to become excited. Inside, which was already tight, twitched and tightened around his shaft appropriately.

 

Cardale noticed this, slowly rolled his eyes back in satisfaction, and his mouth opened slightly in response to the exciting feeling.

 

He grabbed Elise’s hips, spread them apart, and adjusted himself.

 

He could see her inner flesh holding his pen!s, widened to its limit. Thanks to being heavily soaked, the area around it shined with a sticky sheen as if it coated with sugar water.

 

Even through tears, his subject with innocent eyes and knew nothing, was immersed in the erotic world below. That visual disparity excited Cardale.

 

If her reason had been disturbed just a little more, he would have turned her into the same mess he sees in himself, and would have broken her to pieces.

 

‘That won’t work.’

 

No prey has captivated him like this woman has so far. He couldn’t ruin it when he hadn’t even fully enjoyed it yet.

 

When he eventually gets tired of this beautiful prey, he will enjoy the pleasure of destroying it, but at least not for right now.

 

Cardale grit his teeth and regained his senses. A minimum amount of restraint was still required.

 

After catching his breath, he pulled out his pen!s from her entrance. Fixed his gaze on the woman’s face, and thrust all the way in one go.

 

His glans went inside at once and hit her cervix.

 

“Aahhh!”

 

With a shout, Elise’s body bounced, and her head tilted back as much as possible. She couldn’t close her open mouth.

 

Her eyes flashed and blinked like crazy. Her vision turned as white as a sheet of paper, and she couldn’t think of anything.

 

It was an explosive pleasure that could not be compared to her previous two times.

 

Cardale took in every detail of Elise’s blurred eyes, parted lips, and gorgeous shuddering body. Then he slowly pulled back his member.

 

As his blunt glans slowly scraped her insides and slipped out, Elise twisted her waist again and moaned.

 

“I told you to relax.”

 

“Huh, well… It doesn’t work… Ah!”

 

With a thud, his penis came in forcefully again and hit the same spot.

 

“Duke…!”

 

An explosive pleasure enveloped her entire body. Elise moaned, arching her back and pressing her thighs together. Through the gap between the two, more lovely fluid poured out.

 

Her hand that had been missing his back, grabbed the sheet instead. The knuckles of her small, slender fingers bulged white.

 

Cardale also twisted and swallowed a moan as her inner walls tightened again.

 

“How much longer are you going to whine that it hurts?”

 

“Huh… Hmm…”

 

“I haven’t even fucked you that long.”

 

Elise was so lost in her orgasmic pleasure that she heard nothing. She just moaned again and again, her small lips struggling to close.

 

He didn’t want to hear an answer anyway, so Cardale lifted her waist slightly.

 

As his member rubbed against her insides as she reached her peak, Elise’s body exploded with a pleasure she couldn’t handle.

 

“Good.”

 

But it was Cardale who got so excited that his eyes rolled. Her inner walls contracted uncontrollably and squeezed his genitals, sending a thrill all the way through his body.

 

He held the woman’s arms and legs so she couldn’t move and fucked her vagina until he was satisfied. The only reason he didn’t cum on her fair, juicy breasts, was thanks to his patience, remembering that this was her first time.

 

But now, he was slowly reaching his limit.

 

Cardale grabbed her thighs below her knees and pushed up. As her vagina and the puckered hole behind it were exposed, Elise shook her head in confusion and tried to close her legs.

 

It’s a no-brainer.

 

Cardale laughed lightly at the woman who was making such a fuss and grabbed both of her slender ankles in one hand.

 

With his other hand, he stroked her lower part where his member was fucking her vagina tightly. The taut red mucous membrane fluttered pitifully.

 

A sweet moan escaped Elise’s mouth as he soaked his fingers in the sticky mixture of their juices and rubbed her perineum.

 

He placed his glans at her entrance again. She welcomed him, clinging to him as if waiting for her hole that still trembled.

 

He deliberately slicked his penis and moistened it with her love juices.

 

“Uhh…!”

 

Elise whimpered every time the red shaft was revealed under her and rubbed against her genitals.

 

When he slid his penis back into her hole and pushed just a little, he could feel her hot inner walls tightening again.

 

“Uhh… You were born for this.”

 

The voice was extremely muddy, and Elise couldn’t tell if it was an exclamation or sarcasm.

 

Cardale spread Elise’s legs over his shoulders and held her waist tightly with his hands.

 

“Take it right.”

 

At the same time, his shaft pulled all the way down to his glans and entered until a popping sound was heard.

 

“Haaaa!”

 

Cardale pushed her back up. The sound of wet flesh hitting each other echoed throughout the room.

 

Pop, pop, pop. The scary, veiny penis scratched against her inner wall and penetrated. Every time the scrotum hit the perineum, Elise let out a soft moan.

 

“Ah, huh, ah! Ahhh!”

 

Elise couldn’t come to her senses. It felt like she was being stabbed by a hot iron rod every time his penis pierced her, as if spreading his heat through her inner walls. However, when he scraped the inside with the head of his glans and slipped back out, the pleasure was so strong that her whole body trembled.

 

Then, when something on her inner wall was pressed, her waist automatically twisted and her vision became blurry.

 

Cardale’s soft laughter pierced Elise’s ears. He began to deliberately move back there.

 

“Oh, no… Ugh! yes!”

 

Every time his heavy glans touched her deep erogenous zone, her inner walls contracted. Elise frantically burst into ecstasy. Her lower abdomen began to swell and heat up, her mind turned completely white. It seemed like she was going to join the clouds soon.

 

Elise, who was scared by her body reacting so uncontrollably, grabbed at Cardale’s arm.

 

“Duke… Sigh, stop… … Ah! Duke, I don’t like it…”

 

His eyebrows twitched at the sound of her refusal.

 

Cardale pulled his penis out from under Elise in one go. Elise gasped and looked up at him as she suddenly felt empty underneath him.

 

“You begged me to stop.”

 

He smiled and looked down at her. At the same time, he went through her pub!c hair and gently rubbed her red bud.

 

“Huh!”

 

As he pulled away just before her climax and only continued to stimulate her tantalizingly, she sobbed – he was indirectly telling Elise that she had done something wrong.

 

“Please…Well, somehow. Please do it… Hahh!”

 

“That’s not it.”

 

Cardale came to Elise’s ear and whispered.

 

“Beg me to fuck you. It feels so warm inside you, beg me to indulge you.”

 

Elise sobbed and shook her head. She couldn’t stand him saying such lewd words. However, as Cardale persistently tormented her and made her thoughts wander through the torturous pleasure, she eventually couldn’t stand it and muttered in a slurred voice.

 

“Huh, put it in, put it in… Duke… haahh!”

 

As he scratched her itch, her genitals were struck. Until now, his implications were just a joke. 

 

“Aang, ugh, ugh, ah!”

 

It was a violent and merciless move. His large member slid in and out of her wet vaginal opening. He was so far inside that it threatened to engulf his scrotum.

 

Every time his large member plunged to its root and came back out, white foam formed at the entrance. Love juice splashed all over the crack and soaked the bed sheets.

 

“So obscene.”

 

Elise’s eyes lit with shame at the man’s criticism. But even then, her excitement continued to soar.

 

Gradually, she couldn’t think about anything. Every time he thrust into her, an intense feeling of pleasure ran down her spine like satisfying a scratch.

 

Cardale placed his hands on either side of Elise’s head and bent his upper body. Then he started thrusting from tip to root.

 

As he added his weight and she was fucked even harder, stars appeared before Elise’s eyes.

 

“Ah, yes! Sigh! Ah!”

 

A loud moan burst from Elise’s mouth. There was no time for her to close her parted lips and just let out a sigh. Pleasure surged over her and made her feel like her brain was melting.

 

“Ssss…”

 

Blue veins appeared on Cardale’s temples as her inner walls tightened and vigorously around him. He gritted his teeth.


The pounding gradually became faster, her inner walls twitched from the violent thrusting movements.

 

Now, a loud squishing sound came from where the viscous fluid was flowing like water. He chased after the pleasure with a fierce momentum.

 

“Ah! Ahhh…!”

 

Elise arched her body as if she was going to fall and let out a long moan.

 

It was the peak.

 

As the sticky vaginal wall contracted and massaged the genitals inside her, a dizzying sense of pleasure travelled up her spine and hit Cardale.

 

“Ugh!”

 

With a thrust, he finally plunged his tip into her cerv!x and let out a deep groan.

 

Elise’s body trembled as she caught the semen pouring deep inside her.

 

It was a pretty long cumshot. After finishing the last drop, he raised his upper body slightly. He saw the woman’s body shiver from the afterglow of climax.

 

“Ha, ah…”

 

Elise was completely dishevelled and breathing softly with her hazy eyes.

 

It wasn’t that bad. No, he was rather satisfied actually. The fact that he made her a vulgar mess made it even more satisfying. His blood pooled in his abdomen, and he became stiff again.

 

“Huhh…”

 

He gently rotated her waist and slowly rubbed her inner walls back and forth.

 

“Ah, uhm…”

 

Elise moaned, writhing her body as the stimulation applied to her increasingly sensitive skin beneath him. Her watery eyes blinked pleadingly at him.

 

Seeing him alone in her blue eyes, Cardale smiled with satisfaction.

 

He said, gently rubbing the point that was still connected.

 

“Only once.”

 

“Hmm…!”

 

‘If you want to be liked, you have to work hard for it, no?’

 

The man’s shadow fell over the woman who had not yet come to her senses.

 

The wet sound of flesh hitting flesh began to fill the bedroom again.

 



 

Feeling his desires satisfied wasn’t bad.

 

Cardale could partially understand why his men were so anxious that they could not have women of their own.

 

He slowly raised himself and looked down at Elise sleeping next to him.

 

The woman had climaxed several more times, then burst into tears as the pleasure poured out of her again and again, more than she could handle. Then she finally couldn’t stand it and fell asleep as if she fainted.

 

Her eyes were closed, and her face was soft and relaxed. However, the corners of her eyes were red and sunken.

 

That was also beautiful.

 

His whole body was sticky with sweat and their juices. Strangely enough, he didn’t feel dirty or bad, but he still needed to wash up.

 

Above all, the woman’s body was like that as well. Cardale thought of Elise’s body, mangled with his own bodily fluids. How the white skin, covered in saliva and semen, glistened under the candlelight.

 

“damn…”

 

If things continued like this, he would trample and violate the sleeping woman. He walked out of bed, roughly running his fingers through his hair.

 

Cardale, wearing his own gown now, stopped while trying to pull the servant’s string.

 

Then he returned to his spacious four-poster bed and untied his curtains.

 

In an instant, the cloth wrapped around all sides of the bed, hiding the sleeping woman.

 

Unaware that it was an instinctive action to protect and hide what was his.

 

Linda, the maid, arrived and bowed.

 

“Did you call me, Master?”

 

“Get the bath water ready.”

 

“Yes.”

 

Following Linda’s gesture, the maids came in at once and filled the bathtub with hot water for two people.

 

They finished their work and quickly left the bedroom. Linda, who was about to leave as well, remembered something and stopped.

 

“Master, I have something to inform you of.”

 

Cardale narrowed his eyebrows.

 

“What?”

 

Like all of the Duke of Vassenberg’s employees, Linda was familiar with her master’s dislike of wasting time.

 

That’s why she hasn’t been willing to report until now.

 

‘But since you spent the night together… I guess I can tell him this much.’

 

Linda put an end to her hesitation and brought up her observation.

 

“She is eating too little food.”

 

The man’s brow furrowed.

 

“Explain in detail.”

 

Linda began to recite step by step what she had seen.

 

“It’s as I said, eating too little. Yesterday, all she ate was two buttered potatoes, a slice of grilled sea bass, and three slices of honey-pickled peaches.”

 

Cardale remembered the woman’s slender body.

 

Her particularly thin waist, her wrists that looked like they would break if he squeezed too hard, and the soft nape of her neck.

 

The only cushioned parts of her body were her round breasts and her soft buttocks.

 

She was so skinny because she ate poorly.

 

He lowered his eyes for a moment, lost in thought. A dark shadow appeared under his long black eyelashes.

 

After a while, Cardale opened his mouth.

 

“Bring the meal into the bedroom.”

 



 

Elise didn’t wake up until late afternoon.

 

Opening her eyes, she blinked a few times. At first, she thought it was night because it was still dark around her. Then she noticed a ray of light peeking through the curtains surrounding the bed.

 

Soon, she felt the touch of soft bed sheets and warm goose-down blankets. It was a comfortable bed but felt foreign.

 

“No way, I’m still in the Duke’s bedroom…”

 

Elise was belatedly startled and tried to get up. Then, she felt a tremendous dull pain she only just noticed.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

Her whole body hurt as if she had been hit. It felt like every muscle in her body was screaming.

 

After struggling with herself, Elise was able to raise her body and lean against the head of the bed.

 

She reached her hand through the blackout curtains around the bed and gently lifted it to the side, revealing the bedroom.

 

The interior, deeply bathed in afternoon sunlight, was quiet. She seemed alone. She heard a faint crackling sound, the embers in the fireplace much weaker than last night.

 

‘I guess the Duke has already left.’

 

As she thought about him, the events of last night suddenly came to mind. Elise immediately blushed with shame. Memories as vivid as well as the remaining sensations in her body came flooding back.

 

‘It’s my first time feeling like that…’

 

The first lovemaking in her life was much more intense than she had even vaguely imagined.

 

It seemed that Elise now understood why people, especially men and women in deep relationships, attached great importance to that act.

 

It was about sharing the most intimate parts of each other. It felt like the whole world was shaking every time they shuddered while deeply bonded in their pursuit of pleasure.

 

‘I’m not in that kind of relationship, but…’

 

She was just a maid who served her master. She was not the Duke’s lover, nor his wife, nor anything else.

 

A fact she had known from the beginning that struck her heart anew, and Elise lowered her head.

 

Then she noticed the new dress draped over her body.

 

“Uh…”

 

Only then did she realise that her skin was soft, as if someone had washed it.

 

“Who, who… did this?”

 

She was probably washed by the maids while she was asleep. Elise felt embarrassed when she thought about the condition her body was in.

 

When she lifted the end of her skirt, she could see her thighs full of marks. The traces of Cardale biting and sucking yesterday.

 

Even though no one was watching her, Elise’s face turned bright red and quickly pulled down her skirt, catching her now shallow breath.

 

It was then that something important suddenly occurred to Elise as she calmly slowed her breathing.

 

‘…The bird!’

 

Yesterday, Count Schuvan sent medicine via the bird and told Elise to use it by evening at the latest.

 

‘Father will want to check how things went.’

 

The Count would be awaiting a report on whether his instructions had been properly carried out. There was a high possibility that the bird had arrived awhile ago.

 

‘I have to go back to my room.’

 

If the bird were discovered, it would be the end for her. She had to hurry back.

 

Elise quickly put her feet on the floor next to the bed, just as she was about to get up.

 

“Ahh…!”

 

Elise lost her footing as pain assaulted her entire body. Her legs, unable to support her, collapsed, and her body tilted.

 

It was when Elise squeezed her eyes shut to brace for the pain that would come as her body hit the floor.

 

“I couldn’t stand that bird.”

 

But instead of feeling pain, a low voice pierced her ears. She felt a strong embrace wrapping around her body. A feeling she had already become accustomed to.

 

“…Duke.”

 

When she opened her eyes, the owner of the bedroom was holding her. However, unlike the hands that hugged her reassuringly, the eyes that looked down at her were cold.

 

“What are you trying to do now?”

 

Elise swallowed. Obviously, she didn’t know. How careful and attentive she was.

 

First of all, if she had been caught, there was no way the Duke would have left her alone. He wouldn’t have held her all night otherwise.

 

Still, she couldn’t figure out why her body was shaking so much or why her mouth was dry from nervousness.

 

“I asked what you were doing.”

 

“Well, I think I should go back to my room.”

 

“Go and do what?”

 

“Changed my clothes…”

 

Elise answered, trying not to show how nervous she was. However, as she was running out of excuses, she had no choice.

 

Cardale, who was staring at Elise as she picked up the reason for her stuttering, twisted his lips.

 

“I have to go to my room and change clothes, because I couldn’t sleep properly.”

 

He said, making eye contact with Elise directly.

 

“Are you going to report your schemes with me to your father?”


Instantly the colour drained from Elise’s face.

 

“Uh…”

 

She was so shocked she couldn’t say anything. Cardale chuckled as she looked at him with a pale, scared face.

 

“Your face is asking how I know.”

 

He lifted her lightly and placed her back on the bed. Elise only pursed her lips.

 

“Elise, my maid.”

 

Cardale lightly tapped her cheek and whispered softly.

 

“Do you think there are secrets in this mansion that I don’t know about?”

 

At those words, Elise caught her breath. Her throat felt strangled as she met those cold, red eyes.

 

“Well, I…” 

 

“You will never see that pitch-black bird again.”

 

He had already taken her breath away. Cardale continued speaking casually. Elise could now notice she was shakingling pathetically.

 

‘I got caught. I turned them all in. What should I do?’

 

Her fearful eyes fluttered as she looked at Cardale.

 

He added affectionately, tucking a strand of her flowing silver hair behind her ear.

 

 “If you’ve already given up your body to your owner, wouldn’t it be troublesome to still deceive him after?”

 

“Uh, I was wrong…”

 

Her apology came out reflexively.

 

“I was wrong, Duke…”

 

Cardale’s gaze suddenly froze her face.

 

 “I clearly told you not to lie to me. Yet you repeatedly broke that rule, is it a sign of disrespect towards me? Or is it part of a clever calculation that expects me to overlook this if you beg and plead enough?”

 

“Oh, no! That’s really…”

 

Elise urgently shook her head. Unable to contain herself, she wriggled on the bed and placed her foot outside. She knelt down and begged with a desperate plea.

 

Then Cardale shouted.

 

“If you leave the bed, I won’t just stand by quietly. I won’t leave you alone.”

 

Elise froze in an awkward position.

 

Then she knelt down on the bed and put her hands together.

 

“I-I will ask father not to send the bird again. It’s just that… I was too late to serve the Duke… That’s why he was concerned… Now-”

 

“So it’s okay now that you’ve been fucked all night?”

 

Elise’s face instantly heated up at his blatant, vulgar remarks.

 

“Uhh…”

 

Cardale lowered his eyes and looked down at the woman.

 

His slow, bored gaze swept over Elise. Her red ears and cheeks, the nape of her neck, and the pale, bruised skin that would have been hidden under her clothes.

 

“Just… Just this time…”

 

Elise lowered her head and stuttered. Her soft voice came out as a mumble as if she was going to shrivel away.

 

“P-please, just this once…”

 

Cardale sensed there was moisture collecting in her voice again.

 

“Up.”

 

As he lifted her chin, the blue eyes were already glistening.

 

“It’s my fault for acting up over this.”

 

However, the sight of her crying and pleading was not that bad.

 

For all that could be tamed by him, obedience was a virtue. It was just unpleasant to be swayed by the leash of her past and go against his will.

 

Cardale thought he would need a much stronger and tougher leash than he had now to contain her.

 

One that would prevent her from looking away or behind, solely making her his prey.

 

If necessary, even by shackling her wrists and ankles.

 

“Never contact the Count again.”

 

Elise was startled by Cardale’s command and stuttered.

 

“B-but so suddenly…”

 

Her face suddenly turned white.

 

‘If the Count harms mother just because we lost contact…’

 

The threat that if she made a mistake, Marissa would pay the price, gripped Elise. However, she couldn’t follow through with her thoughts after he asked.

 

“If you don’t like it, will you quit now?”

 

If she refused, the Count would throw her out. And for her, that was like a death sentence.

 

“No…!”

 

Elise shook her head urgently.

 

“I won’t contact the Count. Really.”

 

Elise had tried to tell Cardale about her mother, but she soon gave up. Instead of getting his help, she felt like the situation would get worse.

 

‘He wouldn’t grant me such a favour just because I spent one night with him…’

 

When Elise meekly agreed, Cardale pulled the rein.

 

“Bring in a meal.”

 

A table was set up right next to the bed, and food was prepared.

 

A hot stew with beef and tomatoes, soft bread that tore in half easily, smoked salmon with cheese, and a whole roasted duck…

 

It was a considerable amount at a glance, so Elise cautiously squinted at Cardale.

 

‘Should I make room for him now? Or does this mean that I am to serve the Duke his meal here?’

 

Elise naturally guessed that these were dishes prepared for the Duke. Therefore, she couldn’t help but be surprised when dishes were placed in front of her as well.

 

“Serve it.”

 

“For myself, too?”

 

When Elise asked in shock, Cardale chuckled at her surprise.

 

“Is there anyone else here to eat besides you?”

 

Elise looked back at the table. When she saw the appetising food, she suddenly felt extremely hungry.

 

‘A little bit… It will be okay to eat.’

 

Elise carefully picked up the soft bread, broke off a bit, and brought it to her mouth. The amazingly soft and savoury flavour swirled in her mouth.

 

‘Delicious…’

 

As she was unconsciously trying to eat a little more, a cold voice suddenly rang in her head.

 

‘Do not indulge in gluttony. It’s disgraceful.’

 

Elise swallowed dry and put down the piece of bread. Then, the maid quickly put down her stew.

 

The warm stew went down her throat and warmed her stomach. Elise had been scooping up a few more spoons as if possessed, then suddenly put the spoon down again.

 

A similar action was repeated every time the plate was changed.

 

Elise was so worried that she was gorging herself that she didn’t realise Cardale was watching her.

 

‘I need to stop eating.’

 

Although there was still a long way to go before she was full, Elise carefully put down the utensils. Or she had intended to.

 

But she suddenly lost her grip and lost her fork.

 

Clink! The fork rolled on the floor with a sharp noise.

 

Elise was shocked, as if she had made a big mistake, and looked at Cardale.

 

But he said something else, as if he had no interest in the silverware that Elise had dropped.

 

“Eat more.”

 

The maid quickly brought Elise new dishes and placed them on the table. Elise didn’t know how to respond, so she fiddled with her fingers before finally opening her mouth.

 

“But my stomach, I’m full…”

 

The excuse she barely came up with backfired. Because that couldn’t be true, Cardale’s eyes suddenly sank horribly.

 

It was then.

 

He had a maid bring a freshly baked meat pie and place it on the table.

 

Upon seeing this, Elise’s face instantly turned pale, as if she had had her blood drawn from her entire body.

 

The maid cut the greasy pie in half. Then the room was filled with the scent of meticulously chopped meat and rich gravy.

 

But to Elise, it was the smell of her death.

 

That was when the maid cut a large piece of the meat pie, and placed it on Elise’s plate.

 

“Ugghh…!”

 

Elise couldn’t bear her nausea and covered her mouth. She couldn’t bear to see Cardale’s face harden and his brows narrow.

 

“Is this a damn dog or a fat pig? Just how much did she eat to end up on the floor like that?”

 

“I heard that another bitch is gone instead of you? That’s too bad.”

 

Elise shook her head, trying to shake off the horrid memories eating into her mind.

 

‘No, this doesn’t contain any poison. There is no reason for the Duke to go through the trouble of poisoning me.’

 

There were plenty of ways for him to kill her if he wanted to. Besides, she wasn’t worth the Duke’s effort to kill her.

 

But she felt sick to her stomach. Her head felt dizzy, and her insides were turning inside out. Cold sweat was running down her back. Her throat tightened, and she couldn’t breathe properly.

 

She felt like she was going to die, and couldn’t hold on, so Elise prayed.

 

“Please, this… I can’t eat it… Duke, please…”

 

“Put it away.”

 

Before Elise could finish her plea, Cardale gave the maid an order.

 

The maids who served her quickly removed the dishes in front of Elise. The pie was removed from the table, and someone opened the window to ventilate the room, helping dispel the meaty smell.

 

Only then did Elise let out her trapped breath. It was like she fell into deep water, panting as if she had just been pulled ashore, with an expression that made no sense to those outside of her thoughts. 

 

“Everyone get out.”

 

At his command, Linda and the maids quietly left the room.

 

“Huh, huh…”

 

Cardale approached and stood in front of Elise, who was breathing heavily.

 

“S-sorry…”

 

Elise barely raised her head and spoke to him.

 

“I just can’t eat meat pie, everything else is fine…”

 

Cardale waited in silence. Then, as Elise’s breathing gradually calmed down, he asked.

 

“Why can’t you eat it?”

 



 

Elise kept her lips closed for a long time.

 

“Elise. I told you not to lie to me.”

 

Bright red eyes flashed like those of a wild beast, urging Elise to give him an answer.

 

Elise closed her eyes tightly and confessed.

 

“I’ll fear it’s been poisoned…”

 

“Huh…”

 

Cardale immediately grasped her situation. It was not a new reason. Trying to get rid of a spouse’s illegitimate children was a frequent occurrence, and poisoning was one of the more convenient methods.

 

It was the easiest way to kill the other person without knowing who had done it.

 

“Apart from the meat pie. Why can’t you eat anything else properly and ask for more?”

 

“I don’t know how much I should eat…”

 

This time, Cardale’s brows furrowed.

 

Elise looked back and forth between him and the table with a confused expression on her face. The expression on her face as he studied her was exactly like that of a frightened deer.

 

‘Why?’

 

Suddenly, irritation rose. Cardale picked up a strawberry, cut off the stem, and brought it to the woman’s lips.

 

“Open your mouth.”

 

The strawberry fell into Elise’s mouth, when it opened in surprise. 

 

At the same time, Cardale captured her lips.


Following the playfulness of the man’s tongue, the strawberry crumpled instantly in Elise’s mouth, releasing its sweet juice.

 

“Uh, uhm…”

 

He shoved the finely crushed fruit down the back of Elise’s throat. Watching her swallow it down eagerly, like a baby bird, somewhat eased the anger that had built up within him.

 

After coercing Elise to eat the entire strawberry, Cardale finally pulled away. Licking his lips, moist with the sticky juice, the sweet taste spread deep in his mouth.

 

“Eat. Since you think you are full and unable to eat more.”

 

Cardale took a large piece of the salmon fillet and placed it on a plate. Then, he positioned himself behind Elise, encircling her as he expertly began to slice the fish.

 

While the fish was being sliced into bite-sized pieces, Elise felt the man’s presence behind her and held her hands tightly. For some reason, her heart was pounding.

 

“Elise.”

 

Cardale finished cutting the salmon into pieces and placed a fork in her hand. As the man’s large, warm hand brushed against hers, Elise’s heart beat faster.

 

“Come on, you should eat.”

 

This voice was quite affectionate. That was when Elise nodded and tightened her hand on the fork.

 

“Ah…!”

 

Suddenly, Cardale grabbed both of Elise’s breasts. He put his lips close to Elise’s ear and whispered seductively.

 

“You better eat properly. If you can’t, you might not be closing your legs tonight. I fucked you a few times last night, so I guess you still need help getting the position right.”

 

“Ah, uh!”

 

A moan escaped Elise as he rubbed her nipples, protruding through her clothes.

 

“If you can’t satisfy your master, you should at least listen well.”

 

“I’ll listen… I will, ah…!”

 

While Elise was eating, Cardale played with her breats to his heart’s content. Elise moaned each time he squeezed his large hands, and her nipples twisted in a way that made the top of her head tingle.

 

If she hesitated to eat even for a moment, her punishment was dealt out immediately.

 

His lustful whispers escalated to asking if she would listen to him if he filled her stomach with his semen instead of food. Elise shook her head, moving the fork with trembling hands.

 

At such times, he stopped his actions and waited mercifully. He then watched intently as Elise’s lips moved reluctantly and emptied the plate as if eating her last meal.

 

After finishing a whole dish like that, her belly miraculously seemed full, as if lying to her.

 

“Now, ugh, I’ve eaten it all… Uh…”

 

“Good job.”

 

Cardale cupped Elise’s breast as if praising her. Then, he suddenly slipped his other hand to dig it between her crotch.

 

“So I should give you a reward.”

 

“Huh…!”

 

Elise unconsciously rubbed her thighs together and tightened her entrance. The area that had been used all night was tingling and throbbing.

 

“Isn’t it so hot that you’re getting wet down there again?”

 

“Ah, huh, huh…!”

 

Her exposed clitoris, like a peeled kernel, was rubbing against the fabric of her clothes. Elise moaned helplessly and writhed her body, at some point she curled her toes tightly and trembled her thighs.

 

“You’re mine.”

 

“Ugh, huh…”

 

Cardale lifted the woman, who was unable to control her body in the midst of her orgasm, and carried her to the bed. He then easily took off her clothes.

 

The woman’s naked body, exposed under the bright light, was red with the traces he had left behind during the last night. Elise covered her face, feeling ashamed of her body being exposed in full sunlight.

 

“It’s not even night yet…”

 

“Is that the problem?”

 

Cardale curled his lips in amusement and pulled the curtains on the bed closed. Then the space became dark, like night.

 

Elise was embarrassed by the sudden darkness and covered her body. Because she couldn’t see anything, her tension and fear doubled.

 

“Ah, Duke…”

 

The red eyes of the man took in every detail of the woman.

 

“It’s night now, so it’s okay.”

 

“Ahhh…!”

 

Cardale’s hands began to move her body again, deftly.

 

In just one night, the man figured out where the woman was most sensitive, where she liked being touched and where her body trembled, which quickly made him excited.

 

It didn’t take long for her to become so wet that the bed sheets were soaked.

 

Soon, Elise was shaking in extreme pleasure. Her world flashed white several times, and her mind became muddled, unable to think of anything.

 

All she could do was cling to him and cry until her voice went hoarse.

 



 

It was already the second day.

 

Gerhard had no choice but to accept it when his precious bird did not return again.

 

“It looks like it got caught by the Duke.”

 

He said, sucking hard on his cigar. Vanessa added as she filled the humidor on his desk with new cigars.

 

“But she hasn’t come back yet.”

 

“Yes. That’s true.”

 

If the bird had been discovered, she would have also been discovered to have been secretly exchanging messages. There was a possibility that even the contents of the note had been revealed. 

 

But Elise hasn’t been kicked out yet.

 

“Isn’t this proof that the young lady is doing her job well?”

 

Gerhard’s expression did not brighten despite Vanessa’s words.

 

“You don’t know that. There hasn’t been any communication from the Duke.”

 

Gerhard furrowed his eyebrows and was lost in thought.

 

‘Could it be that it was mistaken for a spy and killed?’

 

He quickly shook his head. It won’t be that much. At best, it was a call urging her to take care of her body better.

 

‘Elise. Did she run away after the bird was removed from the Duke’s residence? No. There’s no way she would do such a stupid thing when I have Marissa in my hands.’

 

In that case, there was only one reason for her to stay.

 

This meant that even though she was caught, Elise changed the Duke’s mind.

 

‘She must have acted desperately as her mother’s life depended on it…’

 

“It’s frustrating.”

 

He could roughly guess the situation, but there was no way to confirm it, and his nerves were tense because nothing was certain.

 

He took three more puffs of his cigar in succession. As the scent of the smoke penetrated his lungs, he felt slightly better.

 

“Just wait a few more days.”

 

“I guess so.”

 

All they could do was to wait for some news from the Duke of Vassenberg.

 

Gerhard got up and went into the room next to him. Then, the servant who was holding and preparing his clothes quickly attended to him.

 

He removed his cigar-scented shirt, vest, and pants. Then put on a coat to complete his change.

 

Finally, the man checked that his cravat was properly tied, combed his hair by hand, and returned to his original room.

 

Today was the day he visited the villa he owned under a different name once a month.

 

It was also the place where his ill mistress was recuperating.

 

Vanessa naturally asked about the schedule.

 

“Are you planning to be away for a few days?”

 

“About three days. If you get a call from the Duke, send the bird.”

 



 

Elise looked in the mirror.

 

Before she knew it, the scars on her body had almost disappeared. Elise quietly lowered her head.

 



 

After the two-day passionate affair, the Duke had not held her for several days.

 

Because of that, Elise became anxious.

 

She felt like she was the main character in a story that ended with a woman being used for just one night.

 

‘If I stay like this and get kicked out…’

 

Through her nervousness, she fiddled with her fingertips. She knew it was a bad habit, but she couldn’t stop it.

 

“Maybe I didn’t do it right…”

 

Elise couldn’t endure the first or second day. At one point, she lost consciousness.

 

Maybe that’s why he wasn’t satisfied with her.

 

“Lady Elise, this is Linda. May I come in?

 

Elise suddenly came to her senses. It seemed like it was already mealtime.

 

“Pl-Please come in.”

 

In the living room attached to Elise’s room, a table had been set up a few days ago, and food was placed on top of it.

 

Then Linda served her.

 

“Are there any dishes not to your liking?”

 

“I am okay.”

 

Elise shook her head. Instead of her empty words, only the things she liked were on her table, just like her lies.

 

In fact, she didn’t even know what kind of food she liked before coming to the Duchy, so even this felt unfamiliar to her.

 

“Thank you. I will eat well.”

 

Elise was eating more on purpose, but she didn’t actually have to make any special effort.

 

She had enough to eat. All she had to do was eat what Cardale wanted.

 

Thanks to him, Elise knew what it felt like to sleep without hunger, even though she still had trouble sleeping for other reasons.

 

After Linda finished cleaning and left, Norman came and prepared her tea.

 

For the past few days, the two have been taking turns going in and out of Elise’s room.

 

Thanks to this, Elise was able to keep her mind occupied. Even though she was worried about Cardale not calling her.

 

Meanwhile, Norman made a pitiful face as he looked at the sullen young lady.

 

“Does she have any concerns?”

 

His master had ordered him to pay attention to Elise’s health.

 

This was actually the first time the Duke had ordered someone to be watched, and the Duke’s employees took this as a meaningful task. The same was true for Norman.

 

“It may be that the young lady’s body has not recovered yet.”

 

After spending two nights in a row with Cardale, Elise developed a fever.

 

The doctor politely but firmly diagnosed the patient with malnutrition and “overwork,” making Cardale fall silent for a moment. Then, he didn’t come out of his office for several days.

 

Since the owner was a workaholic, he seemed no different from usual, but Norman couldn’t help but feel that he was different somehow.

Norman checked on Elise three times a day.

 

“How are you feeling, Lady Elise?”

 

“Great.”

 

“Are you in any pain?”

 

When Elise nodded, Norman smiled and opened the plate cover. A dessert with a sweet aroma was revealed.

 

“I prepared egg tarts.”

 

Norman quickly noticed that Elise’s eyes were sparkling for a moment.

 

But the light went out in an instant, like a gas lamp going out. Instead, hesitation appeared on her face.

 

Norman had already seen Elise like this several times.

 

When the sweet and expensive dessert was served, Elise was happy, but her face would quickly darken.

 

Like she had seen something she shouldn’t, something scary.

 

When Norman reported this to Cardale, he ordered, 

 

“In that case, let her see you or Linda eat it first.”

 

The old butler, who had secretly guessed that the young lady had bad memories from the past, then realised the hidden meaning.

 

Norman knew well what the situation was like for illegitimate children in the Nodrat Empire.

 

He imagined the persecution and suffering this delicate little girl must have endured for such a long time.

 

So he would use the excuse of being hungry to ask for snacks. Although it was impossible, Elise was willing to welcome him as her tea companion.

 

“Actually, we also tasted a little bit of it, and it was very delicious. The rich flavour of the yolk and the sweetness of the sugar combined for a wonderful taste.”

 

“Uh, really?”

 

“Yes. I hope you try it.”

 

Only then did Elise carefully taste the tart. After a while, Norman smiled happily as he saw the girl’s eyes widen.

 

Then he hinted at a suggestion.

 

“The weather is nice today. Would you like to go for a walk? It will get hot in the afternoon, so now might be a better time to take a walk.”

 

“Can I?”

 

“Of course, as long as you bring an escort.”

 

“Well, but I couldn’t inform the Duke…”

 

When Elise hesitated and did not readily respond, Norman gently encouraged her again.

 

“The master has given permission, so you don’t have to worry. Today would be your first time seeing the garden, so I’ll show you around.”

 

Only then did Elise’s expression brighten. She raised her body, her blue eyes sparkling.

 

“Then I want to go out.”

 



 

The office maintained a quiet and desolate atmosphere as usual.

 

The only sound was the crunching of a quill tip in the Duke’s hand rubbing against the paper.

 

Cardale had been buried in documents for a long time, then suddenly looked up.

 

His eyes naturally turned to the window. Toward a sound coming from outside. His deep, scarlet eyes narrowed when he noticed something.

 

It was Elise Schuvan.

 

Cardale stared at the woman.

 

Her steps were as light as flying. The skirt of her thin dress fluttered as she moved.

 

‘Who made her wear such thin clothes?’ Cardale narrowed his brows when he remembered that the temperature today was a little lower than yesterday.

 

But regardless, the woman seemed quite happy.

 

The corners of her mouth were gently curved, and her cheeks were nicely flushed. Above all, her eyes were sparkling.

 

It was like a deer that had no clue about the world—a white deer that had a lot of fear, but was also very curious about trivial things.

 

The woman looked at the freshly bloomed pink flower, and he liked it very much. Then, she gently touched the white rose next to her with her fingertip and smiled.

 

Flowers bloomed in abundance in spring. 

 

And he was just wondering what that meant…

 

But as he was sincerely watching her, he suddenly felt odd. Strangely enough, a corner of his chest was pounding. When he realised that, it was a weird feeling again.

 

Unfamiliar feelings were usually accompanied by discomfort, so Cardale dismissed it as nothing and took his eyes off the woman.

 

‘I wasted my time.’

 

He was about to look back down at his important documents.

 

“Your Grace.”

 

It was Michael. He took a polite stance and spoke straight away.

 

“There is a report that the Esteemed Lady came to the front gate of the Duke’s residence.”

 

Cardale’s eyes narrowed.

 

“She sent several letters to me, but she hasn’t been able to make contact. So I think she came to visit me in person this time.”

 

Whenever Cardale ignored his mother, she would act recklessly like this.

 

Before he knew it, Cardale’s dulled temper suddenly sharpened.

 

“She is someone who cannot seem to learn.”

 

He commented in a cold voice without even the slightest hint of affection.

 

“Leave her alone. She will go back on her own.”

 

It wasn’t just once or twice, but this had happened quite often, so shouldn’t she understand by now? A cold, emotionless Cardale stopped his hand as he turned to the next page of his document.

 

The man’s eyes looked out the window and back down at lightning speed, he ordered.

 

“Bring her in.”

 

His mother was in the opposite direction from the main gate, but he couldn’t rest assured.

 

Wasn’t there already a history of her being bitten by another animal? The wound was so deep that it did not heal for a while.

 

“Yes, Your Excellency.”

 

After Michael left, Cardale’s eyes were fixed outside the window. 

 

The deer was still there, busy looking at the grass, oblivious.

 

It was necessary to treat the weak and naive with great care, even if it meant confining them.

 

Otherwise, it will easily get damaged and die.

 

It was something to be cherished, kept for a long time, and enjoyed. That was all.

 



 

While taking a walk, Elise discovered a vine growing along the round arch of the corridor. Purple flower clusters hung between the flat leaves.

 

Norman while guiding her, followed her gaze to see the flowers, and said happily.

 

“Ah, the morning glories have already bloomed. They wither quickly in the afternoon, so you’re lucky to catch them.”

 

“Morning glory…”

[T/N: Finally, we come to know the name of the flowers drawn on the cover!]

 

“Yes. They grow well here, so if you look closely, you’ll find them all over the mansion. They might be weeds to some, but they have their own meaning, so we leave them in appropriate places.”

 

Elise looked back at Norman.

 

“Meaning?”

 

“Yes. Purple morning glories symbolise nobility. There seemed to be other meanings as well…”

 

Norman narrowed his brows for a moment, pondered, and then smiled broadly.

 

“As I get older, my memory is not what it used to be. That’s what I always say anyways.”

 

Elise nodded and looked back at the flowers.

 

Nobility. 

 

Suddenly, she thought of the Duke, the owner of this mansion. He was truly a person who could be described as noble.

 

While Elise was lost in her thoughts, looking at the flowers.

 

Michael ran towards them and bowed his head

 

“Young lady, you need to go inside now.”

 

Elise paused.

 

“Already…?”

 

“Yes, it is Your Excellency’s order.”

 

It seems like it hasn’t been that long since she came out for a walk…

 

The disappointment that was about to creep out of her was momentary, and Elise was soon reminded of her position in this mansion.

 

‘If I think about it, the Count didn’t like my mother going out either.’

 

Elise recalled her childhood when she was always confined to the villa. She then realised that she had nothing to be sad about.

 

‘I should be grateful he allowed me to go for a walk.’

 

Once she thought about it that way, it was easy for her to accept it. Elise immediately stopped looking at the flowers and turned around.

 

There was someone unexpected in the room she returned to.

 

“Duke…?”

 

Elise opened her eyes wide. She didn’t know she would see the Duke in just a few days, especially in her room.

 

At the same time, her heart was pounding.

 

‘The Duke came to visit me.’

 

Even though she was so relieved by that, it was somehow awkward to look at his face.

 

‘Is it because we spent the night together?’

 

She was still afraid of him. But unlike before, she also felt ashamed. When Elise felt embarrassed she would slightly turn her gaze away.

 

“Did you enjoy the walk?”

 

“Ah… yes!”

 

Elise suddenly came to her senses and lowered her head.

 

“It was really fun. Thank you for your permission.”

 

She gave an extremely polite thanks, worthy of a maid.

 

But when Elise raised her head, she was met with Cardale’s expression as if he didn’t like something about it.

 

‘Did I make a mistake?’

 

Even though she hadn’t done anything wrong, she felt anxious. While she was reflecting on whether her greeting was wrong, he opened his mouth.

 

“Would you like to go boating on a lake in the northwest soon?”

 

“Boating?”

 

It was something she never imagined hearing, so Elise’s eyes widened.

 

“Can I go?”

 

She looked up at him and asked again cautiously. For some reason, Cardale’s expression suddenly became grim.

 

Elise’s swollen heart shrunk in an instant.

 

‘What should I do? I just said it, but I guess I was too excited and acted without thinking.’

 

“Yes.”

 

Unlike usual, his voice was murky, as if his vocal cords were being scraped. His chin was sticking out as if he was holding something back.

 

“I told you to get ready.”

 

His expression seemed angry, but his words were indifferent, so she didn’t know how to react.

 

Still, it was true that she was happy and excited, so Elise smiled shyly without realising it.

 

“…Thank you.”

 

Then Cardale’s bright red eyes stared at her.

 

“Don’t leave your room today.”

 

“Yes.”

 

After saying those words, he turned without any hesitation. Elise placed her hand on her chest as she watched Cardale leave her room.

 

Her heart was beating faster than usual.



Continue in Part 2.



